Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Annotation, introduction, chapters 1-4, and table of </F>
contents of book "The Principles of Combined Arms Battle: 
Military-Theoretical Work", by Major General (Retired) I. N. 
Vorobyev, doctor of military sciences, professor, Orders of 
Lenin and October Revolution Red Banner Order of Suvorov 
Military Academy imeni M. V. Frunze Scientific Research 
Department, Academy publication (signed to press 30 March 1992), 
659 pages and 15 inserts] 
  [Text] 
<H6>  Annotation </H6>
  This book is about tactical art. It details the history of 
the origin and development of fundamental principles of combined 
arms battle and reveals their essence under present conditions 
and their interrelationship with principles of operational art 
and strategy. An identification of ways and methods of 
implementing demands of tactical principles in defensive and 
offensive battle and meeting engagements, and development of 
appropriate recommendations for commanders and staffs, are the 
book's principal content. Main attention is given to new 
problem-oriented questions. The range of questions covered is 
from company to formation. The work is widely illustrated by 
diagrams and tables. 
  The work has no analogues, is distinguished by a 
non-stereotyped nature of construction and exposition, and is 
written in a lively, graphic language. Its purpose is to be a 
supplement to tactics textbooks and training manuals. The book's 
entire content is aimed at shaping officers' creative thinking, 
rejecting banality, fighting routine and conventionalism, and 
reviving tactics as a genuinely innovative art. 
  In examining the evolution of principles of battle, the 
author saw his task as showing as completely as possible the 
role of Soviet military-theoretical thought and, especially the 
contribution of prominent Soviet military leaders of the Civil 
War and Great Patriotic War in developing and enriching them. At 
the same time, the work pays proper attention to analyzing works 
on this subject published in Russia in pre-revolutionary times 
and also works of foreign authors. The book is designed for 
officers at the tactical level and for students and cadets of 
higher military educational institutions. 
<H5>  INTRODUCTION </H5>
  Principles are a "real aid or guiding star for 
the person act-ing." 
  C. von Clausewitz, "On War" 
  ...Principles of military art shine in history 
like the Sun on the horizon, so much the worse for blind men 
incapable of seeing them. 
  Napoleon 
  ...I personally was guided by them (principles of 
military art--I.V.) in preparing all operations. At 
the same time I saw that when these matters were treated 
formally, there was no success in the battle, the engagement or 
the operation. 
  G. K. Zhukov 
  Military leaders have tried to find the "elixir" of victory 
since very ancient times. Centuries went by, a countless number 
of military campaigns and engagements were conducted and a sea 
of blood was shed before inquisitive thinkers, getting to know 
accumulated combat experience and analyzing the secret "springs" 
and "levers" acting in a complex, contradictory situation, 
discovered the guiding threads and developed precepts on how to 
prepare and fight the battle. With the passage of time these 
precepts were enriched and formed into rules and official 
recommendations, which in the final account turned into an 
orderly system of principles of military art reflected in formal 
documents of regulations of all world armies. 
  Encyclopedic sources define the term "principle" as a 
fundamental rule, a guiding proposition, a direction for some 
kind of activity.[.sup]1[/] Principles of battle entered 
military theory as categories defining ties and relationships of 
various aspects of combat activity of formations, units and 
subunits; as fundamental ideas; and, as the most important 
recommendations on preparing and conducting battle.[.sup]2[/] 
Principles of military art are rightly called a coagulation of 
military wisdom, a guiding light in a military leader's command 
and control activity. The experience of many wars were 
accumulated in them; the creative inspirations of field 
generals, bitter lessons of defeats and interpreted results of 
victories were embodied in them. Principles of military art were 
passed on from generation to generation like a most valuable 
scientific baton, an inexhaustible fount of military thought. 
  Soviet military art also adopted principles of military art 
from the moment it originated, inheriting everything valuable 
that had been accumulated in past military affairs. These 
principles were reflected and developed in military regulations, 
textbooks and military-theoretical works of the young Red Army. 
Works of military authors critically revised many theoretical 
provisions of military art and of Army and Navy organizational 
development on a new methodological and material basis and 
revealed the interrelationship of principles of military art and 
laws of war. 
  But under the influence of I. V. Stalin's cult of 
personality, discussions in the press ceased in the mid-1930's 
on questions of development of strategy, operational part, and 
tactics. Statements by certain military specialists crept into 
military literature to the effect that allegedly all principles 
whatsoever were alien to Soviet military science since they 
hobbled military art. During the Great Patriotic War, Stalin 
formulated the thesis of permanently operating and temporary 
factors deciding the course and outcome of war. They were viewed 
as the chief element in Soviet military science, almost as its 
basic laws and principles, although in reality they reflected 
only certain of its areas. Thus, for example, only one factor 
was taken from the sum total of complex questions of command and 
control--the organizing abilities of command personnel. The 
importance of officers' art and of the personnel's scientific 
knowledge, combat proficiency and moral-psychological qualities 
was not taken into account. 
  The postulates of Stalinist lines, considered infallible, in 
fact suffered from one-sidedness and logical and constructive 
inconsistency, contributing to the propagation of dogmatism and 
conventionalism. The development of propositions on logical 
patterns of development of warfare and of fundamental principles 
of military art were consigned to oblivion for many years in 
Soviet military science. Only in the 1960's did provisions on 
principles of military art appear in Soviet Armed Forces field 
manuals, in textbooks and in works on military theory. 
  But the consequences of authoritarianism and of slavery to 
routine in military thinking left a negative imprint on 
military-scientific research. As applied to principles of 
military art, this was reflected in the fact that a number of 
works interpreted their content very arbitrarily. For example, 
the work "O sovetskoy voyennoy nauke" [On Soviet Military 
Science] included among principles of warfare those such as the 
immediate, swift exploitation of success of nuclear missile 
strikes for conducting an offensive against the enemy with all 
available personnel and equipment, swiftness in conducting the 
battle and operation and exploiting success in them at high 
rates, continuous strategic, operational and tactical 
reconnaissance, and so on.[.sup]3[/] 
  An especially large amount of confusion was allowed in 
formulating principles in military-philosophical works. For 
example, in spite of the provisions of regulations, the work 
"Marksistsko-leninskaya filosofiya i metodologicheskiye problemy 
voyennoy praktiki" [sic] [Marxist-Leninist Philosophy and 
Methodological Problems of Military Practice], published in 1982 
following publication of the "Sovetskaya Voyennaya 
Entsiklopediya" [Soviet Military Encyclopedia], elevated to the 
category of principles of military art those such as carefully 
planning combat operations, combining all methods and forms of 
warfare, disposing troops in depth in the battle and operation, 
and preempting the enemy in deploying and in aligning the combat 
formation.[.sup]4[/] I. A. Grudinin's monograph "Dialektika i 
sovremennoye voyennoye delo" [Dialectics and Modern Military 
Affairs] (Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1971, pp 60-61) considers one of 
the principles to be "a combination of centralization and 
decentralization of command and control." 
  The mistake of these and certain other authors in 
interpreting the principles is that they identify principles of 
battle with specific practical recommendations for its 
organization and conduct ("preempting the enemy in 
deploying...", "swiftness of operations...", "immediate 
exploitation of results of fire strikes" and so on). But if one 
follows such logic, it turns out that practically any 
requirement of a regulation on preparing and conducting battle 
can be elevated to the rank of a principle, which of course is 
not legitimate. Principles are generalized rules and logical 
constructions which stem not from some particular instance, but 
from the aggregate of many battles. Their requirements relate to 
all kinds of combat operations. 
  Principles of Soviet military art are set forth in the most 
systemized form in the "Sovetskaya Voyennaya Entsiklopediya" 
(1978), but even this fundamental work did not get by without 
oversights. It does not show the role of Soviet military leaders 
G. K. Zhukov, K. K. Rokossovskiy, A. M. Vasilevskiy, I. S. 
Konev, I. Kh. Bagramyan, A. I. Yeremenko, F. I. Tolbukhin, N. F. 
Vatutin, A. I. Antonov, I. D. Chernyakhovskiy and others at all 
in developing principles of strategy, operational art and 
tactics during the Great Patriotic War. For fully understandable 
reasons (limited volume), the "Entsiklopediya" set forth the 
principles in summary form. And this is essentially the only 
military-theoretical work where principles of military art are 
considered from a contemporary standpoint. 
  Thus, such an important methodological category as 
principles 
of military art, which is of exceptional importance for 
cognition and development of strategy, operational art and 
tactics, has not received in-depth, comprehensive study in our 
military literature up to the present time. Principles of modern 
combined arms battle are revealed especially poorly. They are 
set forth chiefly in Ground Troops field manuals. But the 
specific nature of regulations does not permit showing their 
development, substantiating conceptual propositions, or 
illustrating them with examples, proof and calculations, which 
is very important not only for understanding the nature of 
modern battle, but also for mastering the art of conducting it. 
  All this indicates that a need matured long ago for 
developing a fundamental military-theoretical work devoted to 
principles of combined arms battle. It should be said that this 
task was accomplished to a certain extent with the publication 
of V. Ya. Savkin's work "Osnovnyye printsipy operativnogo 
iskusstva i taktiki" [Basic Principles of Operational Art and 
Tactics] in 1972. It sets forth the views of very prominent 
field generals and theorists of the past rather fully on 
principles of military art, discloses the dialectical 
correlation of laws of warfare and principles of military art, 
and analyzes the mechanism of action of laws and forms of their 
practical use. But the content of the principles is not revealed 
fully enough: Factors determining their development are not 
shown. 
  Inasmuch as the study of principles of military art in the 
postwar period is limited to a certain time frame (1953-1959), 
the work naturally does not reflect those profound changes in 
military affairs which occurred over a little more than the last 
three decades. One also cannot help but note that the above work 
did not cover many principles of battle such as combat readiness 
of troops; the maneuver of subunits, strikes and fire; 
comprehensive support to battle; total exertion of moral and 
physical efforts; use of the moral-psychological factor in 
support of combat mission performance; and firm, continuous 
command and control. 
  Based on a study of the nature of modern combined arms 
battle, the goal of this work is to reveal the essence of its 
fundamental principles, show their role and importance in 
command and control activity of commanders and staffs, reveal 
the new things which have appeared in their content under the 
influence of scientific-technical progress in military affairs, 
identify trends in their further development, develop certain 
practical recommendations by which one should be guided in 
preparing for and in the course of conducting combat operations, 
and creatively put those principles into practice. This book is 
not an account of "recipes" for achieving success in battle 
(they do not exist in nature) and it is not a "catechism" of 
immutable truths (canons and dogmatic lines are alien to 
tactics). It is a reflection on tactical art, an attempt to 
penetrate into the commander's creative "laboratory" and show 
what he encounters in seeking uncommon decisions in battle, what 
contradictions and difficulties he overcomes and in what way. 
  The content of the work is aimed at shaping an officer's 
nonstandard tactical thinking, at rejecting banality and 
stereotyped approaches, at fighting routine and conventionalism 
and at reviving tactics as the genuine art of doing battle. 
Historical method and objectivity in analyzing phenomena of 
combat reality are the basis of the study. In examining 
principles of battle, their origin, and paths of formation and 
development, the author saw his task as showing not only the 
role of Soviet, but also of pre-revolutionary Russian 
military-theoretical thought and that of foreign military 
analysts. 
  For a long time we boasted that only Soviet military science 
had a monopoly on the truth, deliberately rejecting other 
military schools. This too is one of the sources of dogmatism. 
Enriched by the abundant experience of the Civil War and Great 
Patriotic War, Soviet military theory achieved progress in its 
development. We rightly are proud that our Armed Forces have 
grand combat traditions. But this does not at all mean that one 
must disdain the historical past or fail to notice positive 
things achieved in other armies. It is obvious that for the good 
of the cause one must be critical toward one's own opinions and 
not reject other opinions and foreign military experience out of 
hand. This will help get rid of dogmatism, embellishment and 
conventionalism faster and will help pave the way to new 
thinking in assessing military problems. 
  While having based the study of principles of combined arms 
battle on guidance documents, on combat training requirements of 
Minister of Defense orders and directives, and on requirements 
of field manuals in force, the author at the same time expresses 
his own viewpoint on a number of questions that differs from 
what is generally accepted and advances certain new propositions 
in the form of statements and discussion. The work makes no 
claim that coverage of this subject is indisputable or 
exhaustively complete. 
Footnotes 
  1. See "Slovar russkogo yazyka [Dictionary of the Russian 
Language], Vol 2, Moscow, Izd-vo "Russkiy yazyk", 1983, p 428. 
  2. See "Taktika. Biblioteka ofitsera" [Tactics: The 
Officer's 
Library], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1987, p 67. 
  3. See S. N. Kozlov, M. V. Smirnov, I. S. Baz et al, "O 
sovetskoy voyennoy nauke" [On Soviet Military Science], Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1964, pp 323-330. 
  4. See "Marksistsko-leninskaya filosofiya i 
metodologicheskiye problemy voyennoy teorii i praktiki" 
[Marxist-Leninist Philosophy and Methodological Problems of 
Military Theory and Practice], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1982, p 311. 
<H3>  CHAPTER ONE - ROLE AND IMPORTANCE OF PRINCIPLES OF COMBINED 
ARMS BATTLE IN MILITARY THEORY AND PRACTICE </H3>
  Like any other art, military art has its own 
inherent theory and its own principles, otherwise it would not 
be an art. 
  F. Foch, "On Principles of War" 
  Denial of principles is denial of theory. 
  B. H. Liddell Hart, "Strategy: The Indirect 
Approach" 
  Woe to those who do not know principles. 
  I. P. Uborevich, "Voprosy taktiki v 
sovetskikh voyennykh trudakh" [Questions of Tactics in Soviet 
Military Works]. 
<H3>  1. Origin and Development of Principles of Tactics and Their 
Interrelationship with Principles of Operational Art and Strategy </H3>
  There is not one social science which would not clothe the 
results of its research and generalizations of practice in 
specific rules--principles. Military science, military art and 
theory of tactics are no exception. They have their own 
fundamental categories here--laws, logical patterns, principles. 
And although command and control in the battle and operation 
will not accept rigid norms, although it is harmed by dogmatic 
blinders, this does not at all mean there are no rules here. 
There are, and they are reflected in principles of military art 
developed by many centuries of practice; as combat experience 
has shown, disregarding them inevitably leads to errors, 
miscalculations and even defeat. Conversely, knowing and 
skillfully embodying them in practical command and control 
activity ensures success. 
  Already in ancient times people realized that one cannot act 
at random in the battle and engagement without relying on 
accumulated experience and on recommendations developed by 
predecessors. Flavius Vegetius, a Roman thinker of the ancient 
world, aptly noted: "...Let whoever wishes victory diligently 
train the soldiers; let whoever wishes to obtain a favorable 
result wage war relying on art and knowledge, not on 
chance."[.sup]1[/] 
  The art of tactics and its guiding principles began forming 
long before military leaders began to view the engagement and 
battle as a natural process. Based on the experience gained 
(successful or unsuccessful) and its interpretation and with no 
contemplation of the fact that the rules developed reflect 
objective ties and relationships, precepts were developed on how 
to prepare the army for a campaign, how to dispose it on the 
battlefield, how to supply it with everything necessary and how 
to fight. It was assumed, for example, that if observing 
requirements for an uneven lateral distribution of forces and 
for concealment and coordination of their actions ensures 
success in battle, this means one must be guided by these 
requirements henceforth. Conversely, if a particular method of 
conducting combat operations led to failure, it was discarded as 
worthless. 
  Formation of the theory of tactics and its "main frame," the 
principles of battle, is a lengthy, complex process. Combat 
experience accumulated intuitively over many centuries by the 
trial-and-error method. Each time, failures were paid for in 
blood, and this forced military leaders and thinkers to ponder 
the way in which they should avoid miscalculations and how to 
organize for battle so as to suffer fewer costs and human 
losses. Rules approbated in the course of many battles were 
reflected in treatises, regulations and manuals and acquired the 
importance of mandatory guidelines. In organizing for the battle 
or engagement, military leaders did not begin developing new 
approaches each time but, relying on accumulated experience, 
structured the combat formation more skillfully, achieved 
concealment, speed and cohesiveness of operations, employed 
procedures of deception and so on. Basing themselves on 
predecessors' experience, talented field generals made their own 
contribution to developing methods of preparing and conducting 
battle. 
  In the period of the slaveholding socioeconomic formation, 
military theory managed to arrive at certain generalizations and 
conclusions approximating cognition of some of the most general 
laws of warfare. Principles of military art began to be 
formulated. This was reflected most fully in works by Chinese 
thinker and military leader Sun Tzu, the ancient Greek 
historians Thucydides and Xenophon, Roman military leader Julius 
Caesar, as well as Roman military historians Frontinus and 
Vegetius. If we take the work by Vegetius, "A Brief Exposition 
of Principles of Military Affairs," which was a model 
generalization of combat experience of armies in the 
slaveholding period, it reflected such principles of tactics as 
concentration of force against weakness, surprise ("surprise 
frightens an enemy and usually costs little"[.sup]2[/]), 
coordination and swiftness of operations. 
  No great progress in military affairs was achieved in the 
era 
of feudalism. The art of fighting a battle and war as a whole 
remained at a low level. But even in this period many works on 
strategy and tactics appeared which enriched military theory and 
facilitated development of principles of battle. Works by N. 
Machiavelli, Maurice of Orange and Gustavus Adolphus should be 
noted especially. Thus, in the "Treatise on Military Art," the 
Florentine Machiavelli substantiated the principle of 
historicity and logical patterns in development of military art. 
In tactics, he gave preference to the principle of aggressive, 
decisive actions. His recommendations on aligning combat 
formations, on establishing reserves and on questions of command 
and control and logistic support of troops were of great 
interest. 
  Maurice of Orange, a major military figure of the 
Netherlands, performed a big job in reorganizing the army, 
giving it features of a regular army, and introduced a new 
combat formation--he began employing a linear alignment instead 
of the square columns used in European armies. In practical 
command and control activity, he attached great significance to 
the principle of thorough support of combat operations and to 
the factor of morale. Principles of tactics, especially those 
such as centralization and firmness of command and control, 
massing of forces and flexibility of interworking, received a 
skillful interpretation in military activity of Swedish military 
leader Gustavus Adolphus. 
  Cromwell made a significant contribution to development of 
military art in the period of the British bourgeois revolution 
(1642-1649). His revolutionary army surpassed the King's troops 
in combat effectiveness, capability of accomplishing bold 
actions, precision and organization. 
  Principles of military art received fullest formalization in 
the late 17th and early 18th centuries. Of military theorists 
and field generals of this period who substantially contributed 
to the development of military affairs, one should note French 
Marshal Turenne, Austrian field general Eugene of Savoy, and 
General Montecuccoli. Their combat experience was studied and 
used as guidance by many field generals. In the work "Notes on 
War," General Montecuccoli set forth such principles of battle 
as purposefulness, the ability to commensurate one's forces 
("whoever intends to conquer the entire world in battle feeds on 
the winds and chases the wind"), swiftness and decisiveness of 
actions, surprise and maneuver. 
  Major military writers Fuller and Gibert devoted much 
attention to questions of development of tactics. In 
generalizing experience of wars, they compared it with the 
experience of wars of the ancient world and drew appropriate 
conclusions from this. Gibert's work "Experience of Tactics" 
played no small role in questions of development of principles 
of linear tactics. He favored high troop mobility and an 
improvement in the organization of infantry. Prussian King and 
military leader Frederick II substantially influenced 
development of strategy and tactics in the 18th century. As F. 
Engels wrote, he took linear tactics to perfection. One 
principle of his actions was the "oblique attack," the essence 
of which was a concentration of efforts against one of the enemy 
flanks. 
  A new stage in development of military affairs begun by 
bourgeois revolutions in Europe and mass employment of firearms 
was marked by military science being given an orderly system. 
Works by British military writer Henry Lloyd and German writer 
Heinrich Dietrich von Bulow played an important role in 
this. 
  In the work "Political and Military Memoirs" General Lloyd 
attempted to develop fundamentals of a general theory of war. He 
believed that military art was based on permanent principles, 
among which he included security of the line of operations and a 
five-march logistic system. To achieve success in an engagement, 
Lloyd wrote, do not split your forces, display swiftness and 
firmness, employ maneuver and strive for concealment. 
  Von Bulow's work "Spirit of the Newest System" 
theoretically generalized everything new that had been created 
in the era of revolution. For the first time he noted the 
significance of a mass army, analyzed the content of strategy 
and tactics and defined them. "Strategy," wrote von Bulow, 
"is the science of military movements outside of view or of the 
reach of a cannon shot, and tactics is the science of military 
movements within these limits."[.sup]3[/] Von Bulow 
developed several new theoretical concepts such as a base of 
operations, strategic deployment, the objective of war and so on. 
  New organizational forms which appeared in wars of the 
French 
Revolution were of great significance for development of 
military theory, particularly establishing the army corps, 
upgrading the structure of the division as the basic tactical 
combat unit, and improving the organization of artillery, which 
in some engagements was massed in large groups numbering 
hundreds of pieces. A cavalry was established capable of 
conducting various combat operations and of swift assault in 
tight formation. The logistic support system was improved, which 
helped increase the army's mobility. 
  The new army advanced new methods of combat operations, 
which 
received the most striking manifestation in Napoleon's strategy 
and tactics. Decisiveness of goals, an attempt to defeat the 
enemy army at one crushing blow, swiftness of actions, 
simplicity of maneuver, the ability to achieve surprise, and 
delivery of an attack with massive concentrated attack 
forces--those were the most typical features and principles of 
his military art, which had an enormous influence on subsequent 
development of military theory and practice. For an entire 
century military theorists were captives of Napoleonic strategy 
and tactics. 
  A major event in military life was the appearance in 1813 of 
a capital work by Austrian field general Archduke Karl of 
Austria "Principles of Strategy Illustrated by An Account of the 
Campaign of 1796 in Germany." It formulated rather precisely 
such principles of strategy and tactics as concentrating a 
numerical superiority of forces and employing them on the 
decisive axis, properly calculating personnel and equipment, 
skillfully choosing the moment for delivering an attack, winning 
time, and establishing strong reserves. But it should be said 
that Archduke Karl was one of the forefathers of the theory of 
eternal and immutable principles of war. He feared risk and went 
down in history as the "circumspect" field general. 
  The formation and development of principles of military art 
are linked closely with names of the most prominent military 
theorists of the latter half of the 19th century H. Jomini and 
C. von Clausewitz. Jomini believed that military art must have 
its scientific theory based on recognition of a number of 
immutable principles, which in his opinion existed since 
earliest times and were manifested in the activity of great 
field generals. He included the following among the most 
important principles of military art: Aggressiveness; proper 
choice of strategic points ("keys"); skillful maneuvering to 
move onto internal enemy lines of operations; economy of forces 
in secondary sectors and decisive direction of one's efforts 
against one of the vulnerable points; and establishment of 
strategic reserves. 
  Outstanding military philosopher von Clausewitz created the 
famous work "On War," which reflected a general theory of 
warfare. Von Clausewitz also played a major role in systemizing 
principles of military art. He included numerical strength, 
concentration of forces and surprise among the most general 
principles. Von Clausewitz took the point of view of conducting 
decisive, aggressive combat operations. He recognized the 
general engagement and crushing of enemy personnel to be an 
important means of achieving the goals of war. Von Clausewitz 
attached great importance to purposefulness of actions, the 
material factor and the factor of morale. 
  While giving due respect in the formation and development of 
principles of strategy and tactics to prominent military figures 
and military writers who laid the foundations of military 
science, at the same time it should be noted that combat 
practice directly played an enormous role in shaping principles 
of military art. It served as a criterion of effectiveness of 
developed standards, rules and precepts. War mercilessly cast 
aside everything far-fetched and artificial, affirmed what had 
been tested, and cleared the way for what was vital and 
necessary. Various hypotheses and theories were born and died in 
the flame of battles, but there was an invariable process of 
forward movement, and tactics, operational art and strategy were 
enriched and developed. 
  The permanent value of principles of battle reflected in 
military works, manuals and regulations is that they serve as a 
unique bridge between past and present. The path to the future 
lies through them. By understanding them, the military leader 
receives the experience of preceding generations and moves 
further and reaches new stages of combat perfection based on 
lessons of the past. 
  The 20th century went down in history as a century of 
machines and motors. New machines and new equipment were 
intensively introduced not only to production, but also to 
military affairs. The appearance of new weapons necessitated a 
search for new strategic and tactical concepts, which gave 
powerful impetus to the study of war and development of 
principles of military art. A large number of 
military-theoretical works were published not long before World 
War I, among them works by German military writers von der Holtz 
"An Armed People," Schlichting "Principles of Modern Military 
Tactics and Strategy," A. von Schliffen "Cannae," Bernhardi "On 
War of Today," major French military figure and military 
theorist F. Foch "On Principles of War" and "On Waging War," 
military writer Levalle "Introduction to the Positive Part of 
Strategy," "March Strategy" and "Battle Strategy," American 
Admiral A. Mahan "The Influence of Sea Power Upon History," and 
British Admiral P. Colomb, "Naval Warfare, Its Basic Principles 
and Experience." 
  World War I was a stern test of military-theoretical 
concepts. Many prewar concepts did not stand up to the tests and 
were rejected by combat practice as impracticable. At the same 
time, the experience of war and the new phenomena of warfare 
which arose in its course served as the basis for further 
development of principles of strategy, operational art and 
tactics. Thus, the theories of "blitzkrieg," "tank" and "air" 
war, and "small professional armies" appeared following World 
War I. The theory of the deep operation originated in Soviet 
military science and saw some development. As a result of this, 
all component parts of military art took a new step in their 
development. 
  World War II influenced the content of strategy, operational 
art and tactics even more than World War I. With respect to 
principles of tactics, their development in the course of this 
war as well as in contemporary local wars will be examined in 
more detail in appropriate chapters of the work. 
  Russia's military-theoretical thought made a ponderable 
contribution to the depository of world military art and to 
development and enrichment of its principles. There is no need 
here to anticipate the further presentation of material; we will 
note only that sources of Russian military art take their 
beginning from ancient times. It took shape and developed 
largely on an independent, distinctive path and therefore has 
many specific features. The successful campaign of Kievan 
princes Oleg and Svyatoslav and subsequently the military 
leadership activity of Aleksandr Nevskiy, Dmitriy Donskoy and 
Ivan the Terrible can serve as a vivid example of how high the 
level of development of military art was in Ancient Rus. 
  The "Poucheniya" [Precepts] of Vladimir Monomakh, which set 
forth important rules (principles) of attaining success in 
campaigns and recommendations on ensuring surprise, making 
marches, and methods of conducting an offensive, was one of the 
early ancient Russian military-theoretical works. 
  Military-theoretical thought developed especially rapidly 
under Peter I and Catherine II. A. V. Suvorov called Peter the 
Great the first field general of his century. The Northern War 
and later the Seven Years' War were a major school for Russian 
military art. The beginning of an independent national Russian 
military school was laid down under Peter the Great; its 
continuers were Russian field generals and naval leaders P. A. 
Rumyantsev, A. V. Suvorov, M. I. Kutuzov and F. F. Ushakov. They 
introduced much that was new to strategy and tactics and they 
glorified and brought fame to Russian military art. 
  The Russian army and navy won numerous victories over armies 
of Frederick II and Napoleon, and also over Turkish troops. The 
Patriotic War of 1812-1814 showed that the Russian Army was the 
bearer of the most advanced military experience. 
  Russian military heritage still needs to be revealed. The 
role of Catherine the Great in glorifying Russia, including in 
developing military affairs, was undeservedly minimized. In 
paying due respect to Western European military figures who did 
a great deal for the formation of military science, due respect 
also must be paid to military-theoretical works of Russian 
military writers. Principles of military theory were developed 
in works by I. G. Burtsov "Mysli o teorii voyennykh znaniy" 
[Thoughts on the Theory of Military Knowledge], N. V. Medem 
"Obozreniye izvestneyshikh pravil i sistem strategii" [Survey of 
the Most Well-Known Rules and Systems of Strategy], P. Ya. 
Yazykov "Opyt teorii strategii" [Experience of the Theory of 
Strategy], M. I. Bogdanovich "Zapiski strategii" [Notes of 
Strategy] and N. D. Neyelov "Ocherk sovremennogo sostoyaniya 
strategii" [Essay on the Present State of Strategy]. Principles 
of military art were formulated especially fully and precisely 
in works by N. P. Mikhnevich "Strategiya" [Strategy], A. G. 
Yelchaninov "Vedeniye sovremennykh voyn i boya" [Conduct of 
Modern Wars and Battle], V. A. Cheremisov "Osnovy sovremennogo 
voyennogo iskusstva" [Fundamentals of Modern Military Art], A. 
A. Neznamov "Sovremennaya voyna" [Modern War], and G. A. Leyer 
"Strategiya" [Strategy] as well as in works by a number of other 
Russian military scholars--D. A. Milyutin, A. K. Puzyrevskiy, D. 
F. Maslovskiy, A. Z. Myshloyevskiy, M. I. Dragomirov, S. O. 
Makarov, A. A. Gulevich, V. F. Novitskiy and others. 
  Publication of the Russian "Voyennaya entsiklopediya" 
[Military Encyclopedia] (1911-1915) substantially contributed to 
the formation and systemization of principles of military art. 
It established four principles of military art: Superiority of 
forces; significance of the spiritual element in war; 
significance of chance happenings, and surprise. It was 
emphasized that superiority of forces is the basis of 
victory.[.sup]4[/] 
  It is apparent from the brief historical sketch that the 
theory of military art underwent a complex evolution over many 
centuries of history. Its study and profound understanding 
permit identifying stable logical patterns which determined the 
origin and formation of principles of military art and tactics. 
  The methodological importance of principles of military art 
was that they served and serve as the pivotal basis of all its 
component parts--strategy, operational art and tactics--and they 
determine unity of views of military cadres on fundamental 
provisions of preparing and conducting combat operations. And 
inasmuch as tactics is an integrally indissoluble component of 
military art, the formation of its principles can be understood 
only by having precisely understood the mutual relationship of 
tactics with strategy and with operational art. Let us dwell on 
this in more detail. 
  The role and place of tactics and its principles in 
evolution 
of military art were determined by the significance of the 
battle in the system of warfare. It is known that for many 
centuries the battle played the deciding role in the course and 
outcome of war and in accomplishing missions of strategy. 
Principles of preparing and conducting combat operations have 
originated and taken shape in the depths of tactics and then 
have been accepted by strategy from time immemorial. This was 
dictated by many objective reasons: First of all, by the fact 
that for many centuries means of warfare were insufficiently 
perfect and all without exception were concentrated in the 
tactical sphere; secondly, armies were relatively small and the 
material base supplying the war was poorly developed. Under such 
conditions military operations usually developed into a brief 
clash culminating in a general engagement. For a long time the 
concept of "battle" was identical to the concept of "military 
operations." Thus, the "Entsiklopediya voyennykh i morskikh 
nauk" [Encyclopedia of Military and Naval Sciences] published in 
1883 gives the following definition of battle: "The battle is a 
general concept," "a battle [boy] of two armies which decided 
the fate of the war or of a separate operation . . . is called a 
general engagement or battle [bitva]," "a battle [boy] of two 
armies of a less definite nature than in the previous case which 
decided neither the fate of the war nor even of a separate 
operation, but which led to a more or less substantial change in 
the situation for both sides in the theater of military 
operations . . . is called an engagement [srazheniye]. . . . A 
clash of independent parts of two armies--corps, divisions--is 
called a battle [boy]."[.sup]5[/] 
  With the origin of operations as a new form of warfare there 
appeared a new intermediate link between strategy and 
tactics--operational art, which initially was still not 
officially recognized by military theory. The battle no longer 
acted as the chief means of achieving the goals of war, but only 
as one of its forms, the operation. One local battle, no matter 
how important it might be, and even one major engagement where 
the sides had several armies, no longer decisively affected the 
general course of military operations. The path of war from its 
beginning to its conclusion began running through many, many 
successful and unsuccessful offensive and defensive battles and 
engagements, which were combined into army and then also into 
front operations (operations of a group of armies), and the 
latter into military campaigns that were lengthy in time. 
  With the appearance of operational art as an independent 
component of military art, the need arose for military theory to 
identify the new interrelationship among principles of strategy, 
operational art and tactics. Traditional interworking between 
strategy and tactics was disrupted under the existing 
conditions. Tactics no longer exerted a direct effect, but an 
indirect effect on strategy through operational art. Only a 
multitude of tactical operations in the aggregate, summed up, 
produced an operational result and through the operation 
determined the content of war and its successful or unsuccessful 
outcome. Under the influence of this the internal 
interrelationship among principles of component parts of 
military art became more complicated and the influence of 
requirements of operational art and strategy on the content of 
principles of battle intensified. 
  The role of battle as the basis and chief means of achieving 
the goals of an operation and war was preserved until the 
strategic and operational command element had at their disposal 
their own personnel and equipment which were not part of 
combined arms formations and units. This process began with the 
appearance of aviation in the course of World War I and 
continued after its conclusion, but it was developed with 
special force in World War II. In addition to long-range 
(strategic) aviation, the strategic (operational) leadership at 
that time had airborne troops; air defense troops; powerful, 
highly mobile tank and mechanized large strategic formations; 
and Supreme High Command Reserve artillery formations. These 
personnel and equipment were employed in operations not only for 
reinforcing operational and tactical groupings, but also for 
performing certain independent missions. 
  But even under these conditions the decisive importance in 
achieving operational and strategic results still remained with 
tactics. Tactical actions continued to hold the principal place 
in the system of operations. This was dictated by the fact that 
immediate defeat of the enemy could be achieved only by battle, 
and the majority of personnel and means of warfare continued to 
be at the tactical level. The supreme and operational command 
elements were purposefully in charge of tactical forces and 
assets and created favorable conditions for their employment: in 
preparing and carrying out the operation, they specified 
objectives and missions for formations and units, organized 
interworking among them within the scope of the operation, gave 
them combat and logistic support, and coordinated combat 
operations. 
  But already at that time their own specific principles 
inherent only to these echelons had appeared within the 
framework of operational art and strategy, such as attaining 
simultaneous deep engagement of the enemy. True, in World War II 
this principle was incompletely implemented in practice. The 
problem was that artillery, which basically was at the tactical 
level and whose range capabilities were limited, accomplished 
the primary mission of suppressing the enemy. Although the share 
of participation of operational and strategic assets in 
defeating the enemy increased considerably, it did not become 
decisive. The goal of the operation was achieved in the final 
account by joint operations of formations and units on the 
battlefield, and beyond the battlefield by air strikes delivered 
against the enemy at a varying depth by aviation forces, by 
commitment of mobile groups of fronts and armies both in the 
tactical as well as operational zones of enemy defense, and also 
by the landing of airborne and amphibious assault forces in the 
defenders' rear. General success in such operations was the 
result of efforts both of tactical as well as operational and 
strategic assets, but the latter's proportion in the war 
remained relatively low because of their insufficiently high 
combat effectiveness. The main enemy forces were "pulverized" 
chiefly on the battlefield, in the tactical zone. The battle 
continued to hold a central place in war. Not one engagement, 
not one operation was conceivable without it. 
  The "disposition of forces" in military art became 
qualitatively different with the appearance of nuclear weapons. 
New interrelationships among strategy, operational art and 
tactics took shape under their influence, manifested in the fact 
that the strategic echelon occupied the predominant role in 
accomplishing missions of war, inasmuch as the most powerful 
weapons were concentrated under its command. Therefore the 
question naturally arises as to what role tactics should play in 
operations under these conditions. 
  It should be said that the development of new approaches to 
forming principles of military art did not go smoothly under the 
new conditions. Both foreign as well as Soviet military 
literature expressed many different viewpoints on prospects of 
development of military art and especially tactics. For example, 
the work "Voyennaya strategiya" [Military Strategy], published 
in 1962 under the editorship of V. D. Sokolovskiy, stated that 
under the new conditions the interrelationship of strategy, 
operational art and tactics should be assessed in a 
fundamentally different way. The authors wrote that the time had 
passed when "it was considered an indisputable fact that a 
general victory in war takes shape from numerous local 
successes. . . . Modern strategic weapons . . . immediately 
subordinate to high commands and permitting achievement of 
decisive results in winning victory in war, often even without 
the involvement of personnel and equipment of the tactical and 
operational level, speak in favor of the thesis that local 
successes now can be determined by successes of a general 
strategic nature."[.sup]6[/] The inference naturally stemmed 
from such a conclusion that the role of tactics essentially is 
becoming secondary under the new conditions. 
  But such views formed under the influence of "nuclear 
euphoria" characteristics of the 1960's, when it was 
unequivocally believed that a future world war certainly would 
be a nuclear war. In the 1970's Soviet military doctrine began 
to take account of the possibility of the outbreak both of a 
nuclear as well as a conventional world war. Accordingly, the 
interrelationship of component parts of military art and the 
role of tactics were presented in a new light. The new concept 
was reflected in the fullest form in the book by A. A. Grechko 
"Vooruzhennyye sily Sovetskogo gosudarstva" [Armed Forces of the 
Soviet State], published in 1975. Speaking of the importance of 
tactics, the author wrote: "Regardless of the means by which war 
is waged, tactics remains the base for achieving operational and 
strategic successes." And even: "It begins . . . specifically . 
. . with tactics, it is accomplished by tactics, and the 
implementation of operational and strategic concepts is 
completed by tactics."[.sup]7[/] 
  In recent years judicious state figures have been conducting 
intensified searches for those military-strategic concepts which 
would provide an opportunity to achieve political goals without 
the danger of outbreak of a general nuclear war threatening 
disastrous consequences for mankind. Today's impressions of a 
possible war differ from past ones by the fact that ever greater 
preference is given to military operations with conventional 
weapons. But inasmuch as the probability of conduct of different 
kinds of war, both a world conventional war as well as a world 
nuclear war, is preserved even now, the armed forces of the 
majority of countries are forced to master methods of combat 
operations with and without the use of nuclear weapons. These 
requirements then are made the basis for development of tactical 
principles. 
  An orderly system of principles of combined arms battle 
encompassing all aspects of its preparation and conduct has 
taken shape in our military art at the present time. The 
following are among the most important of them: constant combat 
readiness of subunits; decisiveness, aggressiveness and 
continuity in fighting a battle; coordinated employment of 
subunits of combat arms and special troops and maintenance of 
continuous interworking among them; surprise of operations and 
the use of stratagem (deceiving the enemy); decisive 
concentration of efforts on the main axis and at the decisive 
moment; maneuver of subunits, strikes and fire; timely 
restoration of subunits' combat effectiveness and comprehensive 
support of battle; full exertion of moral and physical forces 
and use of the moral-psychological factor to perform the combat 
mission; and firm, continuous command and control of 
subunits.[.sup]8[/] 
  Speaking of general principles of combined arms battle, one 
should note their interrelationship with particular principles 
which are the basis of combat employment of formations, units 
and subunits of combat arms and special troops. The latter form 
under the determining influence of principles of general 
tactics. At the same time, specifics of combat employment of 
each combat arm (or special troops) are reflected in their 
content. Particular principles of combat arms exert a specific 
effect on the content of principles of combined arms battle. 
  The content both of general as well as particular principles 
reflects the level of development tactics has achieved. Their 
strength and vitality lies in the fact that they do not rely on 
secondary, insignificant, transient circumstances but reflect 
deep processes of combat operations, stable interrelationships 
and objective logical patterns, cognition of which serves as a 
unique reference point for the commander; by adhering to it he 
finds the true path to achieving the goal set in the battle. 
  Principles of military art are reflected in one form or 
another in field service regulations (field manuals, other 
manuals, and guides of all world armies). The U.S. 
Army attaches great significance to them. The U.S. Field 
Service Regulations point out that principles are the foundation 
of the truth about war, and sensible use of them ensures victory 
over the enemy. According to U.S. Army Field Manual FM 100 
(1982), principles of military art are systemized in the 
following order: general principles of war are formulated, and 
principles of the air-land operation (battle) as well as 
principles relating to kinds of combat operations are formulated 
within their framework. The following are among principles of 
war for the Army: Purposefulness; the offensive; massing of 
personnel and equipment; economy of personnel and equipment; 
mobility; unity of command and control; security; surprise; 
simplicity. 
  The principles of battle are subdivided by kinds into 
offensive and defensive. The following are considered principles 
of offensive operations: concentration of personnel and 
equipment; surprise; swiftness; flexibility and decisiveness. 
Concentration of forces is considered an integral part of the 
offensive. 
  The idea of depriving an attacking enemy of advantages and 
quickly seizing the initiative is made the basis of principles 
of defensive operations. Principle No 1 is worded as follows: 
Seize the tactical initiative in individual sectors, and then 
also the general initiative as the transition is made from 
defense to offensive. Principle No 2 states: deliver attacks to 
the full depth of enemy combat formations, which will permit 
delaying and disorganizing him and also creating conditions for 
launching an offensive. A defense in depth gives an opportunity 
to win time and space for executing a swift, flexible maneuver. 
Principle No 3 requires: Dictate conditions of battle to the 
enemy and maintain swiftness and flexibility of fire, maneuver, 
and employment of EW assets. Principle No 4 requires: Coordinate 
operations of all personnel and equipment at your disposal in 
the course of battle and take advantage of the slightest enemy 
weaknesses to stop his offensive. 
  FRG Bundeswehr field manuals usually enumerate the 
following principles of combat operations: Seizure of the 
initiative and activeness; aggressiveness; concentration of 
personnel and equipment at the decisive place and at a favorable 
time; massing of fire in a decisive sector and execution of a 
bold maneuver; interworking; surprise; decisiveness of 
operations, persistence and display of initiative; 
strong-willed, constant, precise command and control; and 
uninterrupted combat and logistic support. 
  Field manuals of the British Army consider the 
most important principles of battle to be the following: Choice 
and approval of the objective; offensive combat operations; 
interworking; freedom of actions; concentration of forces; 
economy of forces; surprise; indirect actions (deceptive 
procedures); combat support of troops; maintenance of healthy 
morale; and command and control of troops and the rear. 
  It is apparent that principles of battle are understood 
differently in different armies depending on traditions which 
have formed, the level of development of military art, depth of 
cognition of logical patterns of warfare, and their 
philosophical interpretation. Nevertheless, one cannot help but 
note that in its essence the wording of the majority of 
principles has a logical similarity. Their important role in 
military art is assessed to a like degree in all armies. 
Speaking of the content of principles of battle, military 
theorists and practitioners always emphasize simplicity and 
accessibility of their understanding. As von Clausewitz wrote, 
"principles of military art in themselves are to the highest 
degree simple and in full accord with common sense."[.sup]9[/] 
<H3>  2. Guiding Lights in the Commander's Control Activity in 
Battle </H3>
  The principles of battle have dual significance for military 
theory and practice. On the one hand, they are the basis for 
systemization of scientific knowledge and logical construction 
of the theory of tactics, reflecting its corresponding level of 
development. On the other hand, they are guiding lights, guiding 
recommendations, by which the commander finds the true path to 
achieving the assigned objective in a difficult combat 
situation. Figuratively speaking, they are the reference points 
of victory. In this section we will speak of the importance of 
principles in command and control. 
  To begin with let us pose the following question: Is it 
possible to exercise command and control of subunits and achieve 
success in battle without knowing the principles of military 
art? We will answer as follows: Generally such a case is not 
precluded under certain particular simplified conditions. If we 
refer to Great Patriotic War experience, then of course not all 
commanders at the tactical level had high erudition and were 
sufficiently trained theoretically in order to deliberately 
apply appropriate principles in practical activity. It can be 
said that many mastered the difficult science of winning 
intuitively, based on practical experience they gained and a 
knowledge of the provisions of regulations. 
  An officer who does not know the principles of military art 
but who prepares for battle can be compared with a wayfarer who, 
being in open country or a dense forest with neither map nor 
compass, tries to find the road to the necessary point. It is 
quite obvious that he will have to wander a great deal. But 
while this will cost the wayfarer loss of time and effort, it 
will cost a commander loss of people and possibly also loss of 
the battle. In order for this not to happen it is necessary to 
"arm" oneself ahead of time both theoretically and practically: 
Learn the nature of modern battle well, know its principles, and 
learn to apply them skillfully in practice. Like invisible 
"advisers," at a difficult moment they will suggest to him how 
to act, how to find the way out of a difficult situation, how 
not to be taken in, and how to avoid mistakes and 
miscalculations. These "advisers" have the wisdom of experience 
of many, many generations behind them and they can be fully 
trusted. 
  Thus it is a question of scientific command and control, of 
that command and control which relies on a knowledge of laws and 
logical patterns of warfare, from which principles of military 
art logically stem. Delving into the mechanism of action of 
these laws permits finding the most effective methods and 
procedures of exerting an effect in the necessary direction on 
the conditions under which laws arise and function and finding 
maximum opportunities in the situation at hand for making and 
implementing faultless decisions. 
  Laws are an objective category. They act independently of a 
person's will and desire, independently of whether or not a 
commander needs this or whether he likes or does not like the 
effect of the laws. He cannot choose particular laws, but must 
reckon with them. Conversely, principles based on the laws are 
applied consciously by man depending on specific situation 
conditions. They contain recommendations about what must be done 
to achieve victory and how one must act. Principles successfully 
combine both the necessary nature of effect of laws of war and 
the relative freedom of people's conscious activity within the 
framework of this necessity. 
  The wording of principles reflects not only requirements of 
laws, but also those goals and missions to which military 
activity is subordinated. Prominent Civil War military leader S. 
I. Gusev said it well about the interrelationship of laws of war 
and principles of military art: "That which is a law in 
consideration' becomes a rule in action. What is a law in 
science is a rule in art."[.sup]10[/] 
  A knowledge of the nature of battle and its objective laws 
and logical patterns permits a commander to gain a deep 
understanding of the meaning of events occurring, correctly get 
his bearings and estimate that situation in which battle is 
prepared and waged. And on this largely depends the advisability 
of the decision made and of all the commander's actions in 
command and control. But it would be erroneous to take this 
proposition to mean that in studying specific conditions of 
battle a commander must not fail to find the logical patterns in 
them in order to reinforce their beneficial influence or reduce 
their harmful influence. The operation, the battle and their 
processes are infinite in their specific manifestations, 
properties and relationships. Thorough cognition of their nature 
and discovery of logical patterns are impossible based on a 
single particular instance. This is achieved in the course of 
generalizing many battles under the most diverse situation 
conditions, which is within the capability only of military 
theory. In analyzing combat experience, its task specifically is 
to discard everything random and superficial, find what is an 
often repeated logical pattern, and on this basis develop 
recommendations, rules and principles suitable for practical 
command and control activity. 
  The value of principles of military art is that a 
dialectical 
unity of the objective and subjective in an officer's command 
and control activity is achieved through them. They serve as a 
connecting link between theory and practice and translate the 
content of theoretical provisions of military science into the 
language of military practice. 
  Principles make it incumbent not only to realistically 
estimate the situation at hand, but also to alter it in 
necessary directions by carrying out necessary measures, 
creating favorable conditions for friendly troop operations and 
hampering enemy operations. In themselves, principles are 
passive and do not bring success. They are principles of victory 
and defeat to an equal extent. Everything depends on how 
skillfully or, conversely, how unskillfully a particular side 
uses the demands stemming from them in practice. 
  A knowledge of the principles facilitates the work of a 
commander who is organizing for battle and exercising command 
and control of it. A profound understanding of the complex 
system of interrelationship of laws and logical patterns of 
combat operations and the principles stemming therefrom is a 
reliable precondition for scientific foresight in military 
affairs and enables predicting both the primary trends in 
development of events as well as specific results of particular 
command and control measures. In short, principles serve as the 
basis of officers' combat proficiency. 
  It stands to reason that cognition of principles in itself 
leads to nothing without an ability to apply them in a specific 
situation. While being good reference points, principles cannot 
provide an answer on how to act in the situation at hand. 
Principles are only the "canvas," a starting point for 
decisionmaking, not the decision itself. They point out the 
general direction of an officer's practical activity, but do not 
reveal specific ways of achieving the objective set in battle. 
  Principles embody theoretical aims and their strength lies 
only in unity with practice. A. A. Neznamov noted: "Theory 
cannot set as a goal to point out the best method of actions in 
all instances. The situation in war is so diverse and, moreover, 
changes so swiftly that attempts to ascertain similar methods 
suitable everywhere and always are doomed in advance to 
failure."[.sup]11[/] G. A. Leyer wrote with respect to 
principles: "A principle indicates only the goal, 
which is why it is only a regulator of creativeness, 
the force directing it onto the path of correct decisions, but 
it hardly is a substitute for it."[.sup]12[/] 
  It is a far cry from a knowledge of principles to the 
skillful realization of their requirements, and this distance is 
not covered simply. Let us refer to Great Patriotic War 
experience. All of our Army's field manuals and field service 
regulations emphasized the importance of skillful interworking, 
command and control, massing of forces on decisive axes, and 
combat and logistic support, and the majority of our regular 
commanders theoretically mastered these provisions. 
Nevertheless, it was necessary to go through enormous military 
ordeals and fight hundreds and thousands of battles before 
officers learned to realize in practice the demands of 
principles of military art, which were simple in themselves, in 
preparing and conducting combat operations. 
  The fact is that a combat situation is extremely changeable, 
multiform and contradictory. In it the essential always is fused 
with the inessential, the natural and logical with the random, 
the old with the new. While in other kinds of activity man 
himself often is free to create circumstances favoring 
accomplishment of the assigned mission, in battle it is possible 
to ensure conditions for achieving success each time only by 
overcoming enemy resistance, i.e., across many, many obstacles. 
  Outwardly the battle is a battle of strength, a contest of 
the sides in firepower, swiftness of maneuver, speed in 
delivering strikes and abilities to defend. But behind these 
superficial manifestations hides a stubborn confrontation of 
intellect, of commanders' minds, a contest of the personnel's 
combat proficiency, commensuration of their moral-psychological 
staunchness, physical endurance and skill. With all other 
conditions being equal, the officer who is able to make 
effective use of favorable factors and to neutralize and nullify 
negative ones has more chances for success. 
  Exercising command and control in conformity with principles 
of military art means, first of all, commensurating the troops' 
goals and missions with the situation at hand, with their combat 
capabilities; secondly, not allowing subjectivism and an 
underestimation or overestimation of the enemy and friendly 
troops; thirdly, planning the battle and organizing interworking 
and its comprehensive support not blindly, but based on in-depth 
forecasting, calculations and foresight; fourthly, relying on 
objective conditions and a knowledge of the nature of battle and 
trends in its development. 
  The enumerated requirements are realized not mechanically, 
but creatively, in strict conformity with the situation. The 
commander cannot help but reckon with the fact that the desired 
goals far from always can correspond to troops' existing combat 
capabilities. The true reality of the state of affairs often can 
differ completely from the situation data received. Only an 
officer who does not think in a stereotyped manner, who is a 
bold innovator, a seeker, and a strong-willed organizer can 
successfully overcome these and many other difficulties and 
contradictions, make the optimum decision and achieve its 
realization. 
  This is especially important now. Never before have military 
affairs developed with such intensity as now, and this opens up 
a broad expanse for officers' creative searches both in theory 
of tactics as well as in practical command and control activity, 
in decisionmaking, and in innovative application of principles 
of battle. The fact is that at the present stage rates of 
renewal of the troops' material-technical base have accelerated 
extraordinarily. And inasmuch as tactics as the most dynamic 
sphere of military art directly reflects processes of change in 
weapons and combat equipment, officers are faced with the task 
of comprehending new phenomena occurring in military affairs 
with maximum mobility and coming up with necessary 
recommendations for the troops' practical assimilation of the 
most effective methods of preparing and conducting battle 
meeting a higher level of development of means of warfare. 
  Such a task is not new. The need to develop tactics 
creatively arose for military cadres in the past. It is known 
that in the postwar period two qualitative leaps in upgrading 
arms occurred in the Soviet Armed Forces and each time it 
demanded that the theory of tactics substantially revise views 
that had formed on the nature of combined arms battle and on the 
content of its fundamental principles. The first such leap 
occurred in the 1950's in connection with nuclear weapons 
becoming operational with the troops, which as noted above gave 
rise to a genuine revolution in military affairs. And in the 
altered conditions our generals and officers managed to work out 
fully and comprehensively the methods for troops to perform 
combat missions in the offensive and defense and effective 
methods of aligning combat formations of formations and units, 
fire damage of the enemy, and organization and accomplishment of 
interworking, command and control, and comprehensive support to 
battle. In the final account, all this was reflected in the 
content of principles of combined arms battle. 
  Many new missions arose for tactics during the 1960's and 
1970's in connection with introduction of missile weapons to the 
troops, which marked the second qualitative leap in development 
of means of warfare and military affairs as a whole. The 
increased power, depth and quick-acting nature of weapons in 
combination with increased troop mobility gave combined arms 
battle an even greater decisiveness and dynamic nature and 
increased its spatial scope. Under the altered conditions, our 
military cadres had to work out tactics of modern battle on a 
more contemporary material-technical basis, rethink the 
principles of its preparation and conduct, and bring their 
content into line with the increased requirements of operational 
art and strategy. 
  At the present time a third qualitative leap is occurring in 
development of military equipment within the framework of the 
continuing revolution in military affairs. It was caused not 
only by a further upgrading of nuclear weapons, but also by the 
intensive development of deep-strike, precision, automated 
weapon systems and by the ever increasing introduction to the 
Ground Troops of aircraft, diverse EW equipment and equipment 
for automating command and control of troops and weapons. 
  Another important feature of the present stage in 
development 
of combined arms battle is that substantial changes occurred in 
operating tactics of foreign armies. In the early 1980's, the 
U.S. Army adopted a fundamentally new "air-land operation" 
(battle) concept and armies of its Western European allies 
adopted a variety of it, the "follow-on forces attack." 
According to these concepts, as noted in the field service 
regulations of these armies, the success of combat operations is 
made dependent on observance of four fundamental principles: 
Initiative, depth, speed and coordination of efforts. 
  It is emphasized that the principle of initiative requires 
preempting the enemy in order to disorganize his troops and 
alter the correlation of personnel and equipment in one's own 
favor. The essence of the principle of depth is to 
comprehensively strive to increase rates of advance and spatial 
scope of combat operations. 
  It is believed that success of offensive and defensive 
operations depends to a decisive extent on timely, reliable 
engagement of the enemy to the full depth of his combat 
alignment. The goal of deep interdiction in the offensive, note 
the regulations, is to isolate the combat operations area, 
disrupt the defender's maneuver, reduce the mobility of his 
actions, not allow a regrouping of personnel and equipment to 
restore defense integrity, prevent the approach of reserves and 
cut them off from the main body. The following are the primary 
missions of deep fire interdiction in the defense: Splitting and 
disorganizing the attacker's combat formations, destroying enemy 
weapons, command and control facilities and communications 
centers, and covering an ongoing maneuver of personnel and 
equipment. 
  The principle of speed envisages flexibility in the 
organization of troops and promptness in the thinking of 
commanders who are capable of preempting the enemy in operations 
and immediately countering him with measures which may lead to 
disruption of his plans. 
  The principle of coordination of efforts is understood to 
mean complete unification of efforts of all troops involved in 
the battle and also of weapons--nuclear, chemical and 
conventional--to achieve maximum combat power and most effective 
use of combat capabilities of troops as a whole and of each unit 
separately. 
  Profound, cardinal changes in views on the nature of battle 
both in our own Army as well as in foreign armies elevates the 
role of commanders' tactical art. Creative searches for new 
solutions in methods of preparing and conducting combat 
operations, the development and enrichment of principles of 
military art, and foresight of prospects for development of 
tactics now are especially important. The entire system for 
training and educating military cadres must be directed forward. 
  Referring to history, it can be noted that the most 
prevalent 
mistake of many armies was that they often prepared "for the 
past war," if it can be thus expressed. That is, they could not 
determine the outlines of future operations and battles 
accurately enough and, out of inertia, continued to master those 
principles of combat operations which already had become 
obsolete long ago. At one time A. A. Svechin, editor of 
"Strategiya v trudakh voyennykh klassikov " [Strategy in Works 
of Military Classics], speaking of the work by French military 
theorist Foch "On Principles of War," correctly noted that "it 
contains the present military system, but one that has proven to 
be not at all in conformity with that reality which world war 
unfolded."[.sup]13[/] It must be said that a multitude of 
major mistakes and miscalculations were made at all 
levels--strategic, operational and tactical--both on the eve of 
World War I as well as of World War II. 
  It cannot be said that our Army and its military cadres 
presently have shifted completely to the new training system and 
have rid themselves of the burden of attributes of stagnant 
times in combat training. Proof of this is that at times in the 
course of conducting tactical exercises an oversimplified 
ground-air and electronic situation is created, deep targets 
remain outside the enemy's fire effect, a certain methodism and 
linear movement of troops from line to line is displayed in the 
dynamics of battle, head-on attacks are delivered, and a rather 
lengthy, passive confrontation of the sides is allowed in the 
process of combat operations. This clearly does not facilitate 
development of officers' active creative search, does not 
mobilize them for a struggle against a strong enemy, and does 
not contribute to instilling the necessary organizing and 
volitional qualities. This is why many young officers are very 
timid in tackling the independent rehearsal of difficult 
tactical missions and often act by direction. 
  We now need a decisive turning point in officers' creative 
thinking and clear realization of the fact that it is impossible 
to accomplish new missions in combat training by old methods. 
Although the wording of the absolute majority of principles of 
combined arms battle has not undergone changes in recent times 
despite the revolutionary renewal of tactics, their internal 
content and, most important, ways and methods of practical 
realization cannot remain the same. There is nothing now more 
pernicious in combat training than acting in the old way 
according to canons laid down at one time. 
  Profound comprehension of changes occurring in the content 
of 
principles of battle and of methods of their application, and 
development of creative, innovative qualities of military cadres 
are an insistent demand of the time. Experience shows that if an 
officer is devoid of tactical flexibility and adheres to 
banality, then for the most part he cannot apply principles of 
battle effectively. Such an officer has an extremely bare 
arsenal of tactics and, on the other hand, he has more than 
enough oversights and vexing chance happenings. Conversely, an 
active officer who thinks innovatively seemingly doubles or 
trebles the combat capabilities of his troops and increases 
chances for success. The slave to routine cannot get rid of the 
hobbles of dogmatic approaches. Liddell Hart wrote: "It is 
senseless to expect indirect actions of a mediocre general who 
acts straightforwardly and for whom prescribed rules are 
supreme."[.sup]14[/] 
  The basis of an officer's innovative approaches in practical 
application of principles of battle is his erudition, 
operational-tactical outlook, and level of military-theoretical 
training. Only a person who knows military affairs thoroughly 
and comprehensively, studies the probable enemy constantly, and 
supplements and expands his theoretical store can create, seek 
out, and develop tactics. An officer needs theory at every step. 
Not one question that is practical to any extent can be resolved 
without having been comprehended and substantiated 
theoretically. Profound, comprehensive knowledge permits an 
officer to adapt rapidly under any conditions, to assimilate new 
provisions of military art independently and in short time 
periods, and on this basis to seek new, nonstandard decisions 
for missions which arise. 
  An officer's military proficiency can be manifested only on 
the firm foundation of broad scientific knowledge. The one whose 
theoretical knowledge and general erudition is richer always is 
more prepared for a change of weapon systems and for tactical 
innovations. 
  An officer's proper application of principles of battle in 
preparing and conducting battle is impossible without mastering 
the art of dialectical analysis of phenomena of combat reality, 
which permits discovering the inner logic of their development 
and "coupling" a knowledge of logical patterns of warfare in his 
activity with practical embodiment of demands stemming from 
them. Dialectics gives a commander a powerful weapon, the 
method, by relying on which he can uncover the interrelationship 
of phenomena and identify the main, decisive element determining 
success of battle. Great physiologist I. P. Pavlov noted that 
"with a good method even a not very talented person can do a 
great deal. But with a poor method even a genius will work in 
vain and not obtain valuable, exact data."[.sup]15[/] 
  It is necessary to learn to correctly apply principles of 
battle based on a rational learning of lessons from past combat 
experience. Military history is a great teacher. The present 
stands firmly on the shoulders of the past and rests just as 
firmly on wings of the future. The value of the inexhaustible 
treasure-house of military art is that it moves apart the 
framework of an individual's experience which is historically 
limited to a brief time and small space, enriches him with 
cognition of the experience of preceding generations, and 
brightens his thinking with the wise acts of talented field 
generals of the past. The great field generals always regarded 
history with reverence. Napoleon admonished: "Wage an offensive 
war like Alexander, Hannibal, Caesar, Gustavus Adolphus, 
Turenne, Prince Eugene and Frederick; read and then reread the 
history of their 83 campaigns and form your thinking on them; 
this is the only means of becoming a great field general and 
divining the secrets of art; enlightened in that way, your 
awareness will discard rules which are contrary to the 
principles to which the great people adhered."[.sup]16[/] 
  Cognition of past combat experience always is beneficial. Of 
course, military history is incapable of giving answers to 
today's urgent questions. It cannot part the curtains of the 
future, but historical experience is able to persuade, exhort, 
inspire and impregnate an officers' creative thinking, direct 
him to deep reflection and expand his knowledge, and already 
this in itself is a great deal. 
  Combat experience achieved through much sweat and blood of 
many generations permits an officer to choose his aims in life, 
arms him with a value orientation, awakens an innovative spirit 
and a constructive beginning, teaches him to see reality through 
the prism of time, and helps him purposefully solve problems of 
modern times from a scientific standpoint. Historical experience 
of wars also is valuable in that it teaches not only what to do 
and how to do it, but also what should not be done and helps 
avoid repetition of mistakes and find proper ways of 
accomplishing combat missions under modern conditions. By taking 
advantage of historical methods it is possible, in Engels' 
words, to obtain "clarification of the development 
process"[.sup]17[/] and consequently to identify trends, 
trace how principles developed, what stages of evolution they 
went through, and what factors influenced their formation. 
  The study of combat experience should not be passively 
contemplative. It is possible to learn proper lessons from it 
only by examining events in a close interrelationship with those 
conditions and circumstances which took shape at that time. It 
is important here to display maximum objectivity and take into 
account not only the positive, but also the negative 
aspects--the mistakes, miscalculations and shortcomings in 
actions of commanders, staffs and troops. 
  Realization of demands of the principles in a combat 
situation occurs in struggle and involves overcoming a multitude 
of chance happenings occurring literally at every step. And only 
an officer-organizer who has iron will, courage and fearlessness 
and is capable of taking a daring risk where necessary can count 
on success. Hence it is important to comprehensively develop 
organizational, moral-volitional and psychological qualities in 
military cadres. 
  Bagration once remarked wisely that the engagement is a 
simple matter, but winning victory in it is difficult. The 
battle and engagement now have become many times more 
complicated, and difficulties connected with implementing 
decisions also have increased a hundredfold. The battle always 
was a process of fierce confrontation and punished severely for 
oversights and mistakes, which obligated commanders to prepare 
it with all responsibility. Military leaders who participated in 
the Great Patriotic War noted in their memoirs the kinds of 
torture and doubts in which the commander's concepts originated 
each time and what will, courage and ability were required of 
them in decisionmaking. R. Ya. Malinovskiy noted that "the 
moment of decisionmaking was a difficult one for the commanding 
general. You must decide on a great cause and give yourself 
entirely only to one often very risky but very necessary 
decision. In these cases thought works intensely and is full of 
contradictions. One is that the desired decision encounters all 
kinds of objections in terms of calculations; another is that 
enormous difficulties are encountered in implementing it; a 
third is that what is tempting, simple and safe frees one of all 
concerns and legal liability. That is how doubts, difficulties 
and strivings intertwine. But a decision definitely has to be 
made. This demands great courage and enormous 
willpower."[.sup]18[/] 
  It is understandable that such qualities of a commander's 
character as self-control in dangerous situations, courage in 
making responsible decisions, independence, decisiveness and 
determination in achieving the set goal, persistence in 
overcoming difficulties, vigorousness and high working capacity 
do not come to an officer of themselves. It is necessary to 
persistently and purposefully form them in classes and exercises 
in the troops and during training in higher military educational 
institutions. 
  An inclination of some officers to use stereotypes in 
decisionmaking and attempts to find methods of attaining the 
goal by the method of copying another's experience are enemy 
number one in command and control activity. A stereotype's 
tenacity in tactics is explained by the search for easy ways to 
success. Adherence to a stereotype most often is inherent in a 
person whose knowledge is meager and whose operational-tactical 
outlook is narrow. An original idea simply does not appear in 
the officer, but there is a scheme set aside in memory according 
to which either he himself or someone else acted in a similar 
situation. The way to eradicate such a situation is clear--it is 
necessary to elevate the officer's tactical erudition, explain 
to him (best of all from historical examples) where unchanging, 
repetitive actions lead in battle and at the same time show how 
to creatively accomplish missions in the situation at hand, 
achieve surprise, employ stratagem and so on. 
  Often it also happens that an officer is sufficiently 
erudite 
and tactically trained, but still acts conventionally in making 
a decision for battle and does not seek original ways of 
performing the mission. The logic of his reasoning usually is as 
follows: Why take a risk and employ something new? What if 
failure befalls me? In this case the reason for manifestation of 
a stereotype is of a psychological nature. It is the fear of 
responsibility for a bold decision. Consequently, a commander 
must be taught the ability to take a risk, not recklessly, not 
precipitously, but calculatingly and farsightedly. 
  The question has been discussed among military theorists and 
practitioners since olden times as to what should predominate in 
a military leader: Mind or will? Napoleon, for example, believed 
that a field general must have a certain balance between mind 
(talent) and will (character, courage). If character prevails 
over the mind, he said, the field general often acts erroneously 
and, conversely, if the mind outweighs bravery he acts 
indecisively. His companion-in-arms Marshal Marmont reasoned 
differently. In examining the correlation among basic 
field-general qualities, he gave preference to will: "If 
willpower is more strongly developed than mental activity," he 
said, "there is a high probability that the goal will be 
achieved. But if the mind dominates character, a constant change 
of decisions, goals and designs appears..."[.sup]19[/] 
  History resolved this argument of the field generals long 
ago. Combat experience shows that a military leader was equal to 
the occasion only when he combined in himself intellectual and 
organizing qualities--high education, natural intellect, 
farsightedness and prudence, the versatile gift of an organizer, 
an iron will, courage and fearlessness. For example, here is how 
G. K. Zhukov's field-general qualities were described by 
Lieutenant General N. A. Antipenko, his deputy for the rear who 
went through many engagements with him. "A deep inner and outer 
composure, smartness of appearance, high exactingness, 
straightforwardness and principle in views and in relationships 
with people, iron will and an inability to adapt himself to 
anyone's sentiments and opinions whomsoever--these are his 
personality traits which generate a deep respect in me for 
Zhukov.[.sup]20[/] 
  And here is another example. Knowing N. F. Vatutin well, A. 
M. Vasilevskiy wrote: "He was able to decisively concentrate 
personnel and equipment on the main axis, build up efforts and 
suddenly deliver powerful attacks against the flank and rear of 
enemy groupings, skillfully employ large masses of tanks for 
developing the offensive into the operational depth, organize 
firm interworking of combat arms and branches of the Armed 
Forces, and reliably maintain continuous, firm command and 
control."[.sup]21[/] 
  We will note in conclusion that fears of the following 
nature 
sometimes are expressed unjustifiably: Applying principles of 
battle developed by combat experience instils a stereotyped 
approach to accomplishing combat missions. We will make bold to 
assert that such reasoning has no foundation. To the contrary, a 
knowledge and use of principles reflected in field and other 
manuals are a starting point for development of the commander's 
creative initiative. By relying on their provisions and the 
recommendations of regulations, he has an opportunity to seek 
new ways and methods of applying them, arrive at correct 
practical conclusions based on theoretical premises, and develop 
his own commander's "signature." 
<H5>  Conclusions and Recommendations </H5>
  1. The principles of battle are the theoretical frame of 
tactics, its basic scientific foundation. These are not 
arbitrary constructions of theorists' intellect, but the product 
of many centuries of military practice, a compilation of 
military wisdom of many, many generations. The entire lengthy 
historical experience of wars indicates that without guiding 
tactical rules--the principles of battle--directing practice 
along the most correct path and without their regulating role, 
it is impossible to imagine any rational practical activity of 
the commander or staff officer in exercising command and control 
in battle. 
  2. The vitality of principles of military art is that they 
objectively reflect the nature and character of warfare and its 
logical patterns and so allow commanders and staffs to orient 
themselves properly in the most difficult situation, find the 
most effective methods of employing weapons and combat 
equipment, and strive for the enemy's defeat by military art. 
  3. A knowledge of principles of battle becomes a physical 
force on condition that in conformity with a specific situation 
an officer is able to put their demands into practice, thereby 
placing their powerful creative potential at his service. 
  4. Demands of the principles of battle are realized 
practically in complex, unique ways. It always is like solving a 
problem with many unknowns. And the more complicated the battle, 
the stronger the enemy and the more powerful his weapons, the 
more flexible tactical thinking must be. Each time an officer 
must take a new approach to choosing effective ways of achieving 
the goal. 
  5. The value of principles of military art lies in the fact 
that they do not in any way bind an officer's initiative but, 
conversely, grant him a certain freedom in choosing methods of 
operations in performing a specific practical mission. Mobility 
of a search, daring of thinking, a bold risk, realistic 
calculation and reliance on a scientific foundation are 
necessary for creative embodiment of demands of the principles 
of military art. 
  6. Principles of battle are not realized each one 
individually, but in an interrelationship. Each principle is 
only a separate link in a common chain. Achieving success in 
battle requires skillful use of the full scientific arsenal of 
tactics and its fundamental principles. 
  7. Having a common basis, principles of all component parts 
of military art--strategy, operational art and tactics--ensure 
uniformity of views of military cadres at all levels on methods 
of preparing and conducting combat operations. But commonality 
of starting positions does not preclude different approaches to 
applying the demands of a particular principle in a specific 
situation. 
Footnotes 
  1. F. Vegetius, "A Brief Exposition of Military Affairs," in 
the book "Vestnik drevney istorii" [Herald of Ancient History], 
Moscow, Sotsgiz, 1940, p 256. 
  2. "Vestnik drevney istorii" [Herald of Ancient History], 
Book I, Moscow, OGIZ, 1940, p 279. 
  3. "Strategiya v trudakh voyennykh klassikov" [Strategy in 
Works of Military Classics], Vol II, Moscow, 1924, p 26. 
  4. See "Voyennaya Entsiklopediya" [Military Encyclopedia], 
Vol IV, St. Petersburg, 1911, p 479. 
  5. "Entsiklopediya voyennykh i morskikh nauk" [Encyclopedia 
of Military and Naval Sciences], Vol I, St. Petersburg, 1883, pp 
452-453. 
  6. "Voyennaya strategiya" [Military Strategy], Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1962, pp 16-17. 
  7. A. A. Grechko, "Vooruzhennyye Sily Sovetskogo 
gosudarstva" 
[Armed Forces of the Soviet State], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1975, p 
281. 
  8. See "Boyevoy ustav Sukhoputnykh voysk" [Ground Troops 
Field Manual], Part II, "Battalion and Company," Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1989, pp 19-20. 
  9. C. von Clausewitz, "On War," Vol II, Moscow, Voyenizdat, 
1941, p 399. 
  10. S. I. Gusev, "Grazhdanskaya voyna i Krasnaya Armiya" 
[Civil War and the Red Army], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1958, p 196. 
  11. A. A. Neznamov, "Sovremennaya voyna. Deystviya polevoy 
armii" [Modern War. Field Army Operations], St. Petersburg, 
1911, p 13. 
  12. "Russkaya voyenno-teoreticheskaya mysl XIX i nachala XX 
veka" [Russian Military-Theoretical Thought of the 19th and 
Early 20th Century], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1960, p 274. 
  13. "Strategiya v trudakh voyennykh klassikov," Vol I, p 
274. 
  14. B. H. Liddell Hart, "Strategy: The Indirect Approach," 
Moscow, Izd-vo inostr. lit., 1957, p 510. 
  15. I. P. Pavlov, "Polnoye sobraniye sochineniy" [Complete 
Collected Works], Vol 5, Moscow-Leningrad, 1952, p 26. 
  16. "Strategiya v trudakh voyennykh klassikov," Vol I, 1924, 
p 55. 
  17. K. Marx and F. Engels, "Sochineniya" [Works], 2nd ed., 
Vol 27, p 610. 
  18. Quoted from book by V. S. Golubovich, "Marshal R. Ya. 
Malinovskiy," Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1984, p 208. 
  19. Quoted from book by Ye. Moshkin, "Voyennyye otkliki" 
[War 
Echoes], St. Petersburg, 1902, p 85. 
  20. N. A. Antipenko, "Na glavnom napravlenii" [On the Main 
Axis], Moscow, Nauka, 1971, p 229. 
  21. A. M. Vasilevskiy, "Delo vsey zhizni" [A Lifelong Job], 
Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1974, p 398. 
<H5>  CHAPTER TWO - PERMANENT COMBAT READINESS OF SUBUNITS </H5>
  Permanent combat readiness of subunits consists 
of their capability of entering battle in an organized manner at 
any time and at prescribed time periods and performing assigned 
missions successfully. 
  "Boyevoy ustav 
Sukhoputnykh voysk" [Ground Troops Field Manual], Part II 
<H3>  1. From the History of the Origin and Development of the 
Principle of Combat Readiness </H3>
  Each time I have occasion to speak and read about combat 
readiness, there invariably appears before me the indelible 
picture of 22 June 1941, which I witnessed with my own eyes. The 
tornado of artillery fire which suddenly came down on the 
barracks at dawn, the fire which soon blazed up, Red Army men 
rushing about in disarray, the incoherent bustle, the orderly's 
belated command "Combat alert!" and the confusion and 
helplessness of commanders who were trying to get their bearings 
in the situation, establish communications with the senior 
commander, receive at least some kind of instructions and take 
control into their own hands--all this was perceived as a 
nightmarish dream. I finally came to my senses only when I heard 
the desperate appeal for help of a comrade who had been caught 
beneath a heap of rubble. That was how the Great Patriotic War 
began for me. 
  Even now, after 50 years have elapsed since that time, I do 
not cease to ask myself: "How could this have happened?" For on 
the evening before, on Sunday, we heard the cheerful song over 
the radio: "Should tomorrow war come, should tomorrow we march, 
be ready today for the march." The song not only summoned, but 
also inspired: "And we'll crush the enemy with little blood, 
with a powerful blow!" 
  And a week before that we were read an address of the Baltic 
Military District Military Council. "...Today as never before," 
it said, "we must be in full combat readiness. . . . Everyone 
must understand this firmly and clearly, since we must be ready 
to perform the combat mission at any minute..." Later I found 
this portentous document in the Ministry of Defense Central 
Archives.[.sup]1[/] 
  During the War, in the circle of other officers we often 
discussed events of 22 June and said: "No! After everything we 
have gone through, this must not be repeated, the lesson is too 
cruel and instructive." And in fact if we take our military 
literature of today, it is a rare book in which you will not 
find the call to "strengthen combat readiness." But each appeal, 
even the most serious one, loses acuteness from frequent use. 
That often happens with us even now... But about this later. Now 
I would like to say that the tragic events of 1941 might not 
have happened had we been respectful toward military history, 
had we known it, had we not been deaf to its lessons. The fact 
is, the Russo-Japanese War (which, as we know, also began 
suddenly) was a great warning for us. History is a great, wise 
teacher. The past, even the very distant past, teaches a great 
deal. This is why I decided to begin my account about combat 
readiness with history. 
  Although the term "combat readiness" became current and 
began 
to be regarded as one of the principles of military art 
relatively recently, from time immemorial military leaders have 
observed its requirements and attempted to keep the Army in such 
a state that it was capable of going on the march and defeating 
or repelling the enemy. It was ancient Roman historian Onasander 
who wrote about this. In the work "Manual for Military Leaders" 
he recommended, in organizing the march, to keep the foe 
continuously in view even if he is far away, and during a day 
rest halt set up a reinforced camp, post a perimeter guard and 
reinforce it for the night.[.sup]2[/] Vegetius also wrote 
about the importance of soldiers constantly maintaining 
vigilance. In the book "A Brief Exposition of Military Affairs" 
he noted that, caught unawares, even the most tried and tested 
fighting men can be defeated.[.sup]3[/] 
  Thus, the question of ensuring troop combat readiness in one 
form or another ran through military treatises without fail 
already at the dawn of the origin of military art. Similar 
thoughts also occurred in early Old Russian military works. In 
undertaking a march, be careful, directed Vladimir Monomakh in 
his "Poucheniya" [Precepts], "detail the guard yourself . . . be 
in no haste to put down your weapon..." 
  During the third campaign and the taking of Kazan (1552), 
Ivan the Terrible gave great attention to stopping surprise 
enemy sallies and he concerned himself with organizing security 
and reconnaissance. Experience gained in combat expeditions was 
reflected in the "Ustav pogranichnoy (storozhevoy, stanichnoy i 
dozornoy) sluzhby" [Manual of Border (Sentry, Stanitsa and 
Patrol) Duty] published in 1571, and subsequently also in the 
first Russian Army manual published in 1621, the "Ustav ratnykh, 
pushechnykh i drugikh del, kasayushchikhsya do voyennoy nauki, 
sostoyashchikh v 663 ukazakh i statyakh" [Manual of Military, 
Gunnery and Other Affairs Concerning Military Science, 
Consisting of 663 Edicts and Articles]. It noted that the Army 
must prepare for war in advance. "At the present time it has 
become clear that war and hostility are not unexpected and soon 
will begin moving and will take place." Therefore it is 
necessary "to prepare to meet it so we are ready and armed 100 
days before a meeting engagement."[.sup]4[/] The manual gave 
recommendations on how to act "should there be an alert day or 
night, where which people should be and to where which people 
should ride or run, and who should do what."[.sup]5[/] 
  Combat operations took on a more decisive character with the 
appearance of firearms. This heightened demands for maintaining 
combat readiness. Certain new elements appeared in its content. 
More attention began to be given to supporting the troops with 
supplies and to upkeep of weapons and gear. 
  To Peter the Great belongs the astute thought that "one 
always must know the enemy" and what "he can do," "in order that 
in all matters he can be sought out and overturned." The "Ustav 
voinskiy" [Military Regulations] of Peter I noted: "Firmly 
reconnoiter the enemy," "establish security," and "assume battle 
order (combat formation) on time."[.sup]6[/] These precepts 
of Peter I came from life suffering itself. The Russian Army was 
taught a cruel lesson at the beginning of the Northern War 
(1700-1721). By that time Peter had not yet managed to establish 
a combat-effective army which could oppose a strong enemy--the 
Swedish Army headed by skillful field general Carl XII. The 
Swedes managed to rout the Russians in the Battle of Narva. But 
Peter managed to learn an instructive lesson from this 
defeat--he took to creating a regular army and outfitting and 
training it with even greater energy. In assessing these events, 
Marx wrote: "Narva was the first serious defeat for a rising 
nation whose resolute spirit learned to win even from 
defeats."[.sup]7[/] 
  Peter began increasing the Army's combat effectiveness 
beginning with the most important thing--establishing 
centralized command and control. A unified manpower acquisition 
system was established and standard arms and gear of the Army as 
well as a unified training system distinguished by simplicity 
and practicality were introduced. Peter demanded intelligent 
actions of the soldiers and that they learn "how to act in 
battle."[.sup]8[/] Ten years had not gone by since the battle 
of Narva when the Russian Army acquired the capability not only 
of battling the Swedes "as equals," but also of defeating them. 
  The regular army's rearming had been completed by the Battle 
of Poltava: The infantry received smoothbore shoulder arms with 
bayonets, smallswords, broadswords, and hand grenades; the 
dragoons received carbines, pistols and palache sabers; the 
artillery was divided into siege, fortress, field and 
regimental. Regiments' combat proficiency improved 
radically.[.sup]9[/] The brilliant victory at Poltava was the 
result. In revealing the enormous scale of Peter's military 
reforms, M. V. Lomonosov remarked that he was able "to recruit 
many great regiments--infantry and cavalry, supply all with 
clothing, salary, weapons and other military gear, teach them a 
new manual of arms, start up field and siege artillery according 
to the rules, for which a great deal of knowledge of geometry, 
mechanics and chemistry is required, and besides all else have 
commanders skilled in everything."[.sup]10[/] He made 
approving comments about establishment of a regular army and 
about Peter's decision to have regiments in readiness to protect 
the country against attack. 
  The fact that the most advanced form of troop 
training--exercises and maneuvers--began to be employed under 
Peter was of great importance for improving the Army's combat 
readiness. They were considered by him "as a precursor of 
things."[.sup]11[/] Exercises and maneuvers included field 
battles, assaults on fortified camps and fortresses, and so on. 
Such maneuvers take their origin from the Semenovskoye 
(1690-1693) and Kozhukhov (1694) campaigns.[.sup]12[/] 
  Traditions laid down by Peter with respect to maintaining 
Army combat readiness and demands not to lag behind the enemy in 
proficiency and aggressiveness, to anticipate his tactical ruses 
and to "set a trap" for the enemy himself were continued and 
developed by Russian military leaders P. S. Saltykov and P. A. 
Rumyantsev. In the Seven Years' War (1756-1763) the Russian Army 
surpassed the Prussian Army in the level of training and combat 
proficiency, as attested by its brilliant victories in the 
battle at Gross-Jagersdorf and Kunersdorf, in the taking 
of 
the Kohlberg Fortress and in the taking of Berlin. 
  The introduction to troop training practice of summer 
encampments for 1-3 months a year at Rumyantsev's suggestion 
following the Seven Years' War was of great importance for 
keeping the Russian Army in a state of appropriate combat 
readiness. Major exercises involving infantry, cavalry and 
artillery regiments were held during such summer encampments. 
  It was to A. V. Suvorov's credit with respect to upgrading 
Army combat readiness that he subordinated essentially the 
entire troop training system to attaining this goal. The field 
general invariably adhered to the motto: "Be as in war even in 
peacetime." He developed and practiced an effective system for 
training and educating soldiers based not on excessive drills 
and mechanical execution of commands, but on each soldier's 
understanding of his own maneuver. Suvorov instilled a feeling 
of patriotic pride, mutual assistance, courage and initiative in 
soldiers. Maneuvers (marches) conducted by Suvorov--Crimean, 
Tulchin and others--were distinguished by great instructiveness. 
  In studying combat training methods employed by Suvorov, the 
Frenchman Dubocage noted that there could be no chance 
happenings, no obstacles for his army. Such an army cannot help 
but win. Suvorov's methods were such that even "the last soldier 
who ended up in the sphere of his influence came to know combat 
matters better both practically and theoretically than is now 
known in any European army. . . . There was nothing unexpected 
in battle for his soldier, since he experienced the most 
difficult of combat impressions in peacetime. For him there 
could be nothing incomprehensible in what occurred in battle. . 
. . If a person is so seasoned that it is impossible to surprise 
him with anything and if he knows what he is doing in his modest 
sphere, he cannot be defeated, he cannot help but 
win."[.sup]13[/] 
  M. I. Kutuzov showed steadfast concern for keeping Russian 
Army combat readiness at the appropriate level. In battles he 
demanded that commanders organize and conduct effective 
reconnaissance "so as to uncover the French plans in time" and 
constantly know the status, combat effectiveness, state of 
supply, and state of morale of their army. A number of measures 
aimed at improving combat readiness were carried out in the 
Russian Army based on experience of the Patriotic War of 
1812-1814, but many innovations were of a dual nature. The 
"Stroyevoy ustav (rotnoye, batalonnoye i polkovoye ucheniya)" 
[Drill Regulations (Company, Battalion and Regimental 
Exercises)] published in the first quarter of the 19th century 
combined principles of new column tactics with linear tactics. 
Instructions and manuals developed directly in the troops were 
more progressive in nature. Among them, for example, were 
"Pravila rassypnogo stroya" [Rules of Extended Order] and 
"Nastavleniye g.g. pekhotnym ofitseram v den srazheniya 
[Instructions for Infantry Officers on the Day of 
Battle].[.sup]14[/] 
  But it often happened that the lively, creative thought of 
foremost military figures was suppressed by lack of talent and 
conventionalism. Slavery to routine, parade-ground drills and 
blind emulation of the Prussian military school prevailed in 
training methods despite combat experience. Any initiative of 
subordinates was suppressed and cane discipline was implanted. 
Basic attention in training was given to drill training. 
Maneuvers essentially reduced to tactical drill problems. All 
this had a pernicious effect on Russian Army combat 
effectiveness and delayed its development for a long time. The 
Russian Army also lagged behind European armies in technical 
outfitting. The defeat in the Crimean War (1853-1856) resulted 
from this.[.sup]15[/] The heroism of soldiers could not 
compensate for backwardness of military training and the 
"rottenness and impotence of a Russia based on 
serfdom."[.sup]16[/] 
  Russia's defeat in the Crimean War generated criticism of 
Nikolay's military system. Progressive figures called for a 
decisive revision of the existing military structure and this 
had an effect. The military reforms of 1864-1877 in Russia 
carried out under the direction of Military Minister D. A. 
Milyutin completed the process of converting a feudal army into 
a bourgeois type of army. The Army became a mass army with the 
introduction of universal military obligation in 1874. Field 
manuals--the "Ustav o polevoy sluzhbe" [Field Service 
Regulations] (1858, 1879, 1881)--were republished based on 
combat experience gained in the Crimean War and with 
consideration of the troops' new material base (rifled weapons 
had been adopted). They consolidated new forms and methods of 
fighting and methods of combat training. 
  I. V. Gurko and M. I. Dragomirov played a major role in 
reviving traditions of Peter and Suvorov in the Army. The basis 
of Dragomirov's views on questions of combat training was the 
assertion that the Army's principal strength lay in the 
individual and his preparedness for battle, since the readiness 
both of small subunits as well as of the Army as a whole depends 
on the training of every soldier. His "Uchebnik taktiki" 
[Textbook of Tactics] noted that the main goal of education is 
to instill in the soldier a sense of duty taken to 
self-sacrifice and to instill in him fearlessness, 
resourcefulness and mutual assistance. Speaking of training, he 
emphasized that it was necessary to teach the soldier to 
skillfully master weapons, adroitly overcome obstacles 
encountered on the terrain, and coordinate his movements with 
comrades' actions. 
  Beginning with the latter half of the 19th century annual 
district maneuvers, so-called "imperial" maneuvers, began to be 
held in the Russian Army in which a large number of troops took 
part (Kursk maneuvers of 1902). The importance of ensuring the 
Army's high combat readiness in wars of the machine period rose 
especially sharply, dictated by the intensive development of 
means of warfare and major changes in the nature and methods of 
combat operations--their increased scale and spatial scope and 
the increased role of the factor of surprise. The Russian Army 
combat readiness system was given a serious test during the 
Russo-Japanese War (1904-1905), where major miscalculations in 
command and control came to light. Underestimation of the enemy 
and "boasts of easy victory" had their effect. Because of poor 
intelligence the Russian command did not manage to promptly 
identify the moment of the Japanese attack. Poor logistic 
support had an especially negative effect on the Army's combat 
effectiveness. The troops constantly felt a most acute shortage 
of shells and cartridges. Russo-Japanese War experience played 
no small role in upgrading the combat readiness system. The war 
provided very abundant food for thought for military 
researchers. There were many Russian military theorists who 
wrote about the importance of profound comprehension of the 
lessons learned, but after the war no cardinal changes occurred 
in Russian Army training or its combat readiness system. The 
combat experience was far from completely reflected in field 
manuals and field service regulations republished in the period 
from 1906 through 1914. Many conditionalities and deviations 
from requirements of combat practice continued to be allowed in 
exercises, and stereotype and routine continued to predominate. 
Large maneuvers reduced basically to movements. Interworking and 
combat and logistic support were poorly rehearsed in them, and a 
contemptuous attitude was shown toward defense. 
  Nevertheless, many armies learned one important lesson with 
respect to troop combat readiness from Russo-Japanese War 
experience before the beginning of World War I. General staffs 
began to strive to increase the manning of formations and units, 
especially with command personnel, back in peacetime. The task 
was to ensure that border formations could enter battle without 
additional mobilization. As a result, prior to World War I the 
division personnel strength level was brought to the following 
indicators: Up to 100 percent officers, around 70 percent NCO's 
and up to 50 percent rank-and-file in the German Army; up to 
76.4 percent officers, 54.5 percent NCO's and 43.6 percent 
rank-and-file in the French Army; and up to 85 percent officers, 
42 percent NCO's and 48 percent rank-and-file in the Russian 
Army.[.sup]17[/] 
  Nevertheless, this was only a half-measure. Essentially all 
armies had many major shortcomings in the important thing, 
specifically in combat proficiency. Provisions of field manuals 
and field service regulations proved obsolete. They did not meet 
requirements of war. In the work "Voprosy sovremennoy strategii" 
[Questions of Modern Strategy] M. N. Tukhachevskiy wrote: "Not 
one army was guided by those military statutes and regulations 
with which it entered the war in 1914. Each year armies had to 
change their regulations and create new instructions, and they 
had to reteach both the different combat arms and the staffs 
these new instructions. Each year war plans also underwent 
modification."[.sup]18[/] 
  The battlefield employment of large masses of artillery and 
new weapons--choking gases, tanks, aircraft, flamethrowers and 
so on--predetermined the special importance of the "technical 
factor" in the combat readiness system--the personnel's 
knowledge of their own and enemy weapons and the ability to 
employ them in battle and fight new enemy weapons. It so 
happened that when a particular side used previously unknown 
kinds of weapons for the first time in battle, this usually 
generated a psychological shock in personnel or even led to the 
appearance of mass panic. As a result combat operations were 
paralyzed for a more or less lengthy time. 
  The Battle of Ypres (1915) was typical in this respect. 
Violating an international agreement, the Germans made a 
chemical attack on British troops. To support a breakthrough of 
the defense, they undertook a gas-cylinder attack in which 180 
tons of chlorine were used simultaneously from 6,000 cylinders 
set up across a 10 km front. Such an attack proved to be a total 
surprise for the British and their actions in this sector were 
halted. The battlefield ended up lifeless. The Germans advanced 
into the depth of the defense without a single 
shot.[.sup]19[/] And if this battle did not substantially 
affect the subsequent course of military events, it was only 
because the German command was unprepared to exploit results of 
the new weapon's employment. 
  It should be said that surprise employment of new weapons 
also occurred in subsequent operations of World War I. Revenge, 
as it were, by the British on the Germans followed soon after 
the Battle of Ypres. In the Battle on the River Somme (1916) 
they employed a very effective weapon, tanks. Although at that 
time tank combat performance characteristics were poor (they had 
a speed only of 3 km/hr), their appearance on the battlefield 
caused panic among the Germans. According to German soldier 
eyewitnesses, "everyone stood stricken as if having lost the 
capability of moving. The enormous monsters approached us 
slowly, clanking, limping and rocking, but all the time they 
advanced. Nothing held them up. Someone in the first line of 
trenches said that the devil had appeared, and this word spread 
through the trenches with enormous speed."[.sup]20[/] As a 
result the British achieved that success in a day of battle 
which they had been unable to achieve in 4-5 days since the 
operation began. 
  World War I experience greatly influenced further 
improvement 
of the armies' combat readiness system. It became obvious that 
troops had to be prepared purposefully for lengthy, strenuous 
combat operations long before the beginning of war. Not only did 
appropriate manning of formations and units with personnel have 
to be ensured, but their personal gear and equipment, good 
technical outfitting, armament, and combat cohesiveness had to 
be provided for and necessary stockpiles created in good time. 
Following World War I military theorists and practitioners in 
many armies drew an important conclusion: Maintaining armies at 
the proper level of combat readiness above all necessitated 
careful study of the initial period of war and preparation of 
troops for the first battles, in which they certainly would 
encounter many surprises. Many authors wrote that the beginning 
of war always is an enormous psychological shock for troops; 
therefore it is important to prepare personnel for overcoming 
difficulties and to master new tactics in advance. 
  A. I. Yegorov correctly foresaw the nature of the initial 
period of the future war. In 1933 he wrote: "Using methods of 
covert mobilization, the warring side will strive to assemble 
those forces and assets as early and as quickly as possible with 
whose help it is possible to invade enemy territory and disrupt 
mobilization in border areas and concentration of the army of 
one's enemy. . . . By operations from the air and the landing of 
assault parties, enemy aircraft can actively hamper the course 
of transport movements at a depth of 600-800 km (the 
Moscow-Kharkov meridian)..."[.sup]21[/] This was a truly 
prophetic warning which, however, was left without proper 
attention. M. N. Tukhachevskiy, B. M. Shaposhnikov, G. S. 
Isserson, A. M. Zayonchkovskiy, V. A. Melikov, S. N. 
Krasilnikov, Ye. A. Shilovskiy, M. R. Galaktionov and others 
made no small contribution to developing questions of the 
initial period of war. 
  Among Western European military theorists Friedrich von 
Bernhardi, von Moltke Jr., de Grandmaison and F. Foch paid great 
attention to researching the first operations of war. Thus, Foch 
wrote: "Surprise strategic deployments, swift marches and 
lightninglike offensives with which the first clashes of 
European wars break out like thunderclaps obligate armies to 
devote careful attention to their study."[.sup]22[/] 
  V. I. Lenin laid down the methodological foundations on 
whose 
basis the theory and practice of ensuring Red Army combat 
readiness developed. He constantly emphasized that "we must keep 
our Red Army in full combat readiness no matter what and 
reinforce its combat effectiveness."[.sup]23[/] "We will 
commit a terrible crime against the Revolution," he noted, "if 
we forget this."[.sup]24[/] Lenin's works and his directives 
on military questions during the Civil War gave paramount 
attention to such factors ensuring Army combat readiness as 
maintaining a high revolutionary vigilance in Red Army men, Red 
Navy men and commanders, knowledge of the enemy, Army and Navy 
technical outfitting, training of military cadres, creation of a 
unified command element for all Red Army detachments, raising 
the personnel's morale, and strengthening military discipline. 
Lenin warned that it was necessary to be always on guard. He 
wrote: "To let something slip by or to lose one's head means to 
lose everything."[.sup]25[/] 
  In the interwar period much was done in our Army to improve 
troop combat effectiveness. This was caused by the complication 
of the international situation and by military provocations 
repeatedly being undertaken by our enemies on the USSR's 
borders. Taking into account the growing threat of military 
attack, the Soviet government devoted constant attention to 
strengthening the Armed Forces' combat power, above all to their 
technical outfitting, and it must be said that much was 
achieved. The adoption in 1939 of the new Law on Universal 
Military Obligation, which established a unified system for Army 
and Navy manpower acquisition, was of great importance for 
improving Army combat readiness. Much attention was given to 
improving the combat and political training of troops. 
  Beginning in the 1930's it was the practice to hold major 
opposed-forces military maneuvers. Thus, maneuvers were held in 
the Ukrainian Military District in 1931, test exercises in the 
Volga area during 1932-1933, and large-scale maneuvers in the 
Kiev Special Military District in 1935 in which questions of the 
deep operation and battle were rehearsed. Airborne troops took 
part in them for the first time. In all, more than 1,000 tanks 
were in action here. Subsequently more than 1,300 tanks, 632 
aircraft, and 2,276 various vehicles took part in a Belorussian 
Military District exercise.[.sup]26[/] 
  Nevertheless, the combat readiness system of Red Army troops 
was far from perfect in prewar times. The very first relatively 
small-scale military conflicts indicated that combat proficiency 
of formations and units did not meet the demands of war. Thus, 
despite our troops' overwhelming numerical superiority during 
the battles at Lake Khasan and the participation of tanks and 
aircraft in them, losses proved unjustifiably high (408 killed 
and 2,807 wounded).[.sup]27[/] The Soviet-Finnish War taught 
us an especially severe lesson with respect to combat readiness 
and combat effectiveness of troops. It was planned to defeat the 
enemy in 2-3 weeks, but in fact this required three and one-half 
months. The result was 289,500 killed, wounded or frostbitten. 
Finland lost 23,000 killed and 43,000 wounded in this war, i.e., 
several times less.[.sup]28[/] 
  The Soviet military leadership drew many useful conclusions 
from the experience of this war--decisive steps were taken to 
improve troop field proficiency, technical outfitting, personal 
gear and equipment and armament. And vigorous actions by 
People's Commissar of Defense S. K. Timoshenko must be given 
their due. Nevertheless, the main task of teaching personnel to 
fight in a modern way failed to be fully accomplished in the 
prewar period. The reason for this was that ideas which existed 
at that time on the nature of combined arms battle were far from 
the reality which troops encountered at the very beginning of 
the Great Patriotic War. A high price had to be paid for the 
fact that methods of repelling a surprise enemy invasion had not 
been mastered in peacetime. 
  The Great Patriotic War began in a completely different 
operational-strategic situation than that being created in 
prewar exercises and maneuvers. Tactics employed by the Germans 
of psychological attacks, deep tank spearheads, creation of 
large and small "pockets," and a drop of airborne assault forces 
and sabotage teams in our rear proved unexpected for the troops. 
The terrible events of those years again and again give a 
reminder of the immutable truth that war punishes severely for 
peacetime blunders in questions of combat readiness. One of the 
major mistakes in the Red Army combat readiness system in prewar 
years was that personnel were oriented toward easy conditions, 
toward winning victory "with little blood, with a powerful 
blow," and toward conducting combat operations on enemy 
territory. The defense was underestimated and the withdrawal and 
combat in encirclement were not studied, but it was specifically 
with difficult defensive battles, with a withdrawal, and with 
combat in encirclement that our troops' combat operations began, 
for which they were not ready. 
  The imperfection of the combat readiness system was one of 
the main preconditions for defeat of many armies in local wars 
as well. Their lack of readiness to repel the enemy's first 
surprise attack told. The multistep system that was used for 
placing formations in a combat-ready status in a period of 
threat and with the beginning of military operations, lengthy 
collection of situation data, slow and usually manual processing 
of that data, sluggishness in decisionmaking, and giving units 
and weapons imprecise and often belated or even contradictory 
instructions led to where the aggressor succeeded in catching 
troops unawares, seizing the initiative, imposing his will and 
dictating his conditions. 
  Now it has become obvious that many armies do not manage to 
restructure their combat readiness system and troop training in 
accordance with demands of scientific-technical progress. The 
appearance of new weapons catches unawares those who are 
unconcerned with timely modernization not only of their means of 
warfare, but also of tactics. Here are just a few examples from 
the experience of local wars. 
  The Korean War (1950-1953) broke out just five years after 
World War II, but even in this short time interval substantial 
changes occurred in technical outfitting of the armies of 
developed states. For example, for the first time here the U.S. 
Army used jet aviation, guided robot bombs, a massive amount of 
napalm, certain new types of antitank and antipersonnel mines, 
and new parachutes and devices for dropping guns, light prime 
movers, mortars and other combat equipment to the 
ground.[.sup]29[/] The Americans used new weapons in the 
Vietnam War (1964-1975) on an even wider scale. Guided 
projectiles, bombs and missiles; a massive number of combat 
helicopters; fuel-air explosives; and means of meteorological 
and geophysical warfare were used here for the first time. 
  The battlefield appearance of new, more effective weapons 
lent impetus to the upgrading of field training and the system 
of troop combat readiness. Tactics of airmobile operations 
originated in the Vietnam War, which marked the beginning of 
development of the modern U.S. Army operational-tactical 
"air-land operation (battle)" concept. The experience of this 
war showed that an indispensable element of troop field 
proficiency should be their ability to fight enemy airmobile 
troops, tactical airborne assault forces and raiding and 
reconnaissance parties and take measures for protection against 
mass destruction weapons and precision weapons. 
  Military operations in the Near East (1967, 1973, 1982) and 
the Anglo-Argentine military conflict (1982) dictated further 
development of methods of troop combat operations, and 
particularly lent impetus to the development of tactics of the 
long-range firefight, which began to be characterized by the 
sides' attempt to conduct a firefight beginning from maximum 
ranges. Arab combat operations against the Israelis developed 
into opposition of artillery against artillery, ATGM's against 
tanks, and tanks against tanks. Under such conditions the 
personnel's high weapon handling skill, their ability to hit the 
target with the first round, launch or pass, and execution of a 
flexible maneuver of fire became determining in troop field 
training. 
  Thus, in order to continuously upgrade the troop combat 
readiness system it is necessary to constantly keep up with the 
development of military affairs, the appearance of new weapons 
and changes in the probable enemy's operating tactics. There is 
nothing more pernicious than acting in the old way. As the heart 
of troop combat readiness, development of their tactical 
proficiency must not fail to keep in step with technical 
innovations. 
<H3>  2. Problems Connected With Upgrading Troop Combat Readiness 
at the Present Stage </H3>
  Under present conditions the significance of the principle 
of 
troop combat readiness has grown as never before. It has become 
the epicenter of all research conducted in military art. 
Everything now being done in questions of improving the table of 
organization structure of formations and units, their technical 
outfitting, the command and control system, combat proficiency, 
combat, technical and logistic support, strengthening of the 
personnel's political attitude and morale, and discipline and 
orderliness--All this in the final account is aimed at preparing 
the troops for organized commitment to battle in case of war and 
at their ability to repel an enemy attack and defeat him. Just 
what problems are arising now in upgrading the combat readiness 
system and what are the ways of solving them? 
  Correct, profound foresight of the nature of a future war 
for 
which it is necessary to prepare is the very first precondition 
for successful accomplishment of tasks of improving troop combat 
readiness. Exclusive responsibility for this rests with military 
theory. It is what must develop and determine the right 
reference points in combat training: What and how should the 
troops be taught so they are ready for any ordeals, have good 
mastery of weapons and the tactics of modern battle, know the 
probable enemy and his strong and weak sides, and be able to 
combat the latest weapons and protect themselves against them? 
  Developing scenarios of future battles is one of the most 
difficult tasks of military art. History attests to the fact 
that military theorists and practitioners far from always 
managed to penetrate the veil of time and display profound 
insight with respect to developing advisable methods of combat 
operations. It often happened that an army was prepared 
essentially not for a future war, but for a past war and 
mastered antiquated, obsolete methods of combat operations. In 
other cases military theory overestimated or, conversely, 
underestimated the experience of small wars and drew incorrect, 
one-sided conclusions from it regarding combat readiness. The 
influence of new weapons on tactics was not always taken fully 
and comprehensively into account and biases were allowed in 
assessments of the enemy's actual combat capabilities and 
methods of his probable operations with the initiation and 
conduct of war. 
  In our time forecasting the conditions and nature of a 
future 
war has become unbelievably complicated above all because the 
upgrading and replacement of means of warfare and the troops' 
technical outfitting is occurring at unprecedentedly rapid 
rates, and this introduces radical changes to battle tactics. It 
is common knowledge that under present conditions 3-4 
generations of equipment change in the life of one human 
generation.[.sup]30[/] Based on this, as shown by the 
experience of local wars, the attacking side's massive 
introduction of the latest systems of weapons and combat 
equipment previously unknown to the enemy as well as the use of 
unexpected tactics have become characteristic of combat 
operations in first operations. 
  But the most important distinction is that there is the 
danger of employment of nuclear weapons as well as of diverse 
systems of precision weapons (reconnaissance-strike complexes, 
reconnaissance-fire complexes) which approximate nuclear 
weapons. Just the very fact of existence of these exceptionally 
effective kinds of weapons forces troops to be in constant 
readiness for operations when these weapons are employed and to 
take appropriate measures of protection. 
  Special demands on the troop combat readiness system at the 
present stage also stem from the circumstance that there has 
been a sharp increase in the significance of the factor of 
surprise, which largely predetermines not only the course and 
outcome of first operations, but also of the entire military 
campaign. The experience of local wars has shown clearly that 
its pernicious consequences became irreversible in those armies 
which did not take advance measures to prevent surprise. In this 
connection one important task of military theory is to 
comprehensively research and come up with recommendations on 
upgrading the combat readiness system so an aggressor cannot 
catch troops unawares and unprepared and so they can repel an 
enemy invasion in any (even the most difficult) situation, 
deliver a retaliatory attack against him and successfully 
execute assigned combat missions. 
  The combat readiness system cannot form abstractly, without 
consideration of specific conditions of the troops' entry into 
war. Research has shown that the first days of war and the first 
battles are the most difficult, critical moments for them. It is 
initial operations that are the touchstone on which the vitality 
of the prewar combat readiness system, the provisions of 
regulations developed in peacetime, the normative indicators of 
troop combat proficiency, the command and control system, the 
personnel's morale and fighting qualities, and so on are tested. 
  Hence the principal direction of peacetime combat training 
is 
to study conditions of operations of the initial period of war, 
which are characterized by special complexity and intensity; 
difficult predictability of development of combat events; 
abrupt, swift changes in the situation, in the troops' situation 
and status, and in the sides' force ratio; and the possibility 
of the unexpected appearance of critical situations, disruption 
of command and control, and disorganization of the work of the 
rear and lines of communication. 
  It is important to train personnel in good time so they have 
a clear picture of what they will encounter in actual battle and 
what kind of enemy they will come up against. They must be 
taught the ability to counter enemy tactics with their own more 
advanced tactics, employ a more skillful maneuver, and strive 
for a turning point in the situation and seizure of the 
initiative. For this it is necessary that every officer, NCO and 
private know his duties precisely and perform them without fuss 
in a combat alert so that in the terrible hour of ordeals 
equipment and weapons do not let him down and instruments, 
hardware and mechanisms operate faultlessly. 
  Battle sternly tests troops for combat maturity, ideological 
conditioning, staunchness, courage and bravery and punishes 
mercilessly for blunders. Readiness for military ordeals must be 
comprehensive. The modern soldier has to know and be capable of 
a great deal in order to successfully fight a strong, 
technically well outfitted enemy. He must surpass the enemy in 
tactical proficiency, psychological stability, the ability to 
handle weapons, and physical endurance. Special demands are 
placed on military proficiency and the organizing and volitional 
qualities of officers, their ability to flexibly lead troops, 
thoroughly foresee, quickly grasp and put into practice new 
methods of operations, clear the way for subordinates' creative 
undertakings and encourage their initiative. 
  The state of combat readiness is very dynamic. There can be 
no indifference, negligence or self-complacency in such a major, 
important matter. Normative indicators of combat proficiency are 
growing and becoming more complicated all the time. They are 
different today than they were yesterday, and tomorrow they 
inevitably will be different than today. Therefore the 
responsibility for the state of combat readiness is constantly 
increasing. 
  Let us pose the question: Are we doing everything in the 
Army 
now as demanded by conditions of modern war from the standpoint 
of adjusting the effectiveness of combat training so that it is 
possible to say with all confidence that the mistakes of 1941 
will not be repeated? Judging from external manifestations, the 
call to strengthen combat readiness and to teach what is 
necessary in war is not leaving the pages of the military press 
and is constantly and persistently being repeated here, there 
and everywhere. 
  But deep-seated processes also indicate something else: 
Concern is growing among the officers for the state of affairs 
in troop combat readiness. People are arguing in a concerned 
way, thinking, and seeking an answer to questions which life 
poses for them. Among the problems relating to troop combat 
proficiency, greatest attention is drawn by the following: Why 
have our tactics, which absorbed the rich experience of the 
past, which stood up under a severe test on the battlefields, 
and which proved their indisputable superiority over tactics of 
leading world armies in years of the Civil War and Great 
Patriotic War, lately begun to fall behind the demands of life, 
thus having a negative effect on troop combat readiness? Why 
have stereotype and conservatism penetrated deeply into combat 
training? Why have formalism and conventionalism with their 
inherent maximum programmed nature of problems and exercises, 
the authoritarian assessments and judgements in scientific 
research, and the abstract schemes and hard-and-fast postulates 
been implanted for a long time instead of bold, innovative 
searches? 
  Pertinent, vital, painful questions are posed. Without 
having 
answered them, without having delved into the reasons which 
dictated the dominant influence in the troop training system of 
dogmatic blinders which shackle officers' creative thinking and 
retard the perestroyka process, it is impossible to accomplish 
the cardinal task of achieving a radical turning point in 
improving troop combat training. 
  It should be said that negative phenomena in combat training 
have been accumulating for us for years and even decades; as a 
result not one, but a multitude of different objective and 
subjective reasons have been concentrated which predetermined 
the stagnation in troop training and education. Above all we 
will note that the very difficult process of developing military 
affairs cannot be understood and explained correctly if it is 
considered by itself, outside of contact with the life of 
society. Military organizational development always has been and 
is now under the determining influence of a system of 
sociopolitical and socioeconomic factors and acts as a unique 
reflection of their development level. The ailments of society 
in years of stagnation could not help but affect the state of 
the Armed Forces. This was manifested in particular in the fact 
that a firm belief was implanted in people's social awareness, 
including among servicemen, that our advance on all fronts was 
going according to "laws of accelerated development." This 
inspired confidence that we were steadily on the ascent and the 
thought did not arise about the possibility of any kind of lag. 
  The thesis that "advantages of the system of socialism also 
ensure advantages of its military organization"[.sup]31[/] 
was interpreted straightforwardly. In being guided by this 
thesis, the attention of military cadres was not always directed 
to the fact that the social system in itself merely creates 
objective preconditions for successful accomplishment of tasks 
and that it can in no way insure the Army against mistakes and 
lag. In this connection it is impossible not to reproach our 
military philosophers, whose sacred duty is to arm officers with 
correct methodological lines conforming to the spirit of the 
time and to act as pace-setters in an uncompromising struggle 
against manifestations of inertness, cliches, and routine in 
military affairs. Unfortunately, our military-philosophical 
thought did not withstand the "euphoria of general successes" in 
the stagnant times and did not perceive in due course the growth 
of crisis phenomena in combat training during the 1960's and 
1970's. 
  It is necessary to speak about this now because without the 
involvement of social sciences, without activation of the 
ideological-theoretical activity of military scientists, 
philosophers, sociologists, psychologists and economists, and 
without appropriate scientific and philosophical comprehension 
of the processes occurring in the Army, it is impossible to 
achieve a fundamental perestroyka of military science in 
accordance with new political thinking, a qualitative turning 
point in improvement of troop combat training, and the revival 
of tactics as a genuine art of conducting modern battle. But 
this by no means relieves the combined arms generals and 
officers of responsibility for the state of affairs in the 
troops. 
  The deep roots of the lag in the system of troop training 
and 
education must be sought first and foremost in routine tactical 
thinking, in administrative-pressure methods and voluntaristic 
methods of directing combat training, and in the dominant 
influence of ostentation, subjectivism and parochialism in the 
awareness of a certain portion of military cadres. 
  Speaking of reasons for a temporary suspension in questions 
of tactics, some authors are inclined to believe that this 
occurred to a certain extent through the fault of certain 
military leaders who came to prominence during the Great 
Patriotic War. These authors assume that their opinion, based on 
victorious combat experience, in the final account turned into a 
kind of pattern, into a stereotype.[.sup]32[/] Without a 
doubt, thoughtless fetishism of front experience and 
mechanically following it under new, altered conditions could 
not help but negatively affect the development of tactics, of 
military art as a whole, and the troop training system. But it 
would appear that one of the main reasons for the penetration of 
dogmatism and stagnation into combat training nevertheless lies 
in something else, in the fact that the very abundant combat 
experience of Soviet troops, won at a dear cost in fierce 
battles, in its time ceased to be analyzed from contemporary 
positions, largely remained unused, "did not work" in a genuine 
way to form officers' creative thinking, and did not contribute 
to the development of new operational-tactical concepts. 
  It is necessary to return to the first postwar years to find 
the roots of such a superficial attitude toward Soviet troops' 
combat experience. Immediately following the end of the Great 
Patriotic War an aureole of "infallibility" of Soviet tactics 
began to be created in the era of Stalin's cult of personality. 
This in itself precluded any kind of criticism of mistakes and 
failures, which of course occurred in combat readiness of 
formations and units in prewar time and which had a negative 
effect on the course of troop combat operations with the 
beginning of war. It was essentially completely forgotten that 
our Army, "armed" with obsolete tactics, entered into opposition 
with a very strong and very experienced fascist German Army and 
it essentially had to learn to fight anew in the flame of 
battles. 
  Common sense suggested that our Army's failures in 1941 
should not have passed without leaving a trace for subsequent 
improvement of the troop combat readiness system. Without 
belittling the greatness of the Soviet Army, which despite 
everything managed to wrest victory from the hands of a powerful 
enemy, it was insistently necessary to soberly and impartially 
understand how and why failures were allowed in troop combat 
training on the eve of war, which dictated the enormous losses 
with the beginning of war and loss of strategic initiative. But 
the ancient wisdom that says whoever does not learn from past 
mistakes inevitably is forced to repeat them clearly did no 
good. Strictly speaking, that is just what happened with us 
after the war. Certain prewar concepts which had not proven 
themselves again prevailed. This concerned above all the 
assessment of the role and place of defense in tactical 
training. For a long time it simply was ignored and the most 
difficult mobile forms of defensive operations, the withdrawal, 
battle in encirclement, and repulse of the first and most crafty 
attack of the enemy with the beginning of war were not rehearsed. 
  And combat experience itself sometimes was received in a 
hypertrophied form and instead of benefit sometimes did a 
certain amount of harm to troop field training. Thus, the 
popularization in military history textbooks primarily of 
winning tactical episodes in which Soviet units achieved success 
led in the final account to where a superficial impression about 
battle formed in young officers and the opinion began to 
predominate that it seemingly could be won without particular 
effort and without thorough training. The archaic, stereotyped 
methodology of conducting tactical exercises (especially field 
fire exercises) and thoroughly staged procedures of playing out 
combat episodes, where the sides' actions were assigned and 
rehearsed in advance, contributed to this to no small extent. 
  The striving to present one's activity in a "rosy light" led 
to the predominance of "ostentatious" tactics, where no place 
remained for a display of creative quests either on the part of 
training instructors or on the part of trainees. For example, 
the conduct of a "march" offensive of troops with truly 
hyperbolic rates of advance (80-100 km or more per day) and 
nonstop negotiation of defensive lines and water obstacles (even 
when massive destruction, abatis, inundations, fires, and zones 
of radioactive and chemical contamination were created), which 
took root in the troops during the 1960's and 1970's, 
unquestionably contradicted front experience. 
  At one time G. K. Zhukov cautioned that without the most 
thorough, scrupulous training it was impossible to achieve 
success in an operation or battle.[.sup]33[/] Behind these 
words of the prominent military leader stand the very abundant 
experience of four years of war and hundreds of the most 
difficult battles, defeats and victories. But despite this, in 
tactical problems it became the rule to conduct ground 
reconnaissance hastily, often according to the same type of 
scheme, and to rehearse delivery of fire, interworking, and 
command and control hurriedly, even without having genuinely 
clarified the enemy's fire plan. Often questions of combat, 
technical and logistic support were omitted, seemingly as 
"unimportant." Engineer preparation of terrain was not conducted 
to the full extent. Political work was carried out formally. Of 
course, it would be unjust to reflect the development of tactics 
and the combat training in postwar time only from a negative 
side. Even in stagnant times tactics did not stand still. The 
troops had many highly active, creative generals and officers 
who worked long and selflessly, boldly broke settled canons, 
conducted problems and exercises in an interesting, instructive 
way, fought stereotype and conventionalism, and enriched 
military theory with new provisions. 
  Tactics received a sharp leap in its development with the 
arrival of nuclear missile weapons in the troops. Under 
conditions of genuinely revolutionary changes it was required to 
take a fundamentally new approach to developing forms and 
methods of combat operations, and Soviet military theory 
successfully coped with development of "nuclear tactics." 
Nevertheless, the "renewal boom" largely remained incomplete and 
indeterminate. Things also did not get by without certain costs. 
Under the influence of nuclear weapons, attention toward tactics 
was relaxed, especially toward developing methods of combat 
operations in the course of a conventional war. This also 
retarded its development. And what was important was that the 
era of rapid renewal of the means of warfare did not introduce a 
radical turning point to the psychology of officers' tactical 
thinking--the old tactical yardsticks largely were retained. 
Ground-air, "electronic" battle even with use of nuclear weapons 
was viewed largely in the light of experience of past wars. The 
stereotyped approaches which dominated for many years did not 
disappear into the past. The category of positional 
confrontation, linear forms of warfare, methodism and the 
measured nature of development of battle by no means became 
"museum-piece" procedures of tactics. All of them are in effect 
even to this day in a somewhat modernized form. This emphasizes 
once again that a conservative psychology in military affairs is 
extremely tenacious. 
  Even with the use of nuclear weapons relapses of obsolete 
methodology remained in the process of combat 
training--implantation of the cult of "normative tactics" 
continued. Personnel training took place in the channel of 
monotonous tactical orientation. Regulation, over-organization, 
and fear of deviating from the regulations continued to suppress 
living, innovative thought. Original decisions by trainees, use 
of procedures of stratagem, and misleading the enemy regarding 
one's true intentions were a great rarity. Stagnation had its 
effect even in times of scientific-technical progress. 
Creativeness in tactics did not prevail over banality, daring 
risk over passive caution, or innovation over slavery to routine. 
  Negative processes in combat training without question could 
not have grown to a critical point had democratic traditions not 
been lost at one time in the Soviet military press. It was the 
broad exchange of opinion of command and political personnel in 
pages of the journals VOYNA I REVOLYUTSIYA, VOYENNAYA MYSL, 
MEKHANIZATSIYA I MOTORIZATSIYA RKKA and VOYENNYY VESTNIK and in 
the newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA and discussions held regularly in 
the 1920's that largely contributed to a proper orientation of 
military cadres and their development of views on such 
fundamental questions of military organizational development as 
the development of fundamentals of military doctrine and a 
determination of ways of accomplishing military reform and 
improving combat readiness of the Army and directions of 
development of strategy, operational art and tactics. It was not 
by chance that Soviet military art made a sharp spurt in its 
development specifically in those years. Evidence of this was, 
for example, development of the theory of deep battle and 
operation. But the subsequent banishment of lively discussion 
and creative thinking and the actual removal of the broad Army 
public from polemic discussion of military problems in the pages 
of the press dealt an especially heavy blow to tactics, which 
well-known Soviet military leader A. I. Yegorov aptly called 
"all-Army creative work." 
  Experience showed that tactical thought is bold and sharp 
and 
is in full swing when nourished by the life-giving juices of 
troop practice and filled daily and hourly with new ideas coming 
from the troops, from the lower strata. It inevitably withers if 
it loses vital contact with its creative aktiv, officers of the 
tactical echelon. But despite this well-known thesis, at one 
time primary attention in upgrading tactics was focused on 
directive instructions. Of course, theoretical and practical 
science conferences were held in the troops and in higher 
military educational institutions, but even here a biased nature 
and intolerance for "different thinking" were manifested. They 
were held basically to substantiate provisions of regulating 
documents and the statements of authorities. A pluralism of 
opinions usually was blocked even in the press, and if bold, 
out-of-the-ordinary thoughts were expressed, as a rule they were 
not heeded. The fact that during the last four and one-half 
decades not one broad discussion of problems of tactics has been 
held in pages of the press eloquently attests to the damping of 
creative searches. 
  It stands to reason that one cannot help but take into 
account the specifics of military service. In military affairs 
it is extremely important to have unified views, unified 
approaches and norms for fundamental issues. Herein lies the 
great importance of doctrinal lines and the consideration of 
demands and principles of military art developed by 
centuries-old practice. Herein is manifested the organizing, 
disciplining role of regulations, manuals, instructions, orders 
and directives. But excessive centralization and the attempt to 
establish full "like-mindedness" in tactics are just as harmful 
as lack of a system. If everything is decided by direction from 
above, then the "lower strata" are left with nothing else other 
than to await instructions of higher commanders. There where the 
practice of awaiting "innovation with the stamp of approval of 
higher-ups" has been established, officers inevitably form a 
contemplative psychology, creative activeness dies out, and 
tactics, which is the bearer of everything foremost and new, in 
the final account turns into a preserve of inertness and lack of 
initiative. 
  Stagnation in tactics also was facilitated to no small 
extent 
by the fact that for a long time it "took a back seat" in our 
leading journals and military-theoretical and 
military-historical works. A gap was created between strategy, 
operational art and tactics, and this could not help but tell on 
development of military theory and practice and on the general 
state of troop combat readiness. There are numerous examples of 
this. For example, the rubric "Formation Tactics" appeared in 
VOYENNAYA MYSL only in the early 1980's. Before this evidently 
it was believed that tactical questions were too "petty" to be 
considered in a military-theoretical journal. In this connection 
I foresee the objection that there is a special journal, 
VOYENNYY VESTNIK, which is tactical in purpose, for this. Yes, 
this is so, but one only has to look carefully at the subject 
matter of articles in this journal and it becomes clear that its 
writings are strictly of an applied nature and are designed 
chiefly for the lower tactical echelon--platoon, company and 
battalion commanders. Other journals and newspapers also rarely 
come out with problem-oriented tactical articles, but the fact 
is that they could influence formation of new tactical thinking 
in officers and "agitate" thought more actively with 
"provocative" polemical writings. 
  Extremely few books on tactics are being published. Never 
before in the entire history of our Army has the officer's 
library been so bare as now. The first military-theoretical 
work, "Taktika" [Tactics], appeared only after 20 years had 
passed since the end of the Great Patriotic War (1966) and had a 
very limited printing. Only a total of three editions of this 
book came out in postwar times.[.sup]34[/] 
  We will note that too few constructive ideas and innovative 
thoughts are advanced in published works on tactics. Theory of 
tactics does not always act as a driving oscillator of 
perestroyka processes. The era of the cult of personality and 
stagnation implanted "normative" thinking in many officers and 
led to depreciation of theory. Many textbooks were written as if 
"using carbon-paper," in a formal style. Provisions of 
regulations are retold in them according to the same type of 
scheme. Often they do not discuss any kind of genuine tactical 
art. 
  Dogmatic restrictions, fear of going beyond the bounds of 
customary ideas, banality instead of originality, tedious 
rehashing of common truths, and calloused thoughts--those are 
the main things that dictated the creative sterility in military 
theory and the deafness to innovation. This difficult heritage 
of stagnation will drag military affairs backward like a heavy 
weight for a long time yet if a resolute struggle is not put up 
against it. 
  The insufficiently high level of scientific achievements in 
tactics largely is determined by an absence of fundamental 
military-theoretical research in prospective problems of combat 
readiness. Primacy was given to current, strictly applied, 
"momentary" interests. No works appeared here in postwar years 
that were equal in theoretical depth, boldness and scale of 
posing questions to such works as "Novoye v razvitii taktiki 
Krasnoy Armii" [New Things in Development of Red Army Tactics] 
by M. N. Tukhachevskiy, "Mozg armii" [Brain of the Army] by B. 
M. Shaposhnikov, "Kharakter operatsiy sovremennykh armiy" 
[Nature of Operations of Modern Armies] by V. K. Triandafillov, 
"Obshchaya taktika" [General Tactics] and "Ogon, manevr, 
maskirovka" [Fire, Maneuver and Maskirovka (lit. "camouflage", 
however, includes "concealment" and "deception" -- FBIS)] by A. 
I. Verkhovskiy, and others. But the fact is, these works 
appeared just 5-10 years after the birth of the Red Army. 
  The circumstance that we practically ceased to publish 
military-theoretical works of foreign authors beginning in the 
1960's did much damage to development of the theory of tactics. 
New works that appear on the whole remain unnoticed in journals 
and newspapers, and annotations and reviews are not even 
provided on them. But despite extremely limited capabilities in 
prewar years, there were many publications of foreign military 
literature. These were works by Machiavelli, Napoleon, von 
Clausewitz, Jomini, Delbruck, Foch, Kuhlmann, 
Fuller, 
Langlois and others. 
  It follows from the above that at the present stage in 
theory 
and practice of military art and in questions of troop combat 
readiness a need arises to rethink and reassess a great deal in 
light of the increased demands of the time and changes in the 
material base of warfare. Not simply "cosmetic cleansing" is 
needed, but fundamental perestroyka for many positions and a 
search for new approaches and fundamentally new solutions. It 
would appear that above all it is important to sharply elevate 
the social status of military theory and genuinely (not in 
words, but in fact) give full play to innovative scientific 
thought. It is perverse and inadmissible to set theory and 
practice in opposition and to calculate in percentages how much 
there should be of theoretical classes and how much of 
practical, let alone in higher military educational 
institutions. Theory must "be present" in literally every class. 
It is impossible to resolve any practical question without this 
"searchlight of scientific thought." 
  In an impetuous time of scientific-technical progress it is 
pernicious to reduce the role of theory only to registering 
events and interpreting provisions of regulations. Military 
affairs mean dynamism, constant uniqueness, destruction of 
stereotypes and established postulates, a continuous search and 
confirmation of new things, and the bold rush of thought into 
the future. Even the most radical changes in the 
material-technical base of battle cannot automatically, of 
themselves, lead to the appearance of new forms and methods of 
combat operations, to the establishment of new tactical 
thinking. The greatest importance in this belongs to a theory 
unswaddled by any lines, free of a biased approach and of 
pressure from above. Under present conditions it must develop a 
scientific concept of perestroyka in the troop combat readiness 
system. Without theoretical study, all practical conditions in 
upgrading the system will be done blindly, by guesswork. 
  A need has matured to infuse a new spirit into tactical 
training methodology, especially in higher military educational 
institutions. It is advisable to teach officers not tactics, but 
the art of tactics, to teach them not decisionmaking 
for battle, but the art of making such a decision, 
and so on. The fundamental difference is that with the new 
methodology the principal goal of training is not to learn the 
work scheme of a commander and staff officer in a combat 
situation, but teach them to creatively analyze, compare, 
foresee the development of combat events, find ways out of 
difficult situations, display aggressiveness, employ procedures 
of deception and stratagem, and strive for victory by means of 
skill. In this connection there is increased importance of 
problem-exploration methods of holding classes and giving 
lectures, of use of mathematical models of the engagement or 
battle, of "atypical games," of problem solving by the 
"brainstorming" method and so on. 
  Military-historical science plays an important role in 
upgrading the combat readiness system. It must "work" more for 
the present. The time has come for military historians to shift 
to a new, higher stage of scientific disclosure of the very 
abundant Great Patriotic War experience, to a detailed 
comparison of belligerents' plans with the involvement of new 
archive sources, to a profound comprehension of events, to a 
demonstration of what kind of troop losses resulted from 
miscalculations and insufficiently considered decisions, and to 
an analysis of how many commanders and staffs managed to win 
victory over superior enemy forces thanks to tactical 
proficiency. A quality research work on the development of 
military art in local wars, and above all on experience of 
combat operations in Afghanistan, is very necessary. It is 
important to deeply comprehend the combat experience gained in 
this war and learn instructive lessons from it, especially in 
fighting in the mountains and improving reconnaissance, physical 
and psychological training of personnel. 
  It should be noted that the work of analyzing and using 
combat training experience in order to upgrade combat readiness 
still is unsatisfactory. Each year a large number of various 
exercises are held in the troops, but their results are not 
properly generalized and, most important, are not communicated 
to the troops and higher military educational institutions. A 
strange practice has formed: While it is the practice to have an 
analytical survey of the experience of operational-tactical 
training of armies of the United States and NATO in pages of 
central military journals, our own combat training experience 
goes ignored. It is not accessible to the broad Army public. It 
turns out that such truly invaluable scientific capital--on 
which, by the way, no small amounts are spent--does not produce 
a proper practical return for improving combat training and 
combat readiness, often disappears in the archives without a 
trace and does not receive new life in textbooks and training 
manuals. But the fact is, this is first-rate "building material" 
for combat improvement of troops and for military theory. 
  In the final account the job of radically improving combat 
readiness never will budge decisively until the entire broad 
Army public joins in a discussion of pressing problems in pages 
of the press and wages a resolute struggle against obduracy, 
slavery to routine and stagnant phenomena. The revival of 
democratic traditions in the press and broad discussion are the 
main line that will help get to new milestones faster in 
training troops and in military organizational development as a 
whole. Only in the light of polemics, by collective reason, is 
it possible to develop faster and better the correct line for 
forward movement and avoid a repetition of mistakes. We have 
more than enough bright, talented officers who are bold in 
opinions and actions. It is important only to arouse their 
creative activeness in the right way and resolutely cast off the 
fetters of irrational limitations and dogmatism. The most 
dangerous enemy in military affairs is stereotype. Until it is 
gotten rid of, one need not speak of any kind of perestroyka. 
  One of the important tasks in upgrading combat readiness is 
increasing the personnel's morale and fighting qualities. Never 
in the past has the factor of morale played such a determining 
role in accomplishing missions facing the troops as at the 
present stage. Commanders and all officers of command and 
control entities should spare no efforts to tirelessly form in 
soldiers a high ideological conviction and devotion to the 
Motherland, persistently instil in them moral qualities, 
internationalism and comradely mutual help, and develop a 
striving for tireless combat improvement, staunchness of spirit, 
selflessness, heroism and the ability to overcome difficulties 
of life in the field. It is important to remember that entry 
into a mortal clash with the enemy and the transition from 
peacetime to combat life is an enormous test of 
moral-psychological qualities. A soldier can learn weapons well 
and learn to use them skillfully, but if he has no inner 
readiness for actions, appropriate ideological conditioning, and 
emotional and volitional stability and is not constantly 
mobilized for fighting, he may not hold up, may waver in a 
minute of a very difficult combat ordeal and thereby endanger 
himself, his comrades in arms and his subunit. Today as never 
before it is necessary for the concepts of a "knowledgeable," 
"skilled" soldier to merge as one with the concepts of "brave" 
and "courageous." 
  To this end, in days of peacetime combat training, in the 
course of problems, drills and exercises, it is necessary to use 
all opportunities to temper a soldier's will and develop in him 
the character of a fearless warrior, self-control, and readiness 
to perform the assigned mission at any cost right up to 
self-sacrifice. Great experience has been accumulated in the 
troops in this matter and it must be used, enriched and 
developed in every way. The tested way of psychological 
conditioning is to move into the assault following the bursts of 
friendly artillery and mortar rounds and bombs, be rolled over 
by tanks, operate tanks underwater, throw live grenades, 
negotiate live-fire assault courses and so on. 
  Problems containing elements of danger and risk permissible 
in peacetime and strictly controlled by the commander prepare 
the personnel for real conditions of war, reinforce their 
professional expertise and increase combat effectiveness. 
  One of the most responsible sectors of work to improve 
combat 
readiness is comprehensive strengthening of discipline and 
efficiency and the establishment everywhere in subunits of 
strict regulation order and the personnel's compliance with 
demands of the military oath, regulations and the commander's 
orders. An old truth goes that without discipline there is no 
combat effectiveness and combat readiness, and there is no army. 
Now, when weapons and the character of battle have become 
immeasurably more complicated and when conditions for performing 
combat missions have become more difficult, the role of 
discipline as a very important factor has grown by many times. 
Lack of discipline even of one soldier, the sluggish, imprecise 
execution of one's duties and of commanders' orders and 
instructions, and a deviation from provisions of regulations in 
battle can lead to serious consequences right up to nonexecution 
of the combat mission by the entire subunit. In days of 
peacetime combat training and day-to-day service the personnel 
must be brought up in a spirit of faultless execution and 
implicit obedience. Any violations of regulation order and 
discipline, indulgences on the part of commanders, and absence 
of proper exactingness toward subordinates are impermissible. 
  Today we clearly realize that there are many difficult 
questions and unresolved problems in matters of upgrading combat 
readiness, but necessary premises for real changes already are 
being created. 
<H5>  Conclusions and Recommendations </H5>
  1. This work considers the importance of the principle of 
combat readiness from two aspects: Theoretical and practical. 
From the standpoint of theory this work shows how the content of 
the "combat readiness" concept "evolved" under the influence of 
development of means of warfare, changes in views on the nature 
of war, the operation and battle, and methods of their conduct. 
The conclusion should be drawn on a practical plane that demands 
of the principle are strictly immutable: It is necessary for 
troops always to be on guard and fully armed to repel 
aggression. War does not forgive blunders and indulgences in 
combat readiness. Here there are none of those trivial matters 
and secondary details which could be ignored; here everything is 
important and everything must be taken into account. 
  2. Demands on combat readiness have increased immeasurably 
under present conditions. There should be no place for 
seasonality in it. Combat readiness must be maintained at a 
proper level at any time of year and day. The factor of time 
plays a deciding role in it. Nothing can make up for the loss of 
time. It can result in loss of people and the initiative. Time 
periods for taking steps to transfer units and subunits to 
higher conditions of combat readiness now are figured not in 
weeks and not even days, but in hours and minutes. 
  3. High combat readiness of troops is forged gradually and 
imperceptibly, day in and day out, by the strenuous labor of all 
personnel. Military theory develops the reference points in its 
improvement, the ideology, the direction of combat training, the 
improvement in the command and control system and the other 
components making it up. 
  4. Measures for maintaining combat readiness of units and 
subunits in peacetime should be conducted purposefully based on 
conditions of the initial period of war as applied to that 
theater of military operations where they are stationed. All 
personnel, right down to every soldier, should know precisely 
what mission is to be executed and how it is to be executed in 
case a military threat builds up or with the beginning of combat 
operations. They should learn the probable enemy's weapons and 
tactics thoroughly, know his strong and weak sides, and in a 
critical situation of aggression which has begun be capable of 
wresting the initiative of actions from the enemy's hands and 
imposing one's own will on him. Only those troops will be able 
to fight in a modern way and repel the attack of a strong enemy 
who master all forms and methods of warfare to perfection in 
peacetime, learn to use the attack, maneuver and protective 
qualities of weapons and combat equipment with maximum 
effectiveness, prove capable of accomplishing missions arising 
suddenly in battle, and can if necessary quickly restructure 
their tactics, develop effective methods of combating previously 
unknown enemy weapons, actively counter his new tactics and 
impose their own will on him. 
  5. It is important to remember that strengthening combat 
readiness is work both of today and for the future. It is 
necessary to take into account not only what the probable enemy 
has now, but also what weapons he will have tomorrow and how his 
battle tactics and conditions of the military situation in 
general can change. Therefore it is necessary to upgrade combat 
readiness with an eye to the long term and with profound 
foresight, it is necessary to resolutely cast aside everything 
that is obsolete and boldly seek out and introduce to practice 
everything new and progressive. Sober realism, precise 
understanding of new problems, boldness backed up by strict 
calculation, rejection of formed stereotypes of thinking, and 
the most profound conviction as to the exceptional significance 
of this very important task are what should permeate the 
activity of military cadres in further comprehensive improvement 
of troop combat readiness. 
  6. The center of gravity in work of strengthening combat 
readiness should be shifted to practical work directly in 
battalions and companies. Organizing execution and implementing 
the orders and directives of senior commanders, one's own 
decisions, and combat readiness plans are the important thing in 
officer cadres' work to improve combat readiness. This requires 
precise assignment of missions, considered disposition of 
people, their purposeful training and principled exactingness. 
Upgrading organizational work to increase combat readiness 
presumes the ability of command personnel to identify the 
important thing, correctly distribute the time budget and 
resources, mobilize people and organize effective control. 
  7. One of the responsible tasks which rests with commanders 
for ensuring subunit combat readiness is their ability to 
organize proper upkeep and maintenance of weapons and combat 
equipment and to ensure their constant readiness for immediate 
use. Every serviceman must know his weapon well, comply with 
rules for maintaining it under field conditions, and promptly 
identify and remedy malfunctions. 
  8. A flexible command and control system is an important 
component element of combat readiness. Effective use of the 
combat capabilities of units and subunits with the beginning of 
war and in its course depends largely on mobility in leading 
them. The demand of the time is such that combat readiness of 
command and control entities in peace and wartime should be one 
step higher than combat readiness of subordinate troops. 
  9. The field is the genuine academy of troop combat 
proficiency. Only in field problems, in a difficult situation, 
is military proficiency forged, combat maturity of commanders 
and staff officers achieved, their will tempered, command and 
control skills improved, and necessary combat and 
moral-psychological qualities and the ability to staunchly 
endure the hardships of life in the field acquired. A subunit 
whose officers and all personnel are unable to live in the field 
as in combat and who are not trained to quickly arrange housing 
and rest for themselves, prepare food, strictly comply with 
rules of personal hygiene, and constantly preserve cheerfulness, 
endurance, and readiness to enter battle at any moment cannot be 
deemed combat ready. 
Footnotes 
  1. TsAMO [Ministry of Defense Central Archives], stack 344, 
list 2459, file 11, sheet 31. 
  2. Onasander, "Manual for Military Leaders," St. Petersburg, 
1828, p 135. 
  3. F. Vegetius, "A Brief Exposition of Military Affairs," p 
236. 
  4. "Ustav ratnykh, pushechnykh i drugikh del" [Manual of 
Military, Gunnery and Other Affairs], St. Petersburg, izd. 
Gosudarstvennoy Voyennoy Kollegii [State War College], 1777, pp 
55, 206, 230, 231. 
  5. Ibid. 
  6. "Ustav voinskiy" [Military Regulations], 1716, 2nd ed., 
St. Petersburg, 1719, p 10. 
  7. K. Marx and F. Engels, "Sochineniya" [Works], 2nd ed., 
Vol 
10, p 565. 
  8. Ye. I. Porfilyev, "Petr I - osnovopolozhnik russkogo 
voyennogo iskusstva i regulyarnoy armii i flota" [Peter I: 
Founder of Russian Military Art and the Regular Army and Navy], 
Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1952, p 100. 
  9. See "Sovetskaya Voyennaya Entsiklopediya" [Soviet 
Military 
Encyclopedia], Vol 7, Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1979, p 170. 
  10. M. V. Lomonosov, "Polnoye sobraniye sochineniy" 
[Complete 
Collected Works], Vol 6, Moscow-Leningrad, izd. AN SSSR [USSR 
Academy of Sciences], 1956, p 593. 
  11. "Pisma i bumagi Petra Velikogo" [Letters and Papers of 
Peter the Great], Vol 1, St. Petersburg, 1887, p 29. 
  12. See "Sovetskaya Voyennaya Entsiklopediya," Vol 5, 1978, 
p 
120. 
  13. "Sbornik boyevykh nastavleniy i prikazov" [Digest of 
Combat Regulations and Orders], No 1, St. Petersburg, 1868, pp 
7-8. 
  14. "Russkaya voyennaya mysl XIX i nachala XX vekov" 
[Russian 
Military Thought of the 19th and Early 20th Centuries], [Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1960,] p 6. 
  15. See "Sovetskaya Voyennaya Entsiklopediya," Vol 7, p 172. 
  16. V. I. Lenin, "Polnoye sobraniye sochineniy" [Complete 
Collected Works], Vol 20, p 173. 
  17. "Voyna i voyennoye delo" [War and Military Affairs], 
Moscow, Gosvoyenizdat, 1938, p 94. 
  18. "Voprosy strategii i operativnogo iskusstva v sovetskikh 
voyennykh trudakh. 1917-1940" [Questions of Strategy and 
Operational Art in Soviet Military Works: 1917-1940], Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1965, pp 92-99. 
  19. See D. V. Verzhkhovskiy and V. F. Lyakhov, "Pervaya 
mirovaya voyna 1914-1918 gg." [World War I 1914-1918], Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1964, p 134. 
  20. N. A. Talenskiy, "Somma 1916 g." [Somme 1916], Moscow, 
VAF [Frunze Military Academy], 1937, p 21. 
  21. "Voprosy strategii i operativnogo iskusstva v sovetskikh 
voyennykh trudakh. 1917-1940," pp 377-378. 
  22. F. Foch, "On Waging War," Moscow, 1937, p 14. 
  23. Lenin, Vol 42, p 130. 
  24. Quoted from book "KPSS o Vooruzhennykh Silakh Sovetskogo 
Soyuza" [The CPSU on Armed Forces of the Soviet Union], Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1969, p 148. 
  25. Lenin, Vol 21, p 399. 
  26. See M. A. Gareyev, "Obshchevoyskovyye ucheniya" 
[Combined 
Arms Exercises], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1983, p 97. 
  27. See KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 26 August 1990. 
  28. See KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 26 August 1990. 
  29. See "Lokalnyye voyny. Istoriya i sovremennost" [Local 
Wars: Past and Present], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1981, p 115. 
  30. See PRAVDA, 9 August 1986. 
  31. "Sovetskiye Vooruzhennyye Sily v usloviyakh razvitogo 
sotsializma" [The Soviet Armed Forces Under Conditions of 
Developed Socialism], Moscow, Nauka, 1985, p 6. 
  32. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 10, 1988, p 34. 
  33. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, Special Edition, February 1985, p 
27. 
  34. "Taktika" [Tactics], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1966, 1984, 
1987. 
<H3>  CHAPTER THREE - DECISIVENESS, AGGRESSIVENESS AND CONTINUITY 
OF CONDUCTING THE BATTLE </H3>
[.sup]1[/] 
  Decisiveness, aggressiveness and continuity of 
conducting the battle consist of a constant striving to defeat 
the enemy, the delivery of powerful blows to him, imposition of 
one's will, disruption of his plans, creation of unfavorable 
conditions for him, and daring, bold, vigorous actions conducted 
persistently and stubbornly day and night in any weather. 
  "Boyevoy ustav Sukhoputnykh voysk" [Ground 
Troops Field Manual], Part II 
  My motto is to seek out and hit. 
  P. I. Bagration 
  The fact that the initiative has been seized in 
itself "proves superiority either in quantity or quality of 
troops or in the art of field generalship, and maintains the 
soldiers' morale in all failures and retreats..." 
  F. Engels 
<H3>  1. From the History of the Origin and Development of the 
Principle of Decisiveness and Aggressiveness </H3>
  If we trace the activity of great field generals beginning 
from ancient times up to the present, then despite the specific 
nature of each one's manifestation of military art, nevertheless 
it also appears possible to single out a certain trait of their 
activity common and similar to all. It consists of the ability 
to act resolutely, forcefully and aggressively in the engagement 
and battle. 
  Sun Tzu called decisiveness the supreme art of waging war. 
He 
believed it was possible to frustrate enemy plans through 
decisiveness and daring. He set forth his own rules on how to 
achieve decisiveness and aggressiveness as follows: "If you have 
ten times more forces than the enemy, surround him from all 
sides; if you have twice the forces, split him into parts; if 
forces are equal, be able to engage him in battle; if forces are 
fewer, be able to defend against him; if you have something 
generally worse, be able to evade him..."[.sup]2[/] 
  There is a great distance between what is desirable and what 
is possible in battle. Tens on hundreds of possible obstacles 
arise before the military leader on the path to achieving his 
goal. In entering a clash against the enemy, each time he 
experiences doubt as to whether or not everything has been taken 
into account, whether or not everything has been weighed in 
preparing the battle, whether or not everything has been done as 
necessary to achieve success. Vacillations in decisionmaking are 
inevitable. Therefore it is not enough to possess a brilliant 
mind, the gift of foresight, and organizing qualities; one also 
has to be capable of displaying enormous will in order to cast 
aside all contradictions and be able to implement with supreme 
persistence a decision which has been made. 
  Decisiveness and persistence are not synonyms for 
stubbornness and thickheadedness. Acting decisively does not 
mean stopping at nothing and striving for success at any cost, 
regardless of losses. Decisiveness is that trait of a military 
leader manifested in his ability to act vigorously and boldly 
and at the same time calculatingly and cleverly; to employ 
daring, aggressive methods of fighting a battle, but at the same 
time to skillfully protect himself against any surprises. 
  Displaying decisiveness and aggressiveness cannot be a goal 
in itself; it is only a necessary means for implementing one's 
concepts and plans. Realization of demands of the principle of 
decisiveness and aggressiveness for field generals always has 
been closely intertwined with skillful application of other 
principles--attainment of surprise in delivering an attack, bold 
concentration of efforts, precision of command and control, 
flexibility of interworking, comprehensiveness of support, and 
prudence. In short, decisiveness always acted as a necessary 
condition for implementing demands of all other principles. 
  In describing the campaigns of Alexander the Great into 
Persia and India, Arrian Nicodemus noted that the field general 
achieved decisiveness in striving to force the enemy to take an 
incorrect step and thereby place him in a difficult spot, and 
also to divert attention by decoy and cunning procedures. His 
aggressiveness was manifested in bold, farsighted decisions, in 
the ability to perplex the enemy with uncommonness of actions, 
and in employing unknown means of warfare. For example, 
unexpectedly for the Persians, in the assault on Halicarnassus 
Alexander employed siege equipment which could breach their 
fortress walls. Taking advantage of this, the Macedonians lobbed 
stones, animal corpses and barrels of snakes on the city. After 
inflicting heavy losses on the besieged, they executed a 
decisive assault on the fortress. 
  Thanks to aggressiveness and resourcefulness and to daring, 
surprise actions, the Macedonians managed to take the Persian 
fortress of Tyre. Alexander was not troubled by the circumstance 
that the city not only was protected by fortifications, but also 
was situated behind a vast water obstacle, a strait. He acted 
without delay, ordering a mole to be built across the strait, 
catapults and ballistas set up on it and the city bombarded with 
stones. The unusual assault, aggressive actions and 
unprecedented "infernal machines" all played their role. The 
enemy was broken morally and physically. The action was crowned 
by a concerted assault on the city from different 
sides.[.sup]3[/] 
  In order to achieve decisive actions and stun the enemy, 
Alexander encouraged soldiers' inventiveness and resourcefulness 
in every way and brought in engineers to seek new means of 
supporting battle. His army proved capable of making an assault 
crossing of broad water obstacles in short time periods because 
wineskins inflated with air and wooden boats disassembled into 
parts during transportation were employed as crossing 
equipment.[.sup]4[/] The enemy in no way expected such 
actions and was not ready for resistance. From above, the 
conclusion can be drawn that it is not enough to wish to achieve 
decisive, aggressive actions; one must be able to create 
necessary conditions and favorable premises for this and 
immediately exploit results. 
  Aggressiveness and decisiveness were characteristic traits 
of 
Julius Caesar's field-generalship activity. He used swiftness 
and decisiveness of actions and was able to take advantage of a 
favorable moment to throw the enemy into disarray, to break and 
split his combat formations and hit them in detail. 
  Caesar looked for his own special "key" to success in each 
engagement. Therefore each of his campaigns was dissimilar from 
another both in concept and in methods of achieving 
aggressiveness. In the battle at Pharsalus (48 B.C.) he 
surpassed his enemy Pompey because he acted uncommonly--not like 
everyone, but in his own way. Caesar aligned the combat 
formation in a new way, establishing a reserve of six cohorts, 
which none of the field generals previously had employed. This 
gave him an opportunity to build up his forces at the height of 
the engagement, to act more boldly and forcefully than Pompey 
and impose his own will on him.[.sup]5[/] 
  The decisiveness and swiftness of Caesar's actions played a 
main role during the campaign into Asia Minor, where his army 
smashed a strong army from Pontus in five days. Just like 
Alexander the Great, Julius Caesar made skillful use of engineer 
art to achieve aggressiveness. The Roman Army was able to build 
bridges not only on floating piers, but also on piled piers. We 
know, for example, of a timber pier bridge around 600 m long 
built in ten days across the Rhine River during the campaign 
against the Germans.[.sup]6[/] The high level of engineering 
art during the Roman Empire is attested to by the circumstance 
that each legion's supply train had a certain number of light 
boats with a frame of willow branches covered by 
skins.[.sup]7[/] This enabled the Romans to negotiate water 
obstacles quickly and unexpectedly for the enemy and to 
decisively smash his confused army. 
  Soldiers' resourcefulness and knack, which were the basis of 
the principle of aggressiveness, were inherent to tactics of 
Slavic tribes. Ancient chroniclers noted the high skill, 
decisiveness and resourcefulness displayed in their combat 
operations. In wars against Byzantium (6-7th centuries) they 
showed they had good mastery of siege art. The Slavic army would 
skillfully lure the enemy into a prepared trap, demonstrate 
false retreats, employ abatis and ambushes, and execute raids on 
the enemy from different directions. Portable and mobile screens 
made of brushwood hurdles were used to covertly approach his 
fortified camp, and earth embankments were built. 
  In assaulting fortresses the soldiers would make earth 
mounds 
next to them which they would ascend, then they would cut off 
the paling and set fire to towers and walls of the enemy 
fortress. Much that was new and unexpected for the enemy in 
methods of fighting a battle was employed during the campaign 
into Byzantium in 551 by a 3,000-man Slavic army detachment. 
After making an assault crossing of the Danube River on rafts 
and barrels, the detachment passed through all of Illyria and 
reached the city of Dyrrhachium on the coast of the Adriatic Sea. 
  The decisiveness and scale of actions of the ancient Russian 
Army in the 10th century is attested to by the campaign of 
Kievan Prince Oleg (907) against Tsargrad (Constantinople), 
during which interworking of the land detachment with a 
detachment of vessels (200) was done very successfully. Later, 
2,000 vessels took part in the campaign of Kievan Prince Igor 
(944).[.sup]8[/] Just as with the Greeks and Romans, 
decisiveness and aggressiveness of operations by the ancient 
Russian Army largely were increased by use of various siege 
equipment. Thus, siege machines, iron rams, enormous pieces for 
throwing rocks, and so-called "testudos"--structures covered 
with dry hides--were prepared for taking the fortress of 
Thessalonia. 
  The improvement of weapons and methods of combat operations 
dictated an ever greater diversity of forms and methods of 
achieving decisiveness and aggressiveness in battle. While 
usually relatively small detachments took part in engagements of 
the 10th-12th centuries, the scale of combat operations rose 
substantially during the 14th-16th centuries. For example, in 
the battle against the Golden Horde by Prince Dmitriy of Moscow 
on Kulikovo Field almost 300,000 persons took part on both 
sides. Dmitriy Donskoy's decisiveness of operations in this 
battle was manifested in the fact that he managed to preempt the 
enemy in deploying and delivering an attack (Fig. 1). The 
Tatar-Mongol army under the command of Mamai also acted with 
great determination and aggressiveness in this engagement. But 
in the final account the preponderance was on Dmitriy's side, 
because at the decisive moment he managed to take skillful 
advantage of his general and special reserves to deliver the 
final attack against the enemy, which predecided the battle's 
outcome. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-29A>             Fig. 1. Battle of Kulikovo </FIG>



  With the appearance of firearms in the 14th-15th centuries, 
decisiveness and aggressiveness of troop operations in battle 
began to take on new forms in connection with the use of fire. 
Although at first the ruchnitsas [hand-held 
harquebus-type firearms] being used by Russian soldiers were 
imperfect, the Moscow, Rostov, Novgorod and other chronicles 
tell, in describing battles in the defense of Moscow (1408 and 
1451), Uglich, Rzhev (1446 and 1447), Galis (1451) and Novgorod 
(1471), that "more than once the enemy was very frightened by 
the firing." 
  The appearance in the Russian Army of the first models of 
guns--tyufyaks--firing shot [grapeshot] played no 
small part in increasing the decisiveness and aggressiveness of 
battle. Use of cannons in defense of fortresses enabled fighting 
off an enemy assault and conducting counterattacks. In wars of 
Rus with Lithuania, Poland, Livonia and the Kazan and Crimean 
Khanates in the latter half of the 15th century and in the 16th 
century, along with the fight for fortresses, field battle began 
to be employed more and more widely in which the Russian Army 
found ever newer tactical methods of operations. Thus, in 1530 
Russian druzhinas for the first time used mobile field 
fortifications made of wood and shields with firing ports, the 
so-called gulyay-gorod. Using the mobile shelter 
enabled inflicting losses on an enemy from short range by fire 
from harquebuses and guns and also by fire from bows. As soon as 
the enemy combat formation managed to be breached, the cavalry 
would join the action, completing the enemy's defeat by a 
surprise attack. 
  When more powerful cannons called treskotukhas and 
barsy became operational during the Livonian War 
(1558-1583), an opportunity appeared to engage the enemy not 
only in close battle, but also from a distance of more than 1 
km.[.sup]9[/] The long-range (distant) firefight originated 
as a result. The Russian Army's achievement of high combat 
aggressiveness was facilitated by the soldiers' combat 
qualities, staunchness, valor, selflessness, love for the 
Motherland and hatred for the invaders. This gave them strength 
in battle and inspired them to exploits. The six-month defense 
of Pskov (August 1581-January 1582) was an example of the 
Russian Army's exceptional staunchness, determination and high 
combat aggressiveness in the defense. The fortress garrison 
numbered 16,000 persons and the city was besieged by a 
50,000-man Polish army headed by King Stefan Batory. But the 
besieged did not sit it out behind fortress walls; they often 
made bold sallies, hampered the enemy's engineer work, inflicted 
losses on him and conducted reconnaissance. The Pskov garrison 
withstood a sum total of 31 assaults, but just did not surrender 
to the enemy.[.sup]10[/] 
  Even longer than Pskov, the garrison of 
Troitsko-Sergiyevskaya Monastery defended 16 months (September 
1608-January 1610) and the Smolensk garrison 20 months (October 
1609-June 1611). What was new in the defense of these fortresses 
from the standpoint of combat aggressiveness were the 
long-distance, rather lengthy sallies by detachments of the 
besieged and decisive counterattacks executed not only during 
the day, but also at night. This enabled keeping the enemy under 
constant stress and wearing him down. Enemy attempts to 
penetrate the fortress through breaches in walls were quickly 
stopped. 
  The principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness found a 
certain reflection in the first Russian "Ustav ratnykh, 
pushechnykh i drugikh del, kasayushchikhsya voyennoy nauki" 
[Manual of Military, Gunnery and Other Affairs Concerning 
Military Science] (1607-1621), written by Onisim Mikhaylov. It 
pointed out that it was necessary to display persistence in 
erecting city fortifications and in their siege. In order to be 
aggressive it was recommended preparing siege assets ahead of 
time. 
  The establishment of permanent armies in a number of 
European 
states was a material precondition which contributed to 
increased decisiveness and aggressiveness of operations in wars 
of the 16th-18th centuries. Being well trained, they had an 
opportunity to conduct field engagements and a more active fight 
for fortresses. Prominent military figures of that time Maurice 
of Orange and Swedish King Gustavus Adolphus played an important 
role in reorganizing their armies and developing new, aggressive 
tactics. 
  In Russia Peter the Great was an outstanding military 
reformer. His views on military art, particularly on the 
principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness, were reflected in 
the treatises "Pravila srazheniya" [Rules of Engagement] (1708), 
"Rassuzhdeniya o dobyvanii Vyborkha" [Reflections on Taking 
Vyborg] (1710) and especially the "Voinskiy ustav" [Military 
Regulations] (1716). These and other documents reflected ideas 
of acting boldly, swiftly and forcefully, but prudently in 
battle, "not be led by the enemy, but constantly keep an eye on 
him and hit him as much as possible." 
  A. V. Suvorov made no small contribution to developing the 
principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness. In an era when 
European armies were dominated by linear tactics, which shackled 
the initiative of commanders and troops like a straitjacket, 
Suvorov developed and brilliantly employed column tactics in 
combination with an extended order--a method of battle created 
in the West only during the Great French Revolution of the late 
18th century and later developed by Napoleon.[.sup]11[/] 
  Suvorov taught: "The true rule of military art is to attack 
the enemy directly from the side most sensitive for him and not 
come together by timidly taking a roundabout way, . . . the 
matter can be resolved only by a direct bold 
offensive."[.sup]12[/] 
  Suvorov set forth basic principles of his aggressive tactics 
especially clearly in the plan for the Italian campaign (1799): 
"1. Nothing but the offensive. 2. Speed in marches, swiftness. 
3. Methodism is not needed, but good visual estimation is. 4. 
Full authority to the commanding general. 5. Attack the enemy 
and hit him in the field. 6. Lose no time in sieges . . . take 
fortresses chiefly by assaults or open force... 7. Never divide 
forces for security of different points. If the enemy went 
around them, so much the better: he approaches in order to be 
defeated. . . . Never occupy yourself with vain 
maneuvers."[.sup]13[/] This was truly a catechism of rules of 
combat aggressiveness. 
  Among western authors who paid greatest attention to the 
principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness were Turenne, 
Montecuccoli, Eugene of Savoy and H. Lloyd. Thus, the "Notes of 
Count Raimundo Montecuccoli..." (1664) stated that initiative 
must be aimed at preempting the enemy, at swiftness, firmness 
and aggressiveness. He recommended not splitting up one's 
forces.[.sup]14[/] Napoleon attached great significance to 
the principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness. Rejecting 
cordon strategy, he believed the principal goal of combat 
operations was not seizure of territory and fortresses, but 
defeat of the enemy army. He said: "I see only one thing--masses 
of enemy troops. I try to destroy them, confident that all the 
rest will collapse together with them."[.sup]15[/] 
  The principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness was 
manifested in the field-generalship activity of M. I. Kutuzov in 
the diversity of methods of strategic and tactical operations 
employed, in the capability of foreseeing how the enemy will act 
in order to take timely steps to constrain his maneuver and 
disrupt his plan, in flexible use of reserves in dangerous 
sectors of the front, in a more rational alignment of combat 
formations, in a broad display of initiative and in granting 
"freedom of initiative" to subordinates. Like Suvorov, Kutuzov 
took skilled advantage of the Russian soldier's combat 
qualities, resourcefulness, sharpness and stratagem. 
  Before a battle Kutuzov would inspire the soldiers, and they 
would display supreme decisiveness and valor. Here, for example, 
is how a participant of the Battle of Borodino, F. Glinka, 
describes it: "Experience shows that the Russian line that has 
been pierced, cut up, and broken still holds. . . . And even 
when the French penetrated into the rear of our troops, their 
combat formations did not get confused. Dokhturov and Rayevskiy 
decided: If the enemy is behind us, we will turn ourselves 
inside out, we will begin to hit the front ones from the front 
faces and the rear ones from the rear faces."[.sup]16[/] 
  In describing the field-generalship art of Barclay de Tolly, 
many military historians focus attention on his excessive 
caution. But when necessary he also skillfully employed the 
principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness. In setting forth 
his war strategy in a letter to P. I. Bagration on 1 June 1812, 
de Tolly demanded: "...a) hit and destroy a weak enemy; b) avoid 
all decisive engagements with a very strong enemy; c) irregular 
troops must have the enemy in unimpeded view, encircle him from 
all sides, bother him day and night and hamper his supply by 
operating against a line of operations." In an instruction to 
General Platov he directed: "Even in defensive operations an 
chance must not be missed to inflict telling blows on the enemy 
and pound him in detail."[.sup]17[/] 
  K. Marx and F. Engels had high esteem for the 
field-generalship activity of Barclay de Tolly in the first 
stage of war. They noted that he "executed a withdrawal with 
wonderful art."[.sup]18[/] H. Jomini also wrote about this. 
"That withdrawal which the Russian Army made in 1812 from the 
Neman to Moscow over a distance of 240 lieue 
[approximately 1,080 km] without allowing an enemy such as 
Napoleon to put them in disarray or partially defeat them . . . 
should be placed above all others."[.sup]19[/] 
  Jomini noted that the principle of decisiveness and 
aggressiveness should be employed in close combination with the 
principles of concentration of efforts and attainment of 
surprise in operations. "...If military art," he wrote, 
"consists of throwing one's forces at a decisive point, it is 
understandable that the first means for application of this 
principle will be seizing the initiative in operations. Whoever 
has seized this initiative knows in advance what he is doing and 
what he wants: With his masses he arrives at that point where he 
should deliver the blow. Whoever waits, is preempted everywhere: 
The enemy pounces on separate parts of his army; he knows 
neither where the enemy wishes to direct his efforts nor the 
means which he must counter."[.sup]20[/] 
  Also to Jomini's credit in developing this principle is that 
for the first time he extended it not only to the offensive, but 
also to the defense. Jomini correctly pointed out that the 
defense must not be waiting, but aggressive in purpose and must 
include elements of the offensive, i.e., bear an 
offensive-defensive character. 
  C. von Clausewitz called this principle boldness, firmness 
and aggressiveness. He remarked that "theory has no right to 
restrict it by virtue of its legislative power . . . Boldness is 
a creative power. . . . Even foolhardiness, that is boldness 
without an object, is not to be despised. Boldness lends wings 
to the mind and the discernment . . . it is impossible to 
imagine a distinguished General without boldness."[.sup]21[/] 
  Clausewitz set aside just as significant a role for firmness 
in a military leader's activity. He wrote that a commander 
"finds himself in a constant whirlpool of false and true 
information, of mistakes committed through fear, through 
negligence, through precipitation, of contraventions of his 
authority, either from mistaken or correct motives, from ill 
will, true or false sense of duty, indolence or exhaustion, of 
accidents which no mortal could have foreseen."[.sup]22[/] 
And one who takes it into his head to yield to these 
impressions, concludes Clausewitz, will display weakness, he 
will be incapable of firmly defending or of implementing a 
decision. 
  Speaking of decisiveness and aggressiveness, the military 
classic notes that "our basic principle is to view the 
destruction of enemy armed forces as the most important thing 
not only in the entire war . . . but also in each individual 
battle."[.sup]23[/] As we see, Clausewitz's opinion in this 
matter fully coincides with the views of Napoleon. Attainment of 
the principal goal of war, destruction of the enemy, according 
to Clausewitz is achieved only by battle. "Tactical successes in 
war," he wrote, "have a dominating importance."[.sup]24[/] 
This thesis was correct for that time, but now strategic and 
operational echelons have their own very effective means of 
warfare which are not part of formations. Therefore the role of 
tactics and the battle should be viewed in a different manner, 
in the overall system of operations and engagements. 
  In analyzing the experience of wars of the late 18th and 
19th 
centuries, one can be convinced as to what major role the 
steadily increasing firepower played in the change in content of 
the principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness. Adoption of 
firearms with a curved stock, which made aimed fire possible, 
played a very important role in this matter. A transition from 
column tactics to extended order tactics occurred in the 
Crimean, Franco-Prussian and Russo-Turkish (1877-1878) Wars, 
which gave the offensive greater penetration and dynamism and 
increased mobility. The aggressiveness of the defense also 
increased and field defense originated. To reduce losses from 
aimed fire and increase the stability of defending troops, in 
addition to building earth-fill fortifications (redoubts, 
fl&egrave;ches, lunettes) they began digging group emplacements 
(logements) and building protective cover and shelters for 
reserves. The importance of engineer preparation of terrain rose. 
  Russian military theorists of the 19th century promptly 
identified the new trends in development of the principle of 
decisiveness and aggressiveness. This was reflected in 
particular in military works by Decembrists P. Pestel, N. 
Muravyev, I. Burtsov, F. Glinka and others. Thus, in his work 
"Russkaya pravda" [Russian Truth] P. I. Pestel noted that 
"success of a military battle . . . depends on decisive 
action..."[.sup]25[/] He linked this both with the force of 
weapons as well as with the Russian soldier's combat qualities. 
D. Davydov, a courageous partisan of the Patriotic War of 1812, 
expressed many instructive thoughts with respect to increasing 
decisiveness and aggressiveness. He developed tactics of 
partisan warfare. Fervent patriot Davydov believed in Russia's 
strength and might and in the valor of the Russian soldier. It 
is to him that belong the prophetic words: "Russia has never yet 
risen to its full gigantic height, and woe to its enemies should 
it rise at some time!"[.sup]26[/] 
  The principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness can be 
traced through the works of G. A. Leyer and M. I. Dragomirov. 
"The very worst thing on which one can decide in war," wrote 
Leyer, "is not to decide on anything."[.sup]27[/] Many 
provisions expressed by Dragomirov regarding the principle of 
decisiveness and aggressiveness are in keeping with these 
thoughts of Leyer. He wrote in the "Uchebnik taktiki" [Tactics 
Textbook] that the one who wins is the one who "has the ability 
to make up his mind for combat undertakings without the 
slightest vacillation . . . and only one who does not fear 
perishing wins. . . . One incapable of making up his mind on 
something is like a person with tied hands with whom anyone can 
do what he likes. . . . The most ill-thought out undertaking 
does not present such a risk as indecisiveness."[.sup]28[/] 
  In wars of the late 19th and early 20th 
centuries--Spanish-American (1898), Anglo-Boer (1899-1902) and 
Russo-Japanese (1904-1905)--rifled longarms were used in 
considerable numbers; their combat capabilities had increased by 
almost tenfold compared with the Model 1808 smoothbore shoulder 
arm. Combat capabilities of artillery had increased 3-4 times. 
Machineguns began to be used on the battlefield for the first 
time.[.sup]29[/] In forecasting the influence of more 
advanced means of warfare on the content of principles of 
tactics, many military theorists concluded that from now on fire 
would displace hand-to-hand combat more and more. 
  This thought was expressed rather precisely by A. A. 
Neznamov, who wrote: "Decisive success in a modern engagement is 
based on attaining a preponderance of fire; silent weapons have 
faded into the background."[.sup]30[/] From an assessment of 
the factor of fire he draws the conclusion that under its 
influence the intensity and aggressiveness of combat operations 
will increase and tactical pauses will shorten. He noted: "The 
time is past in a war when people fought for weeks but waited 
for months."[.sup]31[/] 
  Works by Neznamov and other authors noted a trend toward 
substantial changes in confrontation of the offensive and 
defense under the influence of development of means of warfare. 
While confrontation of the offensive and defense had the nature 
of a confrontation of strength before the appearance of firearms 
and was accomplished in the form of a brief clash of close-order 
infantry or cavalry masses where the outcome of the battle 
depended on the force of soldiers' physical attack, with the 
appearance of firearms belligerents received the opportunity of 
exerting influence on each other at a distance, as a result of 
which troop losses increased and their determination in holding 
positions and their aggressiveness and decisiveness in the 
offensive rose. Fire began to act as the principal "motive 
force" in upgrading forms and methods of preparing and 
conducting combat operations. 
  This was manifested very clearly in the Russo-Japanese War, 
in which new offensive battle tactics were employed under 
conditions of strengthened rifle-machinegun and artillery 
firepower. Decisiveness was reflected in an increased proportion 
of night battles and employment of certain new means of warfare. 
The resourcefulness and inventiveness of Russian soldiers and 
officers were of great importance in increasing combat 
aggressiveness. Thus, in the defense of Port Arthur a method was 
found for throwing round sea mines from fortress fortifications 
into the assaulting Japanese infantry. Hand grenades also were 
used successfully. The world's first models of mortars were 
created with a range of fire up to 500 paces, and the first 
bomb-throwers for firing a six-inch (152-mm) bomb were designed. 
Siegecraft and countermine warfare was employed rather widely. 
  Changes in the nature of battle, its increased duration, 
intensity and spatial scope, and the increased complexity of 
command and control of subunits with the use of thinned extended 
lines on the battlefield sharply increased the role of 
independent actions of initiative by commanders at the tactical 
level. Subsequently this was reflected in the "Ustav polevoy 
sluzhby russkoy armii" [Russian Army Field Service Regulations] 
published in 1912. It instructed: "Every commander and 
rank-and-file soldier is granted independence in executing his 
assigned mission. He should display his own initiative in 
actions in conformity with situation changes if this is 
necessary for achieving a common cause, without awaiting an 
order to himself from the senior commander." 
  Attention also should be given to the fact that the 
aforementioned Regulations included a section on the meeting 
engagement for the first time. This occurred under the influence 
of Russo-Japanese War experience. Prior to this war, neither 
regulations of the Russian Army nor of other European armies 
gave any instructions regarding its conduct. The Russian 
"Nastavleniye dlya deystviya v boyu otryadov iz vsekh rodov 
oruzhiya" [Manual for Actions in Battle by Detachments of All 
Combat Arms] (1904) had only the most general instructions on 
this question. The meeting engagement was viewed as a rare, 
chance phenomenon. Troops did not study this kind of combat in 
exercises and maneuvers. Therefore the circumstance that 
numerous major meeting engagements occurred during the 
Russo-Japanese War in a vast space between the rivers Huanho and 
Shaho in October 1904 was a great surprise to the Russian 
command. Both sides attempted to take the initiative into their 
hands and deprive the enemy of freedom of actions by an assault 
on a selected axis with superior forces. But just like his 
enemy, General Oyama, General A. N. Kuropatkin displayed 
indecisiveness. He extended troops across a broad front out of 
fear of envelopment of the flanks. 
  Conditions for executing a bold maneuver, delivering attacks 
against the enemy flank and rear, and executing surprise close 
and deep envelopments were repeatedly created in meeting 
engagements. But, trained to act only on orders from above, the 
commanders in many cases missed an opportunity for decisive 
actions. 
  Russo-Japanese War experience with respect to development of 
the principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness was reflected 
in field manuals of the Russian and other European armies 
published prior to World War I. The aforementioned Russian 
"Ustav polevoy sluzhby" [Field Service Regulations] (1912) gave 
the main attention to offensive battle. They pointed out: "An 
attack on the enemy serves as the most effective means for 
defeating him." At the same time the Regulations did not deny 
the importance of the defense and recognized a transition to the 
defense to be necessary when the assigned goal could not be 
achieved by the offensive. The Regulations demanded that the 
defense be aggressive and end with the launching of an 
offensive: "In defending, one must strive by all methods and 
means to place the enemy in disarray by fire and, having 
undermined his morale, launch an offensive and defeat him." The 
Regulations paid attention to battle at night and in the 
mountains. But it had no provisions about the need for 
conducting artillery preparation prior to an assault, which was 
taught by Russo-Japanese War experience. Despite certain 
shortcomings, the Field Service Regulations were the best in 
Europe at that time. The German "Infantry Drill Regulations" 
took poor account of the influence of fire. It demanded that the 
infantry attack continuously and move at full height without use 
of the terrain and without digging in. The French "Infantry 
Drill Regulations" (1904) underestimated the increased 
importance in battle not only of artillery, but also of rifle 
and machinegun fire. In the offensive the Regulations provided 
for deploying the infantry into an extended line with an 
interval only of one pace between fighting men. 
  It should be said that the defense was underestimated in 
many 
European armies on the eve of World War I. Thus, it was noted in 
the French "Manual for Senior Troop Commanders" (1914) that, 
having returned to its military traditions (having in mind the 
Napoleonic Wars--I.V.), the French Army "does not 
allow another law in conducting operations than the 
offensive."[.sup]32[/] Such a one-sided approach to assessing 
the kinds of combat operations resulted in no small losses for 
armies in the course of military operations. Mistakes made in 
prewar time had to be corrected on the battlefields. 
  The content of the principle of decisiveness and 
aggressiveness underwent substantial changes in wars of the 20th 
century compared with wars of the 19th century. This was 
dictated by the upgrading of armies' technical outfitting and 
means of command and control and support and by increased scope 
of military operations. In the pre-imperialist period offensive 
and defensive operations usually were accomplished within the 
framework of one engagement, which unfolded on relatively 
limited territory and was waged for a short time. For example, 
the Battle of Borodino in 1812 unfolded on a front of around 8 
km to a depth of up to 6 km and lasted only a few hours. 
  In wars of the 20th century the confrontation of offensive 
and defense took on a more determined and intensive nature. Now 
it was carried on in the form of several successive offensive 
and defensive engagements, which began to develop into a new 
form of military actions, the operation. Thus, in the 
Russo-Japanese War the continuous front of battle reached 75 km 
at Liaoyang and 155 km at Mukden. Depth of the engagement 
increased from 2-4 to 25-50 km, and the duration rose from 1-2 
to 10-17 days. Offensive actions were closely combined with 
defensive ones. 
  In subsequent wars the scope of confrontation of offensive 
and defense increased even more, and the content of the 
principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness also was largely 
updated. World War I began with a meeting clash of large masses 
of troops in the Eastern (Russian) and Western (French) theaters 
of military operations. In not one past war had there been such 
a significant number of meeting engagements as in the maneuver 
period of World War I. This was a result of prewar concepts of 
acting only offensively in war in order to win it in short time 
periods. 
  War subjected prewar theories regarding the meeting 
engagement to a very tough test and introduced much that was new 
to methods of its conduct. Combat experience showed that such an 
engagement is distinguished by fluidity, absence of a continuous 
front, and the presence of exposed flanks, and that success is 
attained in it by the one who acts creatively and with 
initiative, who organizes reconnaissance well and who preempts 
the enemy in deploying, opening fire and maneuvering. 
  Aggressiveness was displayed in the defense with 
unprecedented force. Use of rifle-machinegun and artillery fire 
in combination with the building of engineer obstacles, 
fortification of terrain and execution of counterattacks made 
the defense insurmountable for an attacker. The defense managed 
to withstand his striking power even when new means of 
warfare--tanks and aircraft--appeared. Both field position 
defense as well as defense of fortresses was employed 
successfully during the war. 
  The Russian troops' heroic defense of the Osowiec Fortress 
(1915) serves as an example of high staunchness and 
aggressiveness in holding fortresses. It was characterized by 
the fact that the defenders did not passively sit behind 
fortress fortifications, but undertook aggressive actions and 
constantly harassed the enemy with night sallies and delivery of 
counterattacks. 
  The Germans made the first assault on the fortress in 
February, but it was beaten off. Some time later one assault 
followed another over a period of two weeks, but the garrison 
not only did not waver, at every convenient instance it would 
deliver answering attacks. Convinced that the fortress could not 
be taken by assault, the Germans changed tactics--they began an 
exhausting bombardment of the fortress by heavy artillery and 
put 305-mm howitzers into action. The fortress was almost 
totally demolished, but it held out staunchly. After a half-year 
siege, the Germans undertook a gas-cylinder assault. Around 70 
percent of its defenders perished from fire and gases, and still 
the soldiers found the strength to retake positions by 
counterattacks.[.sup]33[/] Defense of the Osowiec Fortress 
was the prototype of Soviet troops' heroic defense of cities of 
Odessa, Sevastopol, Tula and Stalingrad in the Great Patriotic 
War, a symbol of the Russian soldier's supreme staunchness of 
spirit and resolve. 
  Important trends in development of aggressiveness of the 
defense during World War I were the increase in its depth and in 
anti-artillery, antichemical and antitank stability. There was a 
gradual transition from center-of-resistance defense and an even 
infantry distribution in the first line of trenches to trench 
defense with establishment of sturdy strongpoints and fire 
pockets between them (Fig. 2). 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-34A>             Fig. 2. Alignment of the defense during World War I </FIG>



  Offensive battle tactics were perfected simultaneously with 
development of the defense. An increase in its decisiveness was 
facilitated by the massing of a large amount of artillery in 
breakthrough sectors (160-180 pieces per kilometer of frontage); 
conduct of a powerful, lengthy artillery preparation prior to an 
assault; employment of a gas-cylinder assault in certain 
engagements; the attackers' use of a ramming tank attack to 
breach the enemy defense; an ever increasing buildup of air 
efforts to support attacking troops; conduct of an infantry 
assault following a rolling barrage; and an increased role and 
importance of night battles. 
  But many factors were observed in the course of the war 
which 
reduced effectiveness of the offensive. These were the 
predominance of methodism and linearity in troop actions, 
stereotyped alignment of combat formations and stereotyped use 
of methods of making a breakthrough. Low rates of advance 
resulted. Thus, in the Verdun operation German troops advanced 
at a rate of only 40 meters per day, the Anglo-French on the 
Somme advanced at a rate of 70 meters per day, and only in the 
Amiens operation (1918) for the first time in the entire war did 
the Anglo-French manage to successfully penetrate the enemy 
tactical defensive zone. On the first day they advanced 8 km and 
on the following six days advanced 19 km.[.sup]34[/] 
  On the whole, World War I was a classic example of the 
balance which had formed in the ratio of attack and defense 
means, which led to the sides' lengthy static confrontation. In 
order to find a way out of the positional impasse which had 
formed and give combat operations a decisive character, warring 
armies above all strived to improve their means of warfare and 
create those weapons and combat equipment which would be capable 
of reliably suppressing the defenders' fire plan and providing 
an opportunity for a broad offensive. Tanks and aircraft were 
these means, but they did not decisively influence the overall 
nature of military operations because of their poor combat 
qualities and relatively low numbers. As a result, belligerents 
were forced to be on defense for the greater part of the time, 
and only for eight months (altogether) of the overall length of 
the war (more than 51 months) did they conduct aggressive 
offensive operations on a broad scale.[.sup]35[/] 
  Decisiveness and aggressiveness were characteristic features 
of Red Army troop operations in the Civil War in Russia. M. V. 
Frunze noted: "Almost all significant operations of Civil War 
times bear traces of a manifestation of a spirit of 
aggressiveness and initiative on our side."[.sup]36[/] This 
was determined not by quality of weapons (they were the very 
same as in World War I), but by features of combat operations, 
by the absence of continuous static fronts and, most important, 
by the revolutionary enthusiasm of Red Army men and commanders 
and their initiative and innovativeness in employing decisive, 
mobile methods of warfare. 
  All prewar Red Army field manuals and field service 
regulations were imbued with a spirit of aggressiveness, 
decisiveness and offensiveness. Fighting men and commanders were 
required to display initiative, resourcefulness, determination 
and persistence in achieving the goal. Regulations noted that it 
was not the one who did not achieve success in combat despite 
all measures taken who deserved reproach, but the one who, 
fearing responsibility for failure, let the time slip by, showed 
no initiative, and did not take advantage of all opportunities 
for performing the assigned mission. 
  The aggressiveness, decisiveness and offensiveness of troops 
stemmed from the content of Soviet military doctrine, which 
provided for waging war only on enemy territory and defeating 
him "by a powerful blow" in short time periods. The idea of 
winning victory "with little blood" was so attractive that it 
left no place to be concerned with teaching troops to fight the 
lengthy, exhausting, bloody defensive and offensive battles 
characterizing the war which later came unexpectedly. Here we 
see an example of being excessively carried away by a 
decisiveness which did not correspond to a realistic assessment 
of the enemy and of one's own combat capabilities. 
  An attempt by Soviet commanders to act offensively no matter 
what with the beginning of war, as demanded by the supreme 
military leadership, led to enormous, unjustified losses and a 
sharp deterioration in the troops' situation. Therefore 
decisiveness and aggressiveness should not be an end in 
themselves. In the final account Soviet troops learned to 
skillfully apply this principle in the course of battles. As 
Zhukov noted, "all major offensive and counteroffensive 
operations of Soviet troops beginning with the fall of 1942 were 
distinguished by originality, decisiveness, swiftness and total 
completeness."[.sup]37[/] 
  Just what new things did World War II introduce to the 
content of the principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness? 
Above all we will note that the ratio of attacking forces and 
means of defense shaped up differently in this war than in World 
War I. In many operations the attacker succeeded in achieving a 
decisive fire superiority over the defender, which was the 
result of the changed material base of war. Massive employment 
of aircraft, artillery and tanks in operations in combination 
with increased striking power and firepower of formations 
enabled not only making a quick break-in of the enemy defense, 
but also decisively building up the force of the attack by 
commitment of mobile groupings, turning tactical success into 
operational success. 
  But even under these relatively favorable situation 
conditions, demands of the principle of decisiveness and 
aggressiveness were realized in a difficult, intense struggle. 
Commanders and staffs were required to display high proficiency 
in order to surpass the enemy in employing aggressive forms of 
battle, imposing their will on him, and seizing and holding the 
initiative. 
  The belligerents usually found effective methods of 
opposition rather quickly when enemy tactics changed and new 
methods of warfare appeared. For example, in response to a 
strengthening of striking power and penetration of attacking 
troops, trends began to be reinforced in the defense toward a 
transition from a shallow, center-of-resistance defense to a 
continuous, deeply echeloned trench system of building positions 
and zones, which balanced the sides' capabilities. If the 
attacker attempted to increase rates of advance by massive 
employment of tank troops, the defending side would increase its 
capabilities in response by upgrading the antitank defense 
system--establishing antitank strongpoints, centers and areas to 
the full depth not only of the tactical, but also of the 
operational defense. The sides' competition occurred in a 
similar way in building up attacks from the air and reinforcing 
air defense. 
  The main sphere of the sides' opposition in World War II was 
the struggle to win and hold fire superiority. Decisiveness of 
the offensive and attainment of high rates of penetration, 
pursuit, and nonstop crossing of water obstacles by Soviet 
troops largely were ensured by perfection of methods of fire 
damage of the enemy. Use of the so-called artillery and air 
offensive, which provided effective, continuous fire support to 
attacking infantry and tanks to the full depth of combat mission 
performance, played a major role here. 
  But to counterbalance this the German command began seeking 
more effective methods of counterbattery fire and of conducting 
a counterpreparation, and it began employing deceptive 
procedures more widely to covertly remove its subunits from the 
FEBA into the depth on the eve of Soviet troops' artillery 
preparation of an assault. 
  And although the Great Patriotic War experience largely 
enriched the content of the principle of decisiveness and 
aggressiveness and Soviet commanders set brilliant examples of 
skillful realization of the demands of this principle in 
practice, many negative points also were observed. Decisiveness 
and aggressiveness were not always achieved through art and 
cunning. Reliance was placed most often on achieving a multiple 
superiority in personnel and equipment over the enemy. 
Stereotyped procedures and banality sometimes occurred in 
preparing and conducting the battle. Linear, methodical actions 
often prevailed over maneuver. Some commanders' fear of 
responsibility also told at times, which paralyzed a display of 
initiative. 
  The revision of field manuals did not always keep up with 
the 
development of tactics. For example, in prewar times it was 
believed that a platoon or company commander should draw 
subordinates into the assault by personal example and therefore 
was obligated to be in front of the combat formation. In the 
first period of war this led in practice not to increased 
aggressiveness of actions, but to heavy losses of command 
personnel. 
  Or take another example. Prewar Red Army field manuals 
provided for a deeply echeloned alignment of the combat 
formation in the offensive, beginning with the company and 
ending with the division. It was believed that this created 
conditions for decisive forward movement at an increasing rate. 
But at the beginning of the war the German defense was shallow 
and center-of-resistance. Penetrating it did not require having 
such a considerable number of personnel and equipment in second 
echelons and reserves. In practice this led only to excessive 
personnel losses. It often happened that they suffered heavy 
losses from enemy fire even before commitment. 
  What was new in realizing this principle in modern local 
wars 
was the increased power and depth of fire damage of the enemy; 
wide employment of airmobile troops and airborne and amphibious 
assault forces for creating an aggressively operating front in 
the enemy rear and splitting his grouping into parts; a more 
frequent and broader use in battle than before of new 
weapons--napalm, combat helicopters, guided weapons, MLRS, 
automated reconnaissance and command and control equipment, 
fuel-air explosives, new kinds of engineer obstacles and so on. 
  The result of this was an increase in the decisiveness, 
dynamic nature and mobility of combat operations. Military 
analysts have calculated that while the coefficient of combat 
operations intensity during the Russo-Japanese War was 0.2 and 
in World War I (based on the experience of western countries) it 
was 0.46, then in World War II (based on experience of the 
Soviet-German front) it was 0.88. Based on experience of 
contemporary local wars, it is approaching unity.[.sup]38[/] 
It is apparent from this that the role and importance of the 
principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness in battle has had a 
stable tendency to rise in the course of wars. At the present 
stage of development of military affairs, material preconditions 
have been created for development of this trend, which is 
dictated by the outfitting of troops with qualitatively new 
weapons possessing great range, high destructive power, accuracy 
and mobility, as well as by very sophisticated means of command 
and control and support. 
<H3>  2. Principle of Decisiveness and Aggressiveness in Defensive 
Battle </H3>
  High aggressiveness in combination with the troops' 
determination in holding occupied positions is the principal 
condition for achieving defense stability. Combat practice has 
shown convincingly that waiting and passivity are pernicious for 
a defender. Speaking of the importance of aggressiveness and 
initiative in defense, prominent Soviet military leader General 
of the Army A. V. Gorbatov remarked in a conversation with young 
officers that "this is that weapon which you always have, which 
always will help you get out of a difficult spot, even if it 
theoretically turns out that no way out of the situation at hand 
is evident. . . . Let it not frighten you that the enemy is 
highly experienced and refined and that he surpasses you by many 
times in forces. He still is not all-powerful. Think, organize, 
search well, and you definitely will find his vulnerable spot, 
you will discover his blunder, by taking advantage of which you 
can nullify all his efforts or even rout him."[.sup]39[/] The 
value of this advice is immense--it comes from experience. 
  The correlation and interrelationship of the defense and 
offensive have appeared differently in each war depending on the 
level of development of means of warfare. But one also can 
follow the manifestation of a certain general trend in their 
interrelationship. It is that an ever increasing mutual 
penetration of these kinds of combat operations is occurring. 
Points in time arise more and more often in the offensive where 
it is impossible to get by without defense or to advance without 
consolidation on captured lines. Offensive forms and methods of 
operations are being used more and more widely and fully in the 
defense, which increases the decisiveness of its goals. 
  Many military analysts are inclined to conclude from this 
circumstance that this trend will have even more striking 
development in the future. Thus, the authors of the 
military-theoretical work "Taktika" [Tactics] arrive at the 
conclusion that the contemporary defense is acquiring a new 
quality--in contrast to the past, it is receiving an opportunity 
not only of repelling an attack by superior enemy forces, but 
even of disrupting his offensive.[.sup]40[/] This means that 
its decisiveness is increasing sharply. 
  I assume such a conclusion hardly can be deemed 
unequivocally 
indisputable, for the sides' combat capabilities are each 
growing. This means that a manifestation of decisiveness and 
aggressiveness of the defense inevitably will be opposed by the 
attacking side's determined countermeasures. One also cannot 
fail to take into account that the defense as a kind of combat 
operation not only has strong aspects, but also a certain 
vulnerability. Defending troops are significantly dependent on 
the attacking enemy's actions. 
  Just the circumstance alone in choosing the time, place and 
methods of delivering attacks are on the attacker's side; this 
places the defense in an unequal situation with him. To this 
must be added that, as a rule, the attacking side possesses a 
quantitative or even a qualitative superiority. Hence, it 
becomes understandable that the defense is far from always in a 
position to impose its will on the attacker, inasmuch as it 
chronically experiences an acute shortage of personnel and 
equipment. 
  Opposition of the offense and defense always has been the 
motive force of development of military art in all wars. At the 
present stage it is manifested with special vividness. This 
essentially means that it is necessary to seek new forms and 
methods of displaying aggressiveness and decisiveness in battle 
in order to achieve superiority over the enemy. As shown by 
combat experience, in addition to the advantage taken of 
objective factors, much depends here on the tactical 
creativeness of commanders, staffs and troops. 
  We will refer to the Great Patriotic War experience to 
illustrate this thesis. It is common knowledge that the quality 
of weapons and combat equipment did not undergo any substantial 
changes whatsoever during the War, but the results of battles, 
including also in the defense, can be said to have been striking 
in the first and subsequent periods. Thus, while enemy troops 
managed to advance to a depth of 250-270 km in 67 days of 
defensive battles during the Battle of Moscow, they advanced 
only 120-150 km in 124 days in the Battle of Stalingrad. The 
maximum advance of offensive groupings of fascist German troops 
during the defensive engagement at Kursk did not exceed 35 km. 
  The increased stability of defense by Soviet troops in the 
course of combat operations was largely determined by the fact 
that each time the commanders and staffs tried to find ever more 
improved tactics, this contributed to attaining decisive goals 
in battle. Now, when foreign armies, particularly the U.S. Army 
under the "air-land operation" concept, are seeking methods for 
delivering a deep strike in the offensive in order to paralyze 
enemy actions in a short time by taking advantage of the factor 
of surprise (Fig. 3), the defender's mission is to counter the 
attacker with his own more aggressive methods of opposition; to 
not allow combat formations to be broken up laterally and in 
depth; and to disrupt the enemy's ground and air maneuver. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-38A>             Fig. 3. Essence of the "air-land operation" </FIG>



   Fig. 4 clearly shows the possible forms and methods of 
applying the principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness in the 
defense. Their common characteristic feature is the diversity of 
tactics and the growing role of fire, maneuver and obstacles in 
achieving goals of the defense. And although in terms of 
external characteristics certain methods of conducting a 
defensive battle are indistinguishable from those used during 
World War II, their content has largely been renewed. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-39A>             Fig. 4. Methods of realizing the principle of </FIG>



  Take for example a well-known method such as successive 
delivery of damage on the enemy as he approaches the FEBA and 
wedges into the depth of the defense. Its difference from the 
past is that the defender now has the capability of more 
actively pressuring the enemy in all stages of his preparation 
of the offensive beginning with his troops' concentration in 
attack positions, during forward movement into the assault, and 
ending with the fight to hold defensive positions. 
  The increased range of weapons contributes to this (Fig. 5). 
Thus, in World War I artillery had a range of fire of 
6,000-9,000 m and in a defense could lay down barrage fire ahead 
of the FEBA and use fire basically to exert an effect on combat 
formations of attacking first-echelon regiments. This only 
partially weakened the attacking troops' offensive potential. 
Therefore, hand-to-hand combat played the main role in repelling 
an enemy assault. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-40A>             Fig. 5 [caption missing] </FIG>



  In World War II the range of the bulk of artillery increased 
to 9,000-12,000 m, which enabled the defender to keep the full 
depth of the combat formation of attacking enemy formations 
under fire. Fire aggressiveness and stability of the defense 
increased in connection with this. As a result, there was a 
significant increase in the attacker's losses to the fire of 
defending troops. Hand-to-hand combat was used more rarely. 
  Under present conditions the maximum range of weapons of 
combined arms formations, counting combat helicopters and 
supporting aviation, has increased by 4-5 times compared with 
World War II. The depth of fire strikes has increased 
accordingly. For example, based on NATO troop exercise 
experience, fire engagement of the enemy is planned in the 
division defense to a depth of 80-110 km. This means that, using 
its own assets, a formation now essentially is capable of 
continuously exerting a fire effect not only on the enemy's 
tactical reserves, but also on his immediate operational 
reserves and of keeping him under constant tension. 
  When one takes into account that now not only maximum range, 
but also destructive power and accuracy of weapon strikes have 
increased, it becomes obvious that the defender is capable of 
making wider use of the principle of decisiveness and 
aggressiveness to achieve his goals. 
  But this principle is realized especially effectively in the 
case where a deep combination effect is used on an attacking 
enemy from the ground and air. This is a new form of combat 
aggressiveness in the defense dictated by the appearance of such 
weapons as precision weapons, helicopters, EW assets, and 
equipment for remote mining of terrain. The essence of this 
method of defensive battle is to constrain enemy operations to 
the maximum extent, disorganize his command and control, wear 
him down, inflict losses on him, and reduce his offensive 
groupings' rates of advance by fire. The latter is accomplished 
by landing airborne assault forces and raiding and 
reconnaissance units in the enemy rear, by establishing 
defensive fire barriers on his routes of forward movement, and 
by employing massive electronic jamming. We will emphasize the 
important role in attaining these goals played by defensive fire 
barriers, which are created by remote minelaying equipment, in 
combination with massive fire strikes, delivered by 
reconnaissance-strike complexes, reconnaissance-fire complexes, 
MLRS systems, combat helicopters and artillery. 
  One effective method of displaying combat aggressiveness in 
the defense is to deliberately draw the enemy into a planned 
area (fire pocket) and deliver strikes against him from the 
front, flanks and rear. This is essentially also a new method of 
conducting defensive battle. Although a withdrawal of subunits 
from the FEBA into the depth to deceive the enemy sometimes was 
employed in World War II; first of all it was done on a limited 
scale; secondly, it was done very rarely; and thirdly, at that 
time the defender had no opportunity to deliver a combination 
strike against a wedged-in enemy from different directions, 
including also from the rear. 
  Now, as a result of increased firepower and striking power 
and employment of airborne assault forces, combined arms 
formations more often than before can deliberately create fire 
pockets in order to lure the enemy into them and then decisively 
destroy him by massive artillery fire, strikes by aircraft and 
by reconnaissance-strike and reconnaissance-fire complexes, and 
delivery of surprise flanking counterattacks in combination with 
the landing of airborne assault forces in the enemy rear. 
  Forms and methods of displaying combat aggressiveness in 
fighting the enemy on approaches to the defense now have become 
more decisive and diverse. In principle, even in past wars the 
defender tried to exhaust and wear down the enemy to the maximum 
extent back before he launched an assault, but capabilities for 
this were very limited in World War I due to the short range of 
weapons. But it was then that the need arose for establishing a 
shallow (3-4 km) security area ahead of the FEBA which was 
saturated with various obstacles and covered by artillery fire. 
  A tendency to move the battlefield as far forward as 
possible 
beyond the FEBA saw further development in World War II. This 
was manifested in the fact that the depth of the security area 
increased to 10-12 km and its stability also rose, due to the 
fact that it began to have more thorough engineer preparation 
and rather considerable forces were assigned for its defense. 
  A decisive form of fire aggressiveness such as conducting an 
artillery and air counterpreparation against an offensive enemy 
grouping poised for the attack also began to be employed to 
disrupt an enemy offensive. The Soviet command began organizing 
the counterpreparation already in the first defensive operations 
(in June 1941 on the Northwestern axis), but its effect was 
insignificant due to the fact that the enemy grouping had been 
poorly reconnoitered and there was a shortage of artillery and 
ammunition. 
  Approximately the very same thing was repeated in the Battle 
of Leningrad in September 1941 and in the Battle of Moscow. 
Although in the latter instance counterpreparation was prepared 
more thoroughly by the Western Front command, few personnel and 
equipment were involved in conducting it. The counterpreparation 
mission assigned was to disrupt a possible enemy offensive. For 
this it was planned to use artillery fire to suppress and 
destroy his infantry and tanks in concentration areas and at 
attack positions, suppress enemy artillery and disrupt command 
and control. 
  To this end, detailed counterpreparation plans were worked 
out in the armies which envisaged the involvement not only of 
guns, but also of 82-mm and 120-mm mortars. Thus, on 1 and 2 
October 16th Army artillery in the vicinity of Yartsevo 
conducted a counterpreparation three times lasting up to 10 
minutes on a front of 10 km with a density of 30 guns per 
kilometer of front and with an expenditure of 0.3 units of fire. 
Its results could not be determined, since the enemy was not 
attacking on this axis.[.sup]41[/] 
  Artillery counterpreparation was conducted several times 
during the defensive battles at Stalingrad. Its duration usually 
was 40-60 minutes and consisted of 2-3 fire assaults (5-10 
minutes each) and battery fire for suppression. As a result, the 
enemy assault managed to be disrupted on certain 
axes.[.sup]42[/] 
  The experience of conducting an artillery counterpreparation 
in the Battle of Kursk in the defense zone of Central and 
Voronezh fronts deserves special attention. It was set to last 
30-40 minutes. A considerable amount of artillery was involved 
in the counterpreparation. Thus, in 13th Army it reached 1,100 
guns, mortars and combat vehicles, which provided a density of 
36 weapons per kilometer of front. Overall ammunition 
expenditure was specified as 0.25 units of fire. Aircraft took 
part in the counterpreparation. In assessing results of the 
counterpreparation, Zhukov wrote: "It should be said that the 
artillery staffs and all artillery commanders of fronts, armies 
and formations worked well and wisely to organize the artillery 
defense and counterpreparation."[.sup]43[/] 
  Under present conditions opportunities are being created for 
increasing the effectiveness of counterpreparation fire and 
organizing it in shorter time periods. The involvement of 
precision weapons, reconnaissance-strike and reconnaissance-fire 
complexes, a more significant amount of MLRS, and also front and 
army aviation contributes to this. 
  We will note that already in the past war defending troops 
sometimes delivered an attack ahead of the FEBA to exploit 
results of the counterpreparation with the goal of causing 
confusion in enemy ranks, disorienting him with respect to one's 
plans, and reinforcing the effect of the fire strike. 
  Such aggressive actions by defenders can receive wider scope 
under present conditions. For example, sometimes along with the 
delivery of a surprise counterattack against the enemy, it is 
possible to simultaneously land an airborne assault force in his 
rear and organize operations by raiding and reconnaissance 
parties in order to divert or dissipate the attacker's combat 
efforts and weaken or disrupt his attack. 
  Troops may use all forms and methods of aggressive 
operations 
during the battle to hold the main defense area. Main efforts 
are directed above all at holding the FEBA. As is apparent from 
Table 1, decisive disruption of the enemy assault requires 
disabling 50-60 percent of his personnel and combat equipment. 
With the degree of fire damage at 30 percent, there is a 40 
percent probability of the enemy giving up the assault. 


Table 1 - Probability of Enemy Giving Up the Assault as a Function of 
the Level of Personnel and Combat Equipment Losses Suffered (based on 
tactical exercise experience) 

Magnitude of      10     20     30     40     50     55     60     70 
personnel 
losses and 
disabling of 
enemy combat 
equipment, % 

Probability of    4      14     38     65     88     95     97     99 
enemy 
discontinuing 
assault, % 


  Methods of displaying combat aggressiveness during troop 
defense operations in the main and subsequent defense zones 
depend on the goals set, the sides' force ratio, and other 
situational conditions. In those cases where the mission 
assigned is to firmly hold occupied positions by a stiff 
position defense, fire aggressiveness basically prevails in 
order to prevent a breakthrough of enemy tanks and motorized 
infantry across the FEBA and to isolate the battlefield from an 
influx of his reserves from the depth. A stubborn fight must be 
waged for every strongpoint, hill, and road junction. Every 
meter of enemy advance must come to him with a fight and be 
accompanied by heavy losses. 
  In the past, counterattacks were one of the chief forms of 
displaying combat aggressiveness in conducting a position 
defense. It must be said that in the Great Patriotic War they 
were conducted by Soviet troops very often, but not always 
successfully, especially in the first period of war. 
  Here we are dealing with that case where aggressiveness 
became an end in itself. The sources of this subjectivist 
approach to displaying combat aggressiveness in the defense 
originated in prewar times, when the offensive idea was 
insistently advanced in all regulation documents--crush the 
enemy by a powerful attack in short time periods. For example, 
here is how this concept was interpreted in the prewar textbook 
"Obshchaya taktika" [General Tactics], which noted: "The 
guarantee of victory in the defense is supreme aggressiveness 
and decisiveness of operations, consisting of the troops and 
their commanders unceasingly striving not only to hold up the 
attacker, but also to inflict a crushing blow on 
him."[.sup]44[/] 
  In practice, with the beginning of military operations this 
developed into a situation where our division and regimental 
commanders were forced to act aggressively in accordance with 
the operations plan even in difficult, vague circumstances, when 
the enemy surpassed our troops many times in tanks and 
artillery, and when his aircraft had undivided rule of the air. 
To seize the initiative they would throw the troops against the 
enemy and would organize counterattacks clearly doomed to 
failure. 
  Under present conditions counterattacks by no means have 
lost 
their importance as a method of inflicting defeat on the enemy 
and restoring a lost position. But in making the decision to 
conduct them, we must weigh everything dozens of times and 
calculate what is more advantageous--repulse an assault of enemy 
tanks and infantry by fire from in place or throw subunits out 
to meet him. A counterattack that is insufficiently prepared 
with respect to fire, especially in those cases where the enemy 
has not been halted and has a clear superiority in personnel and 
equipment, can lead to excessive losses and worsen the 
defender's situation. 
  The simplest calculations show that a motorized rifle 
battalion is capable of repelling an assault of up to an enemy 
brigade by fire from in place, while it can rout only a company 
in delivering a counterattack. But this does not mean that one 
should reject counterattacks entirely. This would be incorrect, 
inasmuch as a situation may take shape in battle where it is 
possible to improve the situation at hand only by delivering a 
counterattack. 
  We will dwell in more detail on applying the principle of 
decisiveness and aggressiveness in a mobile defense, as this 
question has been less studied in our military theory. The 
mobile defense largely differs from the position defense in 
goals and methods of attaining them. It is conducted most often 
as a forced measure in a difficult, often critical situation 
against enemy forces that are many times superior. Therefore 
commanders, staffs and troops are required to display special 
skills so that they compensate for an acute shortage of 
personnel and equipment, win time, and exhaust and wear down the 
attacker by delaying actions on a number of lines favorable for 
defense. 
  Forms and methods of aggressive operations employed by 
Soviet 
troops in a mobile defense during the Great Patriotic War were 
not distinguished by great diversity. Units and subunits tried 
to damage the enemy chiefly by fire as he approached the FEBA 
and then, without taking matters to a decisive assault, would 
break contact with him, disengage and withdraw to the next 
defensive line in the depth, where these operations usually were 
repeated. Now the increased fire, attack and maneuver 
capabilities of combined arms formations and units permit 
significantly broadening and enriching tactics being used in 
order to immobilize the attacker's initiative, constantly wear 
him down and disrupt or hamper maneuver by harassing actions, 
and mislead him regarding one's true intentions by means of 
deceptive methods (Fig. 6). 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-43A>             Fig. 6. Forms and methods of tactical operations </FIG>



  Under present conditions it appears possible to make wider 
use of an effective method of combating the enemy, such as 
ambush operations. Ambushes were employed rather skillfully by 
Soviet troops in the mobile defense even in the Great Patriotic 
War. Thus, in January 1945 subunits of 110th Tank Brigade 
repelled up to ten enemy tank attacks during the day by fire 
from ambushes and thereby supported the withdrawal of 18th Tank 
Corps and its organized transition to a defense northwest of 
Budapest.[.sup]45[/] But at that time ambushes were set up 
primarily in immediate proximity of the FEBA, in gaps, and on 
strongpoint flanks and were insufficiently mobile. 
  Now the aggressiveness of fire ambushes is growing 
considerably in connection with the fact that not only tank and 
motorized rifle subunits can be involved in establishing them, 
but also combat helicopters, IFV's, APC's, ATGM systems, air 
defense systems and self-propelled guns. Helicopter ambushes, 
for example, can be set up on distant approaches to the defense. 
Other kinds of fire ambushes can be established throughout the 
zone or in a sector of the defense. 
  Roving tanks, IFV's, APC's, guns and mortars play an 
important role in increasing the aggressiveness of a mobile 
defense. Their wide, skillful use in a system of ambushes, as 
well as in strongpoints and in the space between positions, 
increases the tenacity and effectiveness of the fire plan and 
helps mislead enemy reconnaissance. Fire pockets may be set up 
in a mobile defense more often than before. Any opportunity is 
used to set them up: A favorable configuration of the front 
line; a gap between strongpoints; approaches to commanding 
heights and populated points; chokepoints; valleys; gorges and 
so on. Essentially all kinds of small arms are used in 
establishing fire pockets. Not only the regimental commander, 
but also every company and battalion commander can set up fire 
pockets with his own personnel and equipment. 
  In addition to fire pockets, an operational pocket can be 
established in an operational-level defense by decision of the 
large strategic formation commander to draw an enemy offensive 
grouping into it and defeat it by delivering surprise flanking 
counterthrusts. 
  It is typical that offensive forms of operations can be used 
in the course of a mobile defense in order to activate it; 
especially those such as landing airborne assault forces and 
assault teams in the enemy rear; sending out enveloping and 
raiding detachments; and conducting counterattacks and 
counterthrusts. Bold, daring raids through enemy rear areas made 
by air assault detachments are especially effective. Their 
surprise raids on columns; command and control facilities; 
weapons; air defense, EW and reconnaissance assets; and rear and 
other installations are capable of spreading disorganization in 
enemy actions and in the command and control of his troops and 
weapons, and substantially hampering maneuver capability. 
  With respect to counterattacks, there are many features in 
their conduct in a mobile defense. In contrast to a position 
defense, in a mobile defense they usually are delivered more 
often, but with small forces and briefly, and their success is 
not exploited. The main goal of counterattacks is to support the 
disengagement of defending subunits. Delivering a surprise 
attack on the enemy considerably contributes to this. 
  It is not difficult to notice that the basis of all tactics 
examined which are employed in a modern defense is a broad 
maneuver of fire, personnel and equipment. It is important that 
it be swift and preemptive in nature. An attacking enemy's 
efforts will be successfully nullified only when he is late in 
deploying, in delivering a fire strike, in executing regroupings 
and in building up efforts. 
<H3>  3. Principle of Decisiveness and Aggressiveness in Offensive 
Battle and the Meeting Engagement </H3>
  Decisiveness and aggressiveness reflect the main qualitative 
feature of the offensive. As the history of warfare shows, 
however, with each new stage in development of means of warfare 
it becomes more and more difficult for the attacking side to 
achieve superiority over the defense, whose stability and 
aggressiveness increase simultaneously with the growth in 
penetrating power of attacking troops. 
  Fig. 7 schematically shows certain ways and methods of 
realizing requirements of the principle of decisiveness and 
aggressiveness in offensive battle and the meeting engagement. 
The paramount task which arises for troops in offensive battle 
and the meeting engagement is to seize and hold the initiative 
of operations. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-44A>             Fig. 7. Methods of realizing the principle of </FIG>



  The attacking side has an important advantage in this 
respect. It is capable of choosing the time, place and methods 
of delivering attacks at its discretion. This creates 
preconditions for dictating one's will on the enemy. But the 
first-strike advantage usually is not retained for long. It can 
be lost if the attacker displays indecisiveness and sluggishness 
in actions, which enables the defender to recover from the 
attack and organize a stubborn resistance. 
  Combat experience shows that even the "argument of force," 
i.e., the superiority in personnel and equipment established on 
the main axis, may not play its role in such a situation. Here 
is an example. In the Volkhov operation in the summer of 1943 a 
superiority over the enemy was achieved in the breakthrough 
sector of 12th Guards Rifle Division as follows: 1:3.5 in 
battalions, 1:5 in guns and 1:3 in tanks. But this did not 
ensure success. During the assault, division units succeeded in 
taking only two enemy trenches, after which their advance was 
halted. 
  This happened because sluggishness was shown in taking 
advantage of the results of fire, much time was lost negotiating 
engineer obstacles ahead of the FEBA, and the infantry assault 
was listless. Taking advantage of this, the enemy managed to 
restore the disrupted fire plan and soon also undertake a 
counterattack. 
  The commander of 69th Army's 312th Rifle Division acted 
differently in the Vistula-Oder operation in January 1945. 
Despite the fact that superiority over the enemy in the division 
zone of advance was minimal (1:2.5 in infantry, 1:2.3 in tanks 
and 1:2.4 in artillery), success of the units' operations was 
significant. On the very first day the division advanced 12 km. 
This was achieved because the division commander acted boldly 
and decisively. He succeeded in ensuring covertness in preparing 
the offensive, carefully organizing for battle, and mobilizing 
the personnel to display high aggressiveness in combat. 
  Here is how the commander taught inexperienced soldiers to 
act during the assault. He said: "The important thing is to rise 
up for the assault promptly. . . . Remember: The enemy has not 
yet collected himself in the first minute after artillery 
preparation; in the second minute the enemy feels himself to see 
whether or not he is whole; in the third minute he searches for 
weapons and fires. We are 300-400 m from the enemy. A fighting 
man walks 120 paces and runs 250 paces per minute. That means in 
the first two minutes you will be hitting an enemy who has not 
come to his senses. But if you delay just for a minute or a 
half-minute, the enemy will greet you with fire."[.sup]46[/] 
  At the present time, in contrast to the past, conditions are 
being created for increasing the decisiveness of an assault. In 
the past war it was executed in dismounted formation and its 
rate was low, in the best case 800-1,000 m/hr, and the depth of 
a penetration assault was 2-3 km. Based on exercise experience, 
now in an assault in IFV's (APC's) without the personnel 
dismounting the rate of forward movement in penetrating a 
deliberate defense is 3-4 km/hr and the average daily rate is 
20-25 km. 
  Decisiveness of operations in the offensive and in a meeting 
engagement largely depends on how rapidly troops succeed in 
creating fire superiority over the enemy. This task is 
extraordinarily complex. A modern defense possesses high 
firepower. Its saturation with various weapons has increased by 
2-4 times compared with World War II. Their mobility and 
firepower increased sharply and the maximum range of weapons 
rose by 3-5 times (Table 2). They are capable of exerting 
pressure on an attacking grouping to its full depth. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2 - Maximum Reach of Weapons of Foreign Armies[.sup]47[/]            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |Maximum range of engagem-|                         | 
|                         |ent (km) with convention-|                         | 
|                         |al ammunition            |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Weapons                  |World War II             |Postwar period (1980's)  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Field artillery          |5-20                     |20-30                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rocket launchers (MLRS)  |5-10                     |30-40                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Antitank guns, ATGM syst-|0.8-1.1                  |1-6                      | 
|ems                      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tactical aviation        |150-200                  |1,000                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Operational-tactical mis-|320                      |80-720                   | 
|sile systems             |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Army aviation (antitank  |-                        |250-345                  | 
|helicopters)             |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|J-SAK reconnaissance-str-|-                        |300-400                  | 
|ike complexes            |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|PLSS reconnaissance-stri-|-                        |500-600                  | 
|ke complexes             |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Air-launched cruise miss-|-                        |550                      | 
|iles                     |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ground-launched cruise m-|370                      |2,600                    | 
|issiles                  |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  For example, here is how the depth of weapon effect is 
distributed in the U.S. Army defense in accordance with the 
"air-land operation" concept. A zone of fire of from 1 to 30-40 
km is assigned for artillery, including MLRS, from 10-15 to 
60-70 km for tactical missile systems, from 50-70 to 400-1,000 
km for operational missile systems, up to 300-400 km for J-SAK 
reconnaissance-strike complexes, 300-500 km or more for tactical 
aviation and up to 20-70 km for combat helicopters. 
  The ratio of offensive and defensive weapons now is such 
that 
it permits drawing the conclusion that their opposition will 
take on an especially intensive character. The "fire tenacity" 
of the defense has increased many times and now it is not enough 
to disorganize the artillery-mortar fire plan in order for an 
attacker to be able to dictate his will on the enemy; this 
requires deep engagement of targets, above all precision weapon 
systems--reconnaissance-strike and reconnaissance-fire 
complexes, nuclear attack weapons, combat helicopters, EW 
assets, as well as remote minelaying equipment. 
  We will note that the striving to increase the depth of 
effect on the enemy also was clearly displayed in Soviet troop 
operations in the Great Patriotic War. While the defense was 
suppressed to a depth of 2.5-3 km by massed artillery fire in 
offensive operations of 1941-1942 and to a depth of 3-4 km in 
operations of 1943, during 1944-1945 the depth of simultaneous 
suppression of the enemy defense increased to 6-8 km and in the 
concluding operations it often reached 15 km or 
more.[.sup]48[/] 
  Under present conditions deep fire engagement should take in 
enemy weapons situated both in the tactical as well as 
operational zone of his defense. This is determined by the fact 
that the bulk of enemy weapons are situated at a considerable 
depth from the troops' line of contact. Thus, the experience of 
NATO Allied Forces exercises held in the 1980's showed that 
field artillery firing positions in the defense of formations 
are assigned at a distance of 3-5 km, firing positions of 
artillery employing Copperhead and SADARM guided projectiles 
8-10 km, and MLRS 10-25 km from the FEBA; helicopters with 
jammers operate from zones 10-15 km from the line of contact; 
control centers for J-SAK reconnaissance-strike complexes are 
situated at a distance of 30-50 km, facilities of the TACELIS 
and REMBASS reconnaissance systems at a distance of 30-160 km, 
and loiter zones of aircraft of the PLSS, AWACS and Nimrod 
systems at a distance of 30-160 km from the FEBA.[.sup]49[/] 
  The depth of fire engagement in the offensive increases 
accordingly. American specialists assert that the depth of the 
zone of simultaneous combat effect by organic and attached 
weapons should be 15 km for brigade, 70 km for division, 150 km 
for army corps and 300-500 km or more for army 
group.[.sup]50[/] Within limits of these zones the priority 
in fire engagement is given to continuous fire effect on nuclear 
attack weapons, precision weapon systems, facilities for command 
and control of troops and weapons, and targets of the enemy 
first and second echelons, which creates a precondition for 
disorganizing his fire plan. 
  Decisiveness in the struggle to win fire superiority over 
the 
enemy is manifested in preempting him in delivering deep fire 
strikes. There now are capabilities for this. Integration of 
weapons, reconnaissance equipment and command and control 
equipment in an automated system permits fire damage of the 
enemy in real or near-real time. Thus, adoption of the TACFIRE 
field artillery automated control system in U.S. Army formations 
enabled reducing fire planning time in the division from 2 hours 
to 2 minutes, and fire preparation time in the artillery 
battalion from 30 minutes to 1-2 minutes.[.sup]51[/] 
  J-SAK and PLSS reconnaissance-strike complexes possess even 
greater speed. In a matter of seconds they can detect enemy 
targets, identify them by type, issue a target designation on 
them to appropriate weapons and deliver precise, powerful fire 
strikes against the detected targets, including small moving 
ones. Pave Tiger drones also are used in an automatic mode. They 
perform an automatic search, detection, identification and 
precise destruction of air defense system radars and aircraft 
guidance radars from alert duty zones. 
  In order to achieve decisiveness and high rates in 
conducting 
an attack, it is necessary to achieve a high degree of fire 
damage of various targets in the defense. The Great Patriotic 
War experience showed that in a breakthrough it was necessary to 
destroy as a minimum up to 25 percent and suppress around 30 
percent of various targets situated in the first and second 
positions of the enemy's main defensive zone. That degree of 
fire damage now is no longer enough. 
  Such targets as means of nuclear attack, precision weapon 
systems, and facilities for command and control of troops and 
weapons must be damaged with a degree of up to 100 percent, and 
the other targets with no less a degree than 70-75 percent; 
otherwise the defender may disrupt the attack. 
  A question arises on how to attain such a high degree of 
fire 
damage if the attacker's capabilities for creating high 
artillery densities in a penetration are very limited. The only 
way to increase effectiveness of fire damage of the enemy is to 
achieve the delivery of precise, aimed strikes against targets 
and exclude the "area" suppression method. This will enable a 
significant reduction in numbers of artillery, missile 
launchers, aircraft and helicopters as well as the amount of 
ammunition used for this purpose. 
  Performance of this mission is facilitated by the fact that 
weapon accuracy now has increased sharply. For example, range 
tests showed that employment of Copperhead and SADARM precision 
artillery projectiles permits reducing ammunition expenditure by 
10-15 times. It is also the very same in aviation--use of the 
LAD guided air-dropped clusters enables reducing the expenditure 
of aerial bombs by 4-5 times. 
  An increased power of munitions largely contributes to 
effective performance of the fire damage mission. Based on 
foreign press data, the power of fuel-air explosives used by 
armies of the anti-Iraq coalition during Operation Desert Storm 
(1991) were close to a low-yield nuclear weapon in force. This 
also helps considerably decrease artillery and air densities in 
the offensive. 
  Successfully combating enemy helicopters is a new component 
element of winning fire superiority. At the present time many 
foreign armies view combat helicopters as one of the important 
means of increasing decisiveness and aggressiveness in battle. 
In the defense they are assigned to perform a mission such as 
destroying the attacker's weapons--field artillery, army 
aviation, tanks and EW assets. 
  Combating helicopters presents no small amount of 
difficulty. 
Their operations are characterized by covertness of the target 
approach, swiftness and surprise in delivering a strike, and 
high accuracy of engaging targets at long range without having 
the platform enter the impact zone of air defense weapons. Based 
on the experience of local wars and exercises, helicopters have 
proven themselves to be a highly effective means of combating 
armored targets. For example, a company of helicopters with TOW 
ATGM's is capable of destroying 80-100 tanks in one sortie. 
  In NATO troop exercise strikes by mixed aircraft-helicopter 
elements (ground attack aircraft and strike and reconnaissance 
helicopters) are widely practiced for direct air support of 
combined arms formations. In Operation Desert Storm methods of 
operations were employed, such as successive delivery of strikes 
against tanks and air defense weapons with a lengthy effect on 
the enemy and simultaneous strikes by helicopters, artillery and 
aircraft against one or more targets. 
  Combat practice and exercise experience attest to the fact 
that high helicopter mobility permits combined arms commanders 
to decisively mass fire at the necessary moment against the most 
important targets and transfer it from one axis to another in 
the shortest time periods in order to win and hold fire 
superiority. Concentrated strikes by helicopters usually are 
delivered at the most important moments of battle: Repulse of an 
assault by major tank forces, commitment of a second echelon, 
assault crossing of water obstacles. 
  All this indicates that without successfully combating enemy 
helicopters it is impossible to achieve high decisiveness and 
aggressiveness in offensive battle and the meeting engagement. 
The antihelicopter warfare system is laid down in planning the 
battle and in organizing interworking and comprehensive support. 
Measures taken for this purpose include prompt detection of 
helicopters and warning subunits of the possibility of their 
delivering strikes. The most likely strike delivery lines are 
determined in order to combat enemy helicopters, and necessary 
weapons are assigned for destroying helicopters in concentration 
areas, assembly areas and at tactical positions. Small arms 
fire, particularly antiaircraft machineguns of tank subunits 
when helicopters are in their zone of effective fire, is of no 
small importance in combating helicopters. 
  Skillful choice of effective methods of defeating the enemy 
plays a special role in realizing the principle of decisiveness 
and aggressiveness in the offensive and in the meeting 
engagement. The attacker's attempt to paralyze the defender's 
actions by delivering strikes against him from different 
directions--front, flanks and rear--was observed long ago. Such 
a method enables dissipating enemy forces and creating 
conditions for breaking up his grouping and defeating it in 
detail. But with formation of a continuous static front, such 
conditions in the two world wars were presented to troops 
primarily in a meeting engagement or in the dynamics of combat 
operations, when the attacker employed maneuver and took 
advantage of gaps which had formed and of exposed flanks in the 
enemy combat alignment. 
  In breaking through an enemy defense prepared in advance and 
well fortified in the engineer sense, the attacker was forced to 
methodically "gnaw through" it, gradually grinding down his 
personnel and equipment. Under such conditions mobile operations 
were extremely limited. Still, as the troops' attack potential 
built up, the attacker tried to increase the aggressiveness of 
operations by delivering frontal attacks against the enemy 
across a broad front on a number of axes. But at that time this 
was the prerogative only of the operational echelon. 
  Now the situation has changed. Combined arms formations have 
the capability of employing very decisive methods of defeating 
the enemy, such as delivering splitting attacks from the front 
by forces of tank and motorized rifle units on one or two axes 
in combination with a simultaneous landing of airborne assault 
forces in the enemy rear, and also with swift penetrations by 
mobile units and subunits--forward, enveloping and raiding 
detachments--into the depth of the defense. This permits 
paralyzing the defender's operations, constraining the maneuver 
of his reserves and creating preconditions for their swift 
defeat in detail. 
  In a meeting engagement, when the enemy has exposed flanks, 
a 
combination ground-air strike can be delivered both from the 
front as well as from the flanks. As shown by exercise 
experience, a special effect is produced by a two-sided deep 
envelopment of the enemy with a move into his deep rear in 
combination with operations by a tactical airborne assault force. 
  Speaking of realizing the principle of decisiveness in the 
offensive, one cannot fail to take into account those 
difficulties which arise in this connection, especially in 
overcoming a stable antitank defense. Already in World War II 
the antitank defense was the "backbone" of the entire defense 
system. It was established to the full tactical and operational 
depth. The density of antitank weapons on the most important 
axes reached 20-30 or more. Under present conditions the 
importance of an antitank defense has grown even more and, what 
is especially important, the majority of antitank weapons are 
armored and self-propelled. The number of such targets in 
formations of foreign armies is constantly increasing (Table 3). 


Table 3 - Number of Armored Antitank Weapons in U.S. Divisions[.sup]52[/] 

Antitank          Inf Div      Inf Div      Mech    Mech    Mech    Mech 
Weapons           1945-1954    1954-1960    Div     Div     Div     Div-86 
                                            1967    1972    1985 

Tanks             144          125          254     243     252     290 

ATGM system       -            -            -       -       108     60 
combat vehicle 

IFV, combat       -            -            -       -       -       400 
reconnaissance 
vehicle with 
ATGM system 

Armored           -            -            76      149     54      84 
self-propelled 
artillery, MLRS 


Total             144          125          330     392     415     834 


  As is apparent from the table's data, while the number of 
armored antitank weapons in the U.S. mechanized division was 415 
in 1985, their number became 834 in the division of the modern 
organization. This led to a significant increase in density of 
these weapons in defense. Thus, based on experience of NATO 
Allied Forces exercises conducted in the 1980's, the average 
density of antitank weapons on the most important axes in the 
defense was 70-90 per kilometer of frontage. This is 2-3 times 
higher than in World War II. 
  But it is not only a matter of an increased number of 
antitank weapons in combined arms formations; it is also a 
matter of their qualitative upgrading. In the late 1950's a new, 
very effective antitank weapon--antitank guided missiles 
possessing a high probability of hitting a tank and high 
reliability of killing it--appeared and became widespread. The 
experience of local wars showed that ATGM's had taken a leading 
place among other antitank weapons. Thus, while in World War II 
troops suffered the main tank losses from the fire of antitank 
tube artillery, in the Arab-Israeli War (1973) these losses, 
distinguished by a previously unknown scale, were distributed as 
follows: More than half from ATGM's, up to 22 percent from tank 
fire, and around 28 percent from strikes by aircraft and other 
weapons.[.sup]53[/] 
  Now many armies have three generations of guided missiles in 
the inventory. While the accuracy of first-generation ATGM's was 
0.5-0.6, that of subsequent generations was 0.8-0.9. At the 
present time, engaging armored targets by direct laying is based 
on the principle of "find-fire-kill." It is typical that ATGM's 
are set up not only on mobile ground platforms, but also 
airborne platforms. As a result, very effective missile systems 
have been created on combat helicopters and IFV's, which 
increased the defense's antitank stability even more. But the 
arsenal of antitank defense weapons is not exhausted by this. In 
addition to ATGM's, tanks and antitank artillery, an important 
role in engaging armored targets is played by 
reconnaissance-strike and reconnaissance-fire complexes, 
robotized antitank missile systems, drones, fuel-air explosives, 
remote minelaying equipment and so on. 
  In connection with the sharp increase in antitank stability 
of the modern defense, its decisive surmounting demands a search 
for new, more effective methods. All personnel and equipment 
which the attacker has are used for this. Inasmuch as the 
majority of antitank weapons have armor protection, as already 
noted, destroying them requires delivering accurate, aimed 
strikes essentially against each armored target. 
Reconnaissance-strike and reconnaissance-fire complexes capable 
of quickly detecting targets and delivering a strike against 
them in a matter of seconds play an important role in 
accomplishing this mission. 
  New weapons are being developed and existing ones upgraded 
to 
increase the effectiveness of air strikes against armored 
targets. Cluster munitions filled with submunitions having 
individual systems for homing on targets are considered the most 
promising. Thus, the Skeet submunition, equipped with a thermal 
homing system, is intended for hitting an armored target in the 
most vulnerable spot (the roof). An important feature of the 
submunitions is their capability to turn into antitank mines 
when they fall to the ground. Air-to-ground guided missiles, 
free-flight rockets, aerial bombs, and pod dispensers which can 
be suspended from all types of attack aircraft are filled with 
such submunitions. 
  According to foreign press reports, in Operation Desert 
Storm 
U.S. aircraft employed such methods of delivering strikes with 
aircraft precision weapons as a "pocket strike," "a toss into 
the electronic basket over the battlefield," "delayed-attack 
strike," "swarming attack," and so on. In the assessment of 
foreign military experts, use of new weapons, 
reconnaissance-strike and reconnaissance-fire complexes, and 
combat helicopters with optimum operating methods reduces the 
requisite detail of aircraft forces and other weapons assigned 
to destroy antitank weapons in the enemy defense by 20-30 times. 
  Disrupting the enemy antitank defense system requires 
suppressing (destroying) or neutralizing 70-80 percent of his 
antitank weapons back in the period of fire preparation of the 
assault. Taking into account their considerable range (5-6 km), 
it is necessary to suppress antitank weapons to the depth of two 
positions simultaneously. Results of fire strikes against 
antitank targets must be exploited without delay by attacking 
tank and motorized rifle subunits. The swifter the assault, the 
fewer losses the attacker will suffer and the faster he will 
gain an opportunity to surmount the zone of massed, continuous, 
multilayered enemy antitank fire. Tactical exercise experience 
shows that with an increase in the pace of the attack by 1.5 
times, attacking subunits' losses from enemy fire dropped by 2-3 
times.[.sup]54[/] 
  The principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness is linked 
inseparably with attaining continuity of development of the 
offensive battle and meeting engagement and high rates of 
pursuit of the enemy; with nonstop assault crossing of water 
obstacles; and with the troops' ability to fight with maximum 
exertion of forces at any time of day or year, in any weather, 
and quickly surmount the obstacles and natural barriers they 
encounter. Zhukov noted that "swiftness is the principal means 
for fastest defeat of the enemy. It is necessary to act so 
swiftly that the enemy is late here, there and everywhere. It is 
necessary to learn this and to bring up our troops on it. Our 
technical outfitting permits us to execute the boldest and 
swiftest attacks."[.sup]55[/] 
  A characteristic feature of modern offensive battle is that 
it usually takes in the entire tactical depth of the enemy 
defense simultaneously. Under such conditions subunits must be 
able to conduct deep battle in his rear, acting for a lengthy 
time in isolation from the main body; make daring deep and close 
envelopments and surprise raids on staffs and weapon firing 
(launch) positions; intercept his lines of communication; and 
fight forward-moving reserves and airmobile subunits. It is 
important not to displace enemy groupings from one position to 
another, but to split them, surround them and destroy them in 
detail. 
  Commanders and staffs at all levels must unremittingly "keep 
their hands on the pulse of events" by displaying high mobility 
and promptly build up efforts on those axes where success has 
appeared. It is important not to give the enemy an opportunity 
to restore a disrupted fire and obstacle plan or to execute a 
planned regrouping of personnel and equipment laterally and out 
of the depth. The initiative of actions and command and control 
should be held firmly by commanders in any situation. 
  During the Great Patriotic War the Soviet command attached 
special importance to aggressive troop operations in the course 
of exploiting a breakthrough and in the pursuit. One directive 
of a tank army commander instructed: "Successful mission 
performance depends above all on swiftness, boldness and 
decisiveness of your actions. . . . Do not be afraid to break 
away from the infantry, swiftly move forward, boldly destroy 
individual enemy centers, and spread panic among his 
troops."[.sup]56[/] 
  But during the war our commanders did not always make 
skilled 
use of the principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness in their 
actions. In the book "V nachale voyny" [At the Beginning of the 
War] A. I. Yeremenko describes the following episode. In August 
1941 a serious situation took shape for Soviet troops in the 
vicinity of Bryansk. Having seized Unecha Station, the Germans 
cut 13th Army maneuver routes and created a threat of its 
encirclement. To disrupt the fascists' plans and restore the 
lost position, the Bryansk Front command sent the 55th Cavalry 
Division into the enemy rear. It successfully penetrated into 
the depth of the fascist German troop disposition. Division 
reconnaissance determined the Germans' total unconcern: Their 
columns were moving forward near our units often without 
security. But the division command lost valuable time and took 
no actions, awaiting instructions of the senior commander. 
Having spent around a week in all in the enemy rear, the 
division returned without having performed the assigned mission, 
although it had all opportunities for this -- it was well manned 
and armed.[.sup]57[/] 
  Commitment of second echelons of units and formations was 
the 
principal means of exploiting success in the past war. Already 
in the battle for the first position of the enemy defense it was 
necessary to put to use not only second echelons of regiments, 
but also often of divisions. The breakthrough of the main 
defense zone usually was accomplished with great difficulties. 
In many operations it was necessary to commit mobile groups of 
armies or even of fronts to complete its breakthrough. This 
reduced rates of development of the operation. 
  Now flexible massing of fire on a decisive axis is the 
principal condition for a successful buildup of combat efforts. 
Surprise fire strikes can disrupt the enemy's attempts to 
organize the closing of breaches which have formed or carry out 
a planned withdrawal of his troops to prepared lines and the 
maneuver of reserves. The western press notes that surprise in 
delivering a strike is the equivalent of increasing the assets 
participating in it by 2.5 times.[.sup]58[/] 
  Fire strikes, even those delivered against deep targets of 
the defense, must be exploited by the troops without delay. An 
important role here belongs to tactical airborne assault forces 
and to forward, enveloping and raiding detachments. The Great 
Patriotic War experience showed that bold raids through enemy 
rears even by small subunits are capable of significantly 
facilitating successful execution of a combat mission by a unit 
or formation. For example, success of the 1st and 2nd guards 
tank corps in the East Prussian operation in 1945 to defeat the 
German Insterburg-Gumbinnen grouping was ensured by decisive 
operations of tank platoons commanded by Senior Lieutenant I. P. 
Kondrashin and Junior Lieutenant I. S. Malov. In fierce fighting 
they captured bridges across the Pregel River, which was 
difficult to cross.[.sup]59[/] Conferral of the Hero of the 
Soviet Union title was a worthy reward for the daredevils. 
  Airborne assault forces are of special importance in swift 
realization of fire strikes against deep enemy targets and in 
creating a constantly operating active front in his rear. In the 
course of the offensive's development they perform missions of 
seizing road junctions, crossings, passes and other important 
objectives in the enemy rear, delay the forward movement of his 
reserves, disrupt their maneuver, assist attacking troops in 
swiftly surmounting enemy defensive lines and natural obstacles, 
and create conditions for defeating his groupings in detail. 
  Skilled advantage taken of night conditions largely 
contributes to attaining high decisiveness and continuity of 
development of the offensive. Aggressive, large-scale night 
actions give troops a number of tactical advantages. Under cover 
of the darkness of night they can deliver surprise attacks 
against the enemy, execute a concealed maneuver and carry out 
feints. 
  But night hampers the operations of advancing units and 
subunits to no small extent. Even with wide use of technical 
support equipment their maneuver capabilities are reduced by 
30-40 percent in the darkness, ammunition expenditure and time 
for damaging targets increases by 1.5-2 times, and the 
negotiation of engineer obstacles and natural barriers is 
substantially hampered. Personnel fatigue increases during 
operations in the darkness. Therefore a night offensive must be 
carefully prepared and supported. Only on this condition is it 
possible to count on its high effectiveness. 
  It is said correctly that night is the ally of the bold and 
brave. Taking advantage of nighttime in the past war, Soviet 
commanders widely employed varied procedures of stratagem. We 
will cite an example. In August 1943 Captain Ye. V. Shkudralov, 
commander of a tank battalion of the 181st Tank Brigade, 18th 
Tank Corps, making a raid in the enemy rear to take the city of 
Zlochev, took advantage of the darkness, joined an enemy column 
unnoticed and approached the city without hindrance. At dawn the 
tankers routed the enemy column by a surprise attack and burst 
into Zlochev. High combat aggressiveness, decisiveness and 
resourcefulness ensured success. Captain Shkudralov was awarded 
the Hero of the Soviet Union title for this battle.[.sup]60[/] 
  In conclusion, we will emphasize that skillful use of the 
principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness by commanders and 
staffs is a sure way to achieve success with fewer costs and 
losses. To confirm this conclusion we refer to experience of 
39th Army. In 1944 it conducted two offensive operations. In 
one, conducted in February, the army advanced at a rate of 0.5 
km per day and in the other operation (Vitebsk) at a rate of 9 
km per day. With higher rates of advance in the Vitebsk 
operation, personnel losses were six times fewer and tank losses 
20 times fewer than in the February operation.[.sup]61[/] 
<H5>  Conclusions and Recommendations </H5>
  1. Demands of the principle of decisiveness and 
aggressiveness can be traced through all Soviet Armed Forces 
field manuals. They emphasize that under all situations 
commanders, staffs and all personnel must act daringly, boldly, 
and vigorously; seize and hold the initiative; strive to impose 
their will on the enemy, disrupt his plans, place him in 
unfavorable conditions; skillfully use the enemy's weak spots 
and the advantages of friendly troops; boldly concentrate main 
efforts on the most important axis and persistently strive to 
execute assigned combat missions; and carry on an aggressive 
struggle to hold fire superiority and air supremacy. 
  2. This principle finds concrete reflection in the 
determination of decisive goals of battle and effective methods 
of achieving them which would allow taking full advantage of 
favorable situation conditions and combat capabilities of units 
and subunits--their striking power, firepower, mobility, and the 
personnel's morale and fighting qualities--in order to strive 
for delivery of a preemptive strike against the enemy and for 
his fastest defeat, and to deprive him of the opportunity to 
choose the methods, direction, character, time and place of 
actions favorable for him. 
  3. To fully realize demands of the principle of decisiveness 
and aggressiveness in the defense it is necessary to constantly 
upgrade methods of preparing and conducting the defense, taking 
advantage of the strong aspects both of the position form as 
well as mobile form of the defense; and to strive for deep fire 
damage of the enemy in the course of his concentration, forward 
movement and deployment. It is important to establish defensive 
fire barriers on distant and close approaches to the defense to 
isolate the battlefield, cut off enemy reserves, disrupt his 
maneuver and block lines of communication. To disrupt the enemy 
offensive and exploit results of fire counterpreparation 
conducted under the senior commander's plan, it is necessary to 
enliven the actions of defending troops in every way, land 
airborne assault forces and raiding and reconnaissance parties 
in his rear under favorable conditions in organizing daring 
raids against his rear areas, and deliver surprise strikes by a 
portion of the forces with a move beyond the FEBA. 
  Combat aggressiveness of defending troops must reach the 
culmination in the fight to hold the FEBA, since stability of 
the defense depends on this to a decisive extent. All defenders' 
short and long range forces and assets and all procedures of 
stratagem and for deceiving the attacker are committed to repel 
the enemy assault; a fixed and creeping artillery barrage ahead 
of the FEBA and on the flanks is established in combination with 
remote mining of the terrain; the enemy is drawn into fire 
pockets; and strikes are delivered against him from ambushes. 
The actions of roving tanks, IFV's, guns and self-propelled 
antiaircraft guns are used widely to mislead the enemy. 
  In case the enemy wedges into the defense, air-fire and 
ground screens are created on his forward movement routes and 
directions of overflight of airmobile detachments; decisive 
measures are taken to combat airborne assault forces and raiding 
and reconnaissance units which have been landed; attacking tanks 
and motorized infantry are destroyed by fire from in place; and 
under favorable conditions counterattacks are carried out to 
rout a wedged-in enemy grouping and restore a lost position. 
  4. Skillfully realizing demands of the principle of 
decisiveness and aggressiveness in an offensive battle and the 
meeting engagement means: 

  -  upgrading forms and methods of seizing and holding the 
initiative of operations; finding new ways to take advantage of 
the factor of time and surprise and of tactics unexpected by the 
enemy in methods of preparing and launching an offensive and in 
increasing the decisiveness of an "armored" attack; 
  -  ensuring 
that fire superiority is won over the enemy in the first minutes 
and firmly held in the course of battle, which requires the 
following: Striving to preempt him in delivering fire strikes; 
increasing the depth of fire effect on the enemy by 3-7 times 
compared with the past; increasing the degree of fire damage of 
primary targets in the defense by 1.5-2 times; achieving top 
priority destruction of enemy precision weapon systems and means 
of nuclear attack and swift disorganization of his systems for 
command and control of troops and weapons; and waging an 
effective fight against enemy combat helicopters; 
  -  comprehensively upgrading methods of defeating the enemy by 
attempting to deliver combination air-ground strikes against him 
from the front, flanks and rear in order to paralyze the actions 
of all elements of the defense to its full depth in short time 
periods; and striving for success in an early stage and swiftly 
exploiting it subsequently; 
  -  striving for continuity of the 
offensive's development at a high pace and to a great depth, and 
conducting it day and night in any weather; executing a decisive 
pursuit of the retreating enemy; making nonstop assault 
crossings of water obstacles; swiftly negotiating obstacles and 
natural barriers; promptly restoring combat effectiveness of 
troops subjected to nuclear and fire strikes; and keeping up the 
troops' high morale and fighting spirit. 

    5. The principle of decisiveness and aggressiveness places 
demands on combat employment of combat arms and air arms; it 
dictates the need to have them ensure continuity of fire support 
of troops in the course of battle, high stability of the 
defense, and attainment of swiftness and high rates of troop 
advance in the offensive. 
  6. Like other principles of battle, the principle of 
decisiveness and aggressiveness demands that commanders display 
creativeness and innovation, make uncommon decisions, and choose 
nonstandard ways of concentrating main efforts, achieving 
surprise, executing flexible, bold maneuver and maintaining 
precise interworking, flexible, firm command and control, and 
comprehensive support to battle. 
  It is important to remember that the enemy also will strive 
for decisive, aggressive actions in all kinds of battle. 
Consequently, it is necessary to constantly maintain the troops' 
high combat readiness, promptly take steps to prevent his 
surprise attack, conduct reconnaissance, and anticipate the 
development of combat events. 
Footnotes 
  1. In subsequent text this principle is called the principle 
of decisiveness and aggressiveness. 
  2. Quoted from the book by N. Conrad, "Sun Tzu: Treatise on 
Military Art," Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1950, p 36. 
  3. See Arrian, "Pokhody Aleksandra" [The Campaigns of 
Alexander], St. Petersburg, 1837, pp 408-410. 
  4. See "Inzhenernyye voyska" [Engineer Troops], Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1982, p 11. 
  5. See "Zapiski Yuliya Tsezarya" [Notes of Julius Caesar], 
Moscow, 1948; Appian, "Grazhdanskaya voyna" [Civil War], OGIZ, 
1935. 
  6. See "Inzhenernyye voyska," pp 9, 11. 
  7. See "Inzhenernyye voyska," p 11. 
  8. See M. V. Lomonosov, "Polnoye sobraniye sochineniy" 
[Complete Collected Works], Vol 6, pp 219-220. 
  9. See "Otechestvennaya artilleriya" [Our Country's 
Artillery], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1986, p 31. 
  10. See "Otechestvennaya artilleriya," p 31. 
  11. See "Sovetskaya Voyennaya Entsiklopediya" [Soviet 
Military Encyclopedia], Vol 7, p 588. 
  12. Quoted from the book "Suvorov v soobshcheniyakh 
professorov Nikolayevskoy akademii Generalnogo shtaba" [Suvorov 
in Messages of Professors of the General Staff Nikolay Academy], 
Book 1, St. Petersburg, 1900, p 8. 
  13. "Voyennaya istoriya" [Military History], Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1971, p 49. 
  14. See "Notes of Count Raimundo Montecuccoli or Principal 
Rules of Military Science," Moscow, 1960, pp 297-298. 
  15. Quoted from the book by M. A. Milshteyn and A. K. 
Slobodenko, "O burzhuaznoy voyennoy nauke" [On Bourgeois 
Military Science], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1957, p 23. 
  16. F. Glinka, "Ocherki Borodinskogo srazheniya 
(vospominaniya o 1812 gode)" [Essays of the Battle of Borodino 
(Recollections of 1812)], Part 2, Moscow, 1839, pp 10-11. 
  17. "1812 god. K stopyatidesyatiletiyu Otechestvennoy voyny" 
[1812: For the 150th Anniversary of the Patriotic War], digest 
of articles, Moscow, izd. AN SSSR, 1962, p 41. 
  18. K. Marx and F. Engels, "Sochineniya" [Works], 2nd ed., 
Vol 14, p 93. 
  19. H. Jomini, "Essays of Military Art," Vol 2, Moscow, 
Gosvoyenizdat, 1939, pp 58-59. 
  20. Ibid., Vol 1, 1939, p 93. 
  21. C. von Clausewitz, "On War," Vol 1, pp 175-178. 
  22. Ibid., p 179. 
  23. Ibid., p 222. 
  24. Ibid., pp 150-151. 
  25. "Russkaya voyenno-teoreticheskaya mysl XIX i nachala XX 
vekov" [Russian Military-Theoretical Thought of the 19th and 
Early 20th Century], [Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1960,] pp 50-51. 
  26. Ibid., p 85. 
  27. Ibid., p 303. 
  28. Ibid., p 340. 
  29. "Istoriya voyennogo iskusstva" [History of Military 
Art], 
Vol 1, Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1961, p 94. 
  30. A. A. Neznamov, "Sovremennaya voyna. Deystviya polevoy 
armii" [Modern War: Field Army Operations], St. Petersburg, 
1911, pp 10-11. 
  31. Ibid., p 159. 
  32. "Manual for French Army Senior Troop Commanders," St. 
Petersburg, 1914, p 54. 
  33. See VOYENNO-ISTORICHESKIY ZHURNAL, No 11, 1984, p 73. 
  34. See "Istoriya voyennogo iskusstva," Vol 1, pp 162-163. 
  35. See "Mirovaya voyna v tsifrakh" [World War in Figures], 
Moscow, Gosvoyenizdat, 1934, pp 18-19. 
  36. M. V. Frunze, "Izbrannyye proizvedeniya" [Selected 
Works], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1950, p 154. 
  37. G. K. Zhukov, "Vospominaniya i razmyshleniya" 
[Recollections and Reflections], Moscow, izd. APN, 1969, p 702. 
  38. See VOYENNO-ISTORICHESKIY ZHURNAL, No 12, 1970, pp 
68-71. 
  39. Quoted from the book "Besedy s molodymi ofitserami" 
[Conversations with Young Officers], Sverdlovsk, 19(6)9, p 15. 
  40. See "Taktika" [Tactics], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1987, p 
323. 
  41. See "Otechestvennaya artilleriya," pp 209-210. 
  42. See "Otechestvennaya artilleriya," p 221. 
  43. Zhukov, Vol 2, Moscow, 1974, p 168. 
  44. "Obshchaya taktika" [General Tactics], Vol 1, Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1940, p 199. 
  45. See "Sbornik boyevykh dokumentov Velikoy Otechestvennoy 
voyny" [Digest of Combat Documents of the Great Patriotic War], 
No 6, Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1960, p 117. 
  46. D. D. Gorbatenko, "Faktor vremeni v sovremennom boyu" 
[The Time Factor in Modern Battle], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1972, p 
25. 
  47. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 5, 1986, p 17. 
  48. See "Sovetskaya Voyennaya Entsiklopediya" [Soviet 
Military Encyclopedia], Vol 1, 1976, p 266. 
  49. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 5, 1986, p 18. 
  50. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 2, 1986, p 76. 
  51. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 5, 1986, p 20. 
  52. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 5, 1986, p 17. 
  53. See ZARUBEZHNOYE VOYENNOYE OBOZRENIYE, No 12, 1975, pp 
15-1(6). 
  54. See "Taktika" [Tactics], 2nd ed., Moscow, Voyenizdat, 
1987, p 242. 
  55. VOYENNAYA MYSL, Special Edition, 1985, p 29. 
  56. "Vnezapnost v nastupatelnykh operatsiyakh Velikoy 
Otechestvennoy voyny" [Surprise in Great Patriotic War Offensive 
Operations], Moscow, Nauka, 1986, p 130. 
  57. See A. I. Yeremenko, "V nachale voyny" [At the Beginning 
of the War], Moscow, Nauka, 1964, pp 301-304. 
  58. See "Vnezapnost v operatsiyakh vooruzhennykh sil SShA" 
[Surprise in U.S. Armed Forces Operations], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 
1982, p 42. 
  59. See "Sovetskiye tankovyye voyska. 1941-1945" [Soviet 
Tank 
Troops: 1941-1945], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1973, p 262. 
  60. See VOYENNYY VESTNIK, No 7, 1973, pp 32-37. 
  61. See "Nastupatelnyye operatsii tankovykh voysk" 
[Offensive 
Operations of Tank Troops], Moscow, VAF, 1954, p 17. 
<H3>  CHAPTER FOUR - COORDINATED EMPLOYMENT OF SUBUNITS OF COMBAT 
ARMS AND SPECIAL TROOPS AND MAINTENANCE OF CONTINUOUS 
INTERWORKING AMONG THEM </H3>
[.sup]1[/] 
  Interworking consists of operations by troops 
(forces) coordinated by objective, missions, place, time and 
methods of mission accomplishment for achieving the objective of 
the battle or operation; one of the principles of military 
art. 
  "Voyennyy entsiklopedicheskiy slovar" 
[Military Encyclopedic Dictionary] 
  Interworking and mutual help are the best 
tactics. 
  P. S. Nakhimov 
  All measures prescribed by regulations will 
remain fruitless until all officers and soldiers realize the 
very enormous importance of coherency and uniformity of 
operations. 
  From a digest of tactical instructions given 
by superiors in the war of 1904-1905. 
  There can be no victory in modern battle without 
precise, continuous interworking. 
  R. Ya. Malinovskiy 
<H3>  1. From the History of the Origin and Development of the 
Principle of Interworking </H3>
  The principle of interworking is considered one of the most 
important in all world armies. Many works have been written 
about its importance and essence, and there probably are no 
generalizing directive instructions on troop combat training 
which would not mention interworking in one form or another. 
This also was discussed thoroughly in prewar Red Army Field 
Service Regulations. But when the Great Patriotic War broke out 
it was learned that our commanders and staffs proved to be 
especially poorly trained, specifically in questions of 
coordinating troop combat efforts. They made many 
miscalculations in this matter. 
  A striking gap occurred between word and action, between 
theory and practice. Here is what 22nd Army Commander Lieutenant 
General G. P. Korotkov, who went through the entire war from the 
first to the last shot, said on this score at a 1945 Army 
Military-Science Conference devoted to an analysis of experience 
of combat operations: "There was no regular commander before the 
war who would not have learned the popular aphorism: Without 
interworking there is no victory. But the war began and the 
first and biggest flaws' at all our command echelons showed up 
in coordination of mutual operations of infantry with artillery 
and combat engineers, and of infantrymen with tankers. . . . It 
took almost one and one-half years of stubborn battles for us 
finally to learn to interwork genuinely and aggressively in the 
offensive and the defense." 
  War experience showed that nowhere is the commander's 
tactical competence manifested so clearly and with such 
completeness as in organizing and accomplishing interworking in 
battle. Reflected here as in a mirror are his combat 
proficiency, knowledge of combat capabilities of combat arms, 
ability to use them sensibly in accomplishing combat missions 
and make up for weak aspects of one kind of weapon or combat 
equipment with strong aspects of other kinds, and ability to 
anticipate the development of events and not allow all possible 
chance happenings to perniciously affect the troops. 
Interworking tolerates no amateurishness. Only a comprehensively 
trained, erudite officer is capable of successfully coping with 
this difficult task in a combat situation. 
  The objective of the chapter is to help the officer master 
the art of leading troops; to show in examples how the principle 
of interworking originated and developed since ancient times and 
how and under the influence of what factors its content was 
renewed; and on this basis to develop certain practical 
recommendations and certain advice as to how to implement the 
demands of this principle most expediently in different kinds of 
modern battle. 
  We will note that like other principles of battle, the 
principle of interworking went through two stages in its 
evolution--the stage of the empirical experiment by the 
trial-and-error method and [the stage of] theoretical 
generalizations and development of scientifically substantiated 
provisions on this question. The "Voyennaya entsiklopediya" 
[Military Encyclopedia] aptly put it: "Every area of human 
creativeness (also including military affairs) goes through a 
phase of unconscious art and in the end arrives at a rational 
art having a rather substantiated science (principles, rules, 
forms, norms and so on)."[.sup]2[/] 
  The first step in amassing experience in organizing 
interworking in battle was made in ancient Egypt, Assyria, 
Babylon, China and India. Already during the slaveholding 
formation military historians and thinkers were attempting to 
find recipes for victory, among which, as Euripides noted, was 
the striving to learn to achieve a common goal in different ways. 
  One of the most ancient sources setting forth precepts on 
how 
to prepare and fight a battle and achieve coordination of 
operations is the Chinese "Seven Books," particularly the 
treatise "On the Art of Warfare" by Wu Zi, military theorist and 
field general of ancient China (5th-4th centuries B.C.). It 
notes that one must win in war by the best organization and 
cohesiveness of operations. "If an army obeys a single 
authority," wrote Wu Zi, "and acts in a coordinated way, then 
commanders and soldiers execute orders in battle, there is no 
enemy who could resist, there is no combat formation which could 
stand fast."[.sup]3[/] 
  Coordinated use of four-wheeled war chariots in battle 
together with infantry and cavalry is of interest in combat 
operations by armies of the first states of the Ancient East. 
The chariots were used for operations on an axis where success 
had appeared. By using this mobile means of attack, an army 
could pursue the enemy. It is typical that a missile-throwing 
weapon, the arbalest, appeared for the first time in the ancient 
Chinese army, which enabled engaging the enemy from a distance. 
  Interworking saw substantial development in wars of Ancient 
Greece, Macedonia, Rome and Carthage. It was then that the need 
arose for operations of ground forces to be mutually tied in 
with warships and transport vessels. The presence in the 
inventory of the Greek and Roman armies of rams and siege 
equipment in the form of mobile antifortress towers in 
combination with missile-throwing weapons--catapults and 
ballistas--complicated the nature of battle and permitted 
shifting from a lengthy siege to an assault of fortified 
city-fortresses. As a result of evolution, the battle was 
divided as it were into two stages--preparation of battle and 
its conduct (hand-to-hand fighting). The military leader was 
required to coordinate combat efforts of mixed forces: Infantry, 
cavalry, war chariots, detachments of sappers who performed 
military engineer work, and also the rear service (Fig. 8). 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-54A>             Fig. 8. Battle of Gaugamela </FIG>



  Initial experience in matters of coordinating troop efforts 
found a certain reflection in the following works by ancient 
writers: "Advice for Cavalry Commanders," "Advice for 
Cavalrymen" and "Cyropaedia" by Xenophon; "Tactics" by Aeneas; 
"Tactics" by Asclepiodotus; "Theory of Tactics" by Aelian; "The 
Jugurthine War" by Sallustius Crispus; "Civil War" by Julius 
Caesar; "The Annals" by Cornelius Tacitus; "Stratagems" by 
Julius Frontinus; "Manual for Military Leaders" by Onasander; "A 
Brief Exposition of Principles of Military Affairs" by Vegetius; 
and "Strategikon" by False-Mauricius. 
  An improvement in interworking occurred slowly in the period 
of the Middle Ages. The period of formation of feudal 
relationships in military affairs initially was characterized by 
an absence of precise tactical forms. Outfitted with primitive 
weapons for hand-to-hand combat, an army fought in dense crowds. 
Organizationally it was not broken into subunits. As metal 
weapons and protective gear improved and their numbers 
increased, combat formations of infantry as the main combat arm 
of that time evolved from deep column-like and wedge-like 
formations to formations of the phalanx type that were extended 
laterally and were shallower but were dense and more organized. 
  Eastern Slavs called such a formation a "wall." Lightly 
armed 
infantry (bowmen) and cavalry were intended for conducting 
reconnaissance, engaging, and covering flanks of the "wall." The 
latter decided the outcome of battle by its attack. Subsequent 
development of tactics required breaking up the "wall" both 
laterally as well as in depth. Initially the division of a 
combat formation into three parts (a "shelf row"), and then into 
a larger number of parts appeared in Rus (Fig. 9). In conducting 
battle the regiments--right-hand regiment, left-hand regiment, 
"forehead" (center) regiment, ambuscade force--began to use a 
varying alignment, as a result of which the depth of the 
battlefield increased and maneuver and countermaneuver by 
regiments began to be accomplished more widely. This complicated 
coordination of troop combat efforts. Often it would happen as 
follows: The center regiment, the "forehead," would repel an 
enemy attack from the front and the right-hand and left-hand 
regiments would envelop him from the flanks, as occurred, for 
example, in the Battle on Lake Peipus in 1242. The military 
leader was required to correctly distribute forces to the 
regiments, assign missions for all parts of the combat 
formation, tie their actions together, promptly commit the 
reserve, organize the pursuit and so on. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-55A>             Fig. 9. Troop combat formations of Kievan Rus: </FIG>



  The appearance of firearms in the period of the late Middle 
Ages had a great influence on development of interworking. This 
was manifested in Rus in the fact that a standing army armed 
with firearms was formed already in the middle of the 16th 
century. The "Nakaz ugorskim voyevodam" [Instructions to Ugorsk 
Voevodes] prescribed rehearsing the following tactics of 
fighting the forays by steppe inhabitants: "Divide the 
harquebusiers and pososhnyye by regiments, as many as there must 
be ashore, and the voevodes and their people are to be at the 
ready." It was envisaged that pososhnyye (auxiliary infantry) 
should immobilize the enemy, harquebusiers armed with handheld 
firearms should engage him by fire and in hand-to-hand combat, 
and the noble landed cavalry (boyar children) should exploit 
success. Later the artillery joined these combat arms. Small 
cannons (the "small detail") would cover the actions of 
pososhnyye and harquebusiers and the great cannons (the "large 
detail") would enter battle at a decisive moment. 
  Simultaneously with this, in the 15th-17th centuries 
detachments of craftsmen specialists appeared in the Russian 
Army: "wall builders," who engaged in building fortifications; 
"bridge builders," who built bridges and crossings; and 
"ballista experts," who built siege machines 
(poroks). These were the first predecessors of 
Russian military engineers, sappers and pontonmen. The 
development of artillery lent great impetus to creating special 
engineer subunits inasmuch as, on the one hand, a need appeared 
to accomplish engineer measures to support artillery combat 
operations and, on the other hand, it was necessary to build 
engineer structures for protection against enemy artillery fire 
and other weapons. 
  The role of interworking in battle elevated especially with 
the appearance of mass armies (late 18th-early 19th centuries). 
The nature of combat operations changed and their spatial scope 
increased under the influence of more sophisticated means of 
warfare. Under those conditions the military leader was forced 
to coordinate troop efforts with their deployment across a 
rather broad front, with the use of deep combat formations and 
with fighting on rough terrain. 
  Many new tactics appeared in artillery operations in wars of 
the first half of the 19th century. Artillery was employed for 
splitting enemy combat formations. The principle of massing 
artillery fire was established as a result not only of the use 
of large batteries, but also of the battlefield maneuver of 
pieces. Missions began to be divided among separate artillery 
groups. An artillery reserve was established. Interworking with 
other combat arms acquired great importance.[.sup]4[/] 
  New features of interworking were manifested especially 
clearly in the Patriotic War of 1812, above all in the Battle of 
Borodino. The strong side of Russian troop tactics was that they 
combined the actions of infantry with artillery and cavalry in 
battle more flexibly than did the French. In repelling an 
assault of Napoleon's troops, chasseurs operating in extended 
order would cover strongpoints of artillery batteries making up 
the framework of the entire Russian defense, and line infantry 
together with cavalry would deliver an attack against the 
wedged-in enemy (figs. 10 and 11). 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-56A>             Fig. 10. Battle of Borodino [remainder of caption </FIG>






<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-57A></FIG>



                But the war also identified major shortcomings in 
interworking of infantry with artillery. The fact was that at 
that time the infantry operated primarily in battalion columns 
and it was difficult for it to combine maneuver and attack with 
artillery fire. The chasseurs and artillery used their fire to 
prepare the infantry bayonet attack, but they were incapable of 
giving it fire support during exploitation of success. As a 
result, the striking power of infantry units proved to be 
insufficiently powerful. 
  The experience of the Patriotic War of 1812 showed that 
under 
the altered conditions of battle it was necessary to give 
division and regimental commanders more freedom of actions in 
matters of command and control and coordination of troop combat 
efforts. The time had passed for commanders in chief to draw up 
detailed operation orders which specified subordinates' every 
step for the entire time of the battle. 
  The system of troop interworking in battle developed further 
under the determining influence of the appearance of rifled 
weapons, smokeless powder and high explosives and employment of 
technical communications equipment. New features of interworking 
were clearly manifested in the Franco-Prussian (1870-1871), 
Crimean (1853-1856) and Russo-Turkish (1877-1878) wars. The 
infantry acquired new combat qualities. Armed with rifled 
weapons, it began to possess greater striking power. This 
allowed it not only to strive to defeat the enemy in 
hand-to-hand combat, but also to inflict a loss on him by its 
fire even while closing with him. The increased range of fire of 
artillery and infantry weapons engendered a new, dispersed 
combat formation, the extended line of riflemen. Troops began 
deploying into combat formation at a considerable distance from 
the enemy (Fig. 12). Russian infantry combat formations during 
the Crimean War are shown in Fig. 12. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-58A>             Fig. 12. Russian infantry combat formations during </FIG>
<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-71A>           Fig. 13. Sequence of developing questions ofFigure 1. Artillery Battalion </FIG>



  The role of artillery fire rose. In the Crimean War, for 
example, a new mission began to be assigned to artillery--to 
inflict damage on enemy personnel sheltered in trenches. The 
importance of terrain fortification rose under conditions of 
position warfare. Along with the construction of poured 
earthworks (redoubts, fl&egrave;ches, lunettes), group 
emplacements 
(logements) linked by connecting passages began to be dug and 
protective cover and shelters began being built for reserves. 
The strength of the defense increased considerably through use 
of plain wire obstacles, by the arrangement of knife rests, and 
also by use of fougasses covered by artillery and infantry fire. 
  N. V. Medem's textbook "Taktika" [Tactics] (1837), which set 
forth practical recommendations on how to fight in an extended 
order in combination with column operations, played an important 
role in developing the theory and practice of interworking of 
troops in battle in the Russian Army in the 19th century. The 
textbook examined the influence of terrain conditions and other 
situation elements on the nature of interworking. These 
provisions were later developed in the work by F. I. Goremykin 
"Rukovodstvo k izucheniyu taktiki v nachalnykh yeye osnovaniyakh 
i v prakticheskom primenenii" [Manual for Study of Initial 
Foundations and Practical Application of Tactics] (1849). The 
work gave greatest attention to interworking of infantry with 
artillery. The author pointed out the perniciousness of their 
separate conduct of battle. They should be disposed on the 
battlefield, he advised, in such a way as to have an opportunity 
to help each other without constraining their actions. 
  Questions of interworking held a prominent place in works by 
G. A. Leyer "Metod voyennykh nauk" [Method of Military Sciences] 
and "Strategiya (taktika teatra voyennykh deystviy)" [Strategy 
(Tactics of a Theater of Military Operations)] (Leyer called 
this principle the principle of mutual support) and A. N. Petrov 
"K voprosam strategii" [On Questions of Strategy]. M. I. 
Dragomirov directed attention to the importance of skillful use 
of this principle. He wrote: "Each objective in war is achieved 
more surely by the combined efforts of many directed toward a 
common objective."[.sup]5[/] 
  Many forecasts on how battle would develop were expressed 
prior to World War I. Many military theorists were inclined to 
think that the infantry would continue to play a predominant 
role in it. "The battle chiefly will be the struggle of two 
infantries, and victory will be on the side of the greater 
number of battalions."[.sup]6[/] The reason for such 
erroneous theories was that little consideration was given to 
the intensive development of means of warfare. 
  The essence of changes which occurred in the material basis 
of battle was that the machinegun became a mass weapon of ground 
troops. Field artillery improved. Cannons and howitzers from 
76-mm to 152-mm in caliber became operational. Their combat 
qualities rose substantially as a result of introduction of the 
optical sight. Heavy-caliber pieces also improved, right up to 
the appearance of superpowerful, long-range guns. There was a 
sharp increase in the number of mortars, and flamethrowers 
appeared. The amount of artillery increased by 6-8 times in the 
army compared with wars of the latter half of the 19th century. 
Creation of the armored vehicle and especially the tank (1916) 
became a major step in armament development. Aircraft saw 
quantitative and qualitative development in the course of the 
war. 
  Under the influence of this, the battle assumed a combined 
arms character. Employment of various combat arms and special 
troops coordinated by objective, place and time acquired 
decisive importance in achieving success in the battle. Although 
the fire and attack capabilities of infantry units had increased 
significantly by this time in connection with their saturation 
with small-caliber artillery, mortars, medium and light 
machineguns, and flamethrowers, they were incapable of 
successfully penetrating a heavily fortified, deeply echeloned 
enemy defense without the support of artillery and aircraft. 
This was similar to the defense, in which the infantry could not 
independently repel the powerful blow of an attacking enemy, who 
began using a new means of attack in the course of war--tanks. 
  Combat experience introduced much that was new to the system 
of interworking of infantry with artillery. This experience was 
generalized in the work "Artilleriya oborony" [Defense 
Artillery], published in 1917. It stated in particular: 
"Artillery work saves infantry blood and reduces shell 
consumption. . . . It will be people who will compile and 
implement the artillery defense plan. If they do not believe in 
the possibility of using the full power of modern artillery, if 
they do not personally visit all hills, valleys and 
emplacements, if they do not study the terrain and enemy in 
detail, if they break away from the commanders of regiments and 
infantry, and if they talk with artillerymen of neighboring 
divisions and issue missions to battery commanders not on the 
terrain, but over the telephone and from a map, then the 
artillery plan will resemble a house built on sand, and 
artillery sweat that is saved will be paid for by infantry 
blood."[.sup]7[/] 
  In the offensive, artillery assisted in the infantry's 
forward movement to take up a line of departure for the attack; 
it breached barbed-wire entanglements; it demolished defensive 
works, machinegun nests, observation posts, shelters, 
emplacements and connecting passages in breakthrough sectors; it 
fought enemy artillery; and it supported the infantry assault 
and prevented enemy counterattacks. In the defense it would 
inflict losses on the enemy in repelling his assaults, support 
flanks and boundaries and the conduct of counterattacks, and 
execute a maneuver of fire to destroy a wedged-in enemy. 
  Rejected at the beginning of the war in the majority of 
armies, artillery preparation of the attack was legitimized once 
and for all in the course of the war.[.sup]8[/] In executing 
it, the artillery was employed centrally in three groups: 1) 
group for breaching barbed-wire entanglements; 2) group for 
demolishing fortifications and neutralizing the defensive fire 
plan; 3) group for combating enemy artillery. What was new in 
the interworking of infantry with artillery was that following 
artillery preparation of the attack a portion of the light 
batteries would be resubordinated to commanders of infantry 
regiments and would proceed behind the infantry to support it 
during battle in the depth of the defense.[.sup]9[/] 
  Artillery support of an infantry assault was accomplished by 
a creeping barrage, but its depth was not great. The absence of 
regimental and battalion artillery had a negative effect on 
assurance of independence of infantry subunit operations. What 
was new in organizing interworking during the fight against 
enemy artillery was that firing was conducted with the help of 
spotter aircraft, tethered balloons, and in some cases 
sound-ranging stations. 
  The first experience of infantry and artillery interworking 
with tanks and aircraft was received in the course of World War 
I. Combat employment of tanks showed that they were an effective 
means of penetrating fortified enemy positions despite their 
technical imperfection. While 32 tanks took part in the 
operation on the Somme, there already were 378 (battle tanks) in 
the operation at Cambrai and 511 at Amiens.[.sup]10[/] Rates 
of advance increased with the commitment of tanks; the tanks 
were attached to the infantry. The infantry's tactics changed, 
and it began to employ new methods of battle--shifting to a 
group combat formation and group tactics. 
  Aircraft saw much development during the war. Aviation 
initially was considered a means of supporting the 
infantry-artillery battle and it performed reconnaissance and 
spotted artillery fire. But its functions expanded with the 
appearance of ground attack, fighter and bomber aviation. By the 
end of the war aircraft were fighting for air superiority in the 
course of operations. One thousand or more aircraft took part in 
the largest ones. Tactical air defense tactics developed in the 
battle against aircraft and an air defense service was 
established. The method of firing on flying aircraft from 
machineguns and rifles saw some improvement. 
  With the predominance of positional forms of warfare, the 
cavalry faded more and more into the background as a combat arm, 
although there were examples of its major, bold 
operations.[.sup]11[/] During a breakthrough of the enemy 
defense the cavalry would dismount and be employed as infantry. 
Employing cavalry to exploit progress in an operation was 
unsuccessful, with certain exceptions. This was explained by the 
fact that the cavalry was poorly equipped with machineguns and 
artillery and could not surmount the infantry's increased fire 
resistance. 
  The role of engineer troops increased steadily during the 
war. Evidence of this was the circumstance that their proportion 
in the makeup of ground troops had increased by 1.5-2 times by 
the end of the war.[.sup]12[/] They performed various 
engineer support missions in battle. Interworking of engineer 
subunits with infantry and artillery was substantially enriched. 
Combat engineer teams would perform engineer reconnaissance in 
their support. By day such reconnaissance would be conducted by 
observation and by night sometimes by a probing reconnaissance 
patrol. The reconnaissance mission included collecting 
information about the general nature of positions; arrangement 
of emplacements, connecting passages and shelters; nature of 
barriers and obstacles; locations of machineguns and mortars; 
locations of fougasses; and degree of terrain passability in 
front of the enemy defense frontage. 
  To support the infantry's advance in an offensive, a first 
echelon regiment usually received two combat engineer platoons 
as attachment and the division received one company of a 
military road construction detachment. Special attention was 
given to breaching obstacles during an assault and during battle 
in the depth of the defense. Lanes were cleared chiefly by the 
explosive method by specially formed "demolition teams" (two 
teams for each lead assaulting company). Wire cutters, grappling 
hooks and grenades would be used for breaching during battle in 
the depth of the enemy defense. 
  In the defense, engineer units and subunits would be used 
primarily for building obstacles (barbed-wire entanglements and 
minefields). The obstacles would be deeply echeloned and several 
belts of wire entanglement netting would be prepared. The 
Russian Army used powder obstacles (fougasses) as explosive 
fougasses. They were divided into field, fortress and river 
obstacles and by technical characteristics into conventional, 
contact-detonation and repeating fougasses. They usually were 
used in barbed-wire entanglements, especially to cover dead 
zones. Fougasses were set up in two or three lines in groups of 
5-15 charges at a distance of 8-12 m from each other; the 
distance between lines was 20-30 m.[.sup]13[/] 
  Duties of unit and formation commanders in organizing 
interworking became more complicated in the course of 
development of combined arms battle in World War I. At the 
beginning of the war regimental commanders were its main 
organizers. They would assign missions to the infantry and 
artillery and coordinate their combat efforts. The role of 
division commanders was limited to assigning general missions to 
regiments, giving their commanders full initiative in organizing 
and controlling battle. With transition to positional forms of 
war, with the increased depth of combat formations and with 
development of technical means of warfare, interworking began to 
be organized according to the principle of rigid 
centralization--division commanders would delve into all details 
of battle and coordinate combat efforts among units and subunits 
of combat arms and with adjacent units. 
  The nature of interworking of Red Army troops in the Civil 
War was distinguished by great uniqueness dictated by the 
specifics of combat operations. So-called "rail war" tactics 
were used in the summer of 1918. Battles were fought primarily 
along main rail lines.[.sup]14[/] Operations of dismounted 
units and subunits were supported by guns set up on flatcars. 
  Interworking of infantry and artillery became more 
complicated with an expansion of the frontage of combat 
operations. Many divisions and brigades were forced to operate 
with a significant separation from the main body. Under these 
conditions interworking was organized in the most general terms. 
For example, in organizing for battle near Izhevsk in the fall 
of 1918, V. M. Azin, commander of the 2nd (subsequently the 
28th) Composite Division, gave subordinate commanders only a 
general mission and the final objective of operations. "You 
cannot count on my support," he said. 
  As experience was gained, combat efforts were coordinated in 
greater detail. Combat missions would be assigned to divisions 
by axes and objectives. The populated points which had to be 
taken usually were indicated to brigades (regiments). The attack 
was accomplished by march columns which, on reaching the enemy 
artillery effect zone (4-6 km), would deploy into company and 
platoon columns and then into an extended line. The assault 
would be made after a brief fire assault. For closer 
interworking with infantry, the artillery would be distributed 
by battalion among rifle regiments and brigades. Without 
becoming an organizational part of these units, the batteries or 
battalions would be assigned to them as it were and constantly 
operate with them, being directly in combat formations of the 
infantry or cavalry. 
  With consideration of situation conditions, in a number of 
cases special artillery groups which usually combined from four 
to six batteries would be established for combating enemy 
artillery. The batteries included in their makeup would be 
shifted to support rifle units after performing assigned 
missions. In this connection, decentralized control exercised 
within the framework of the battery or battalion predominated. 
Brigade and regimental commanders would decide all questions of 
interworking with their commanders. In the course of battle 
special attention would be given to coordinating operations of 
infantry with artillery, which would accompany the attackers by 
fire and wheels. The infantry in turn would cover the artillery 
against enemy cavalry assaults. 
  Rifle units would interwork with cavalry chiefly when it was 
committed to a breakthrough for pursuit of the enemy and in 
making close and deep envelopments. Operating in the enemy rear, 
the cavalry often would spread panic in his ranks, and thereby 
support the infantry's success. 
  Divisions would be reinforced by armored trains and one or 
two armored detachments on the most important axes. In 
organizing interworking with them, commanders would specify 
methods of supporting the infantry by the fire of armored trains 
and would coordinate operations of rifle units with armored 
detachments in taking populated points. Signals for denoting the 
infantry's position would be specified in organizing 
interworking with aviation. Aircraft would bomb from low 
altitudes in support of rifle units. 
  Some success in interworking of combat arms was received in 
conducting defensive battle in the Civil War. Special attention 
was given to establishing a perimeter defense around populated 
points and road junctions. Batteries and battalions would be 
attached to brigades and regiments to ensure independence of 
their operations. Coordination of efforts with artillery was 
achieved by joint disposition of observation posts and by 
setting up a unified range card and a general target and firing 
chart. Some experience was received in fighting enemy tanks. An 
artillery antitank defense system was established for the first 
time in the history of military art in 51st Rifle Division in 
the Kakhovka base of operations in 1920. 
  Special pieces were assigned to combat tanks (armored 
targets) and were not supposed to be diverted to perform other 
missions. Each antitank gun was covered by barrage fire of at 
least one light battery. Mobile batteries and platoons which 
played the role of a unique antitank reserve were used widely to 
build up the density of antitank fire. This defense proved 
insurmountable for the tanks and armored vehicles of Vrangel's 
troops. 
  Combat engineer units interworked closely with infantry and 
artillery. In a period of defensive battles they would help the 
infantry prepare defensive lines, set up obstacles, blow up 
bridges on routes of enemy advance, and demolish individual 
railroad sections. Demolition teams would be set up to perform 
demolition work. In offensive battle combat engineers would 
perform engineer reconnaissance of terrain, restore bridges, and 
build crossings over water obstacles. For example, V. I. 
Chapayev, commander of the 25th Rifle Division, assigned combat 
engineer subunits the following missions in an assault crossing 
of the Belaya River south of Ufa in June 1918: Perform engineer 
reconnaissance of the river in the crossing sector; repair the 
damaged ferry for crossing armored vehicles; build landings 
(docks) on both banks of the river; and repair the road from the 
armored vehicle unloading site to the ferry 
crossing.[.sup]15[/] 
  The experience of interworking accumulated by the Red Army 
in 
the Civil War was reflected in regulation documents published at 
that time--the "Stroyevoy pekhotnyy ustav RKKA" [Workers' and 
Peasants' Red Army Infantry Drill Regulations] (1920), "Ustav 
artillerii RKKA" [RKKA Artillery Regulations] (1920), "Ustav 
rotnykh pulemetov RKKA" [RKKA Light Machinegun Regulations] 
(1920) and also in the work "Boyevoye primeneniye strelkovoy 
divizii i vysshikh kavaleriyskikh soyedineniy" [Combat 
Employment of Rifle Divisions and the Highest Cavalry 
Formations] (1920). 
  There was no pause in the arms race following the end of 
World War I. To the contrary, it was conducted at 
unprecedentedly high rates. In relatively short time periods the 
technical outfitting of armies of the leading world countries 
was upgraded and replaced almost completely. Of ground troops' 
armament, one should note above all the rapidly improving 
armored equipment. In the late 1930's and early 1940's medium 
and heavy tanks appeared with improved hull shape and armor, a 
high speed (45-65 km/hr), a considerable range (up to 500 km), 
powerful armor protection (100 mm or more), and heavy armament 
(from 76-mm to 122-mm guns and heavy-caliber machineguns). 
  Field artillery was improved--guns and howitzers (from 76-mm 
to 203-mm) as well as mortars (from 82-mm to 160-mm), antitank 
artillery (from 45-mm to 100-mm), antitank guns, and 
antiaircraft artillery (from 37-mm to 85-mm). New machineguns 
and submachineguns (assault rifles) were adopted. Antitank and 
antipersonnel mines became widespread. Tank, mechanized, 
airborne and artillery divisions and corps as well as other 
units appeared in the makeup of the ground troops. Aviation 
developed intensively, especially during World War II. New 
fighters, ground attack aircraft, medium and long-range 
(strategic) bombers, long-range reconnaissance aircraft, 
military-transport aircraft and gliders appeared. 
  The theory and practice of interworking by Soviet troops 
were 
upgraded in the interwar period with consideration of the 
qualitative renewal of the material base of combined arms 
battle. This process did not occur without contradictions. On 
the one hand, based on prevision of the nature of future war, 
Soviet military thinking developed a scientifically grounded 
concept of balanced Armed Forces development. In contrast to 
one-sided foreign military theories of "air war" and "tank war," 
which overestimated the role of individual combat arms in 
performing missions in the operation and battle, our military 
art firmly adhered to the idea of coordinated, massive 
employment of branches of the Armed Forces and combat arms to 
rout the enemy and achieve the assigned objectives. On the other 
hand, adherence to Civil War experience dominated and proper 
priorities in development of weapons were not always chosen. 
  Questions of interworking were set forth for the first time 
in the most generalized form in the 1925 Field Service 
Regulations, which emphasized that coordination in operations of 
combat arms and various units and detachments operating on 
different axes is a necessary condition for success. Inasmuch as 
the Red Army had few tanks and aircraft at that time, the 
Regulations gave no consideration to their support. Artillery 
was regarded as the basic means for fire suppression of the 
enemy. According to the Regulations, in penetrating an organized 
enemy defense it was deemed necessary to have a treble 
superiority over the enemy in personnel and equipment. 
  Subsequently the system of interworking was developed and 
significantly supplemented and updated in the 1929 Field Service 
Regulations, the 1936 RKKA Provisional Field Service 
Regulations, and the 1939, 1940 and 1941 draft Red Army Field 
Service Regulations. These regulations examined questions of 
organizing interworking not only in rifle, but also in 
mechanized, cavalry and motorized formations. 
  In addition to regulation documents, much influence on 
improving the theory and practice of interworking was exerted by 
works of M. N. Tukhachevskiy "Novoye v razvitii taktiki Krasnoy 
Armii" [New Things in Development of Red Army Tactics], V. K. 
Triandafillov "Kharakter operatsiy sovremennykh armiy" [Nature 
of Operations of Modern Armies], G. S. Isserson "Istoricheskiye 
korni glubokoy taktiki" [Historical Roots of Deep Tactics], the 
collective work of the Frunze Military Academy "Organizatsiya i 
vedeniye nastupatelnogo boya" [Organization and Conduct of 
Offensive Battle], S. K. Timoshenko "O takticheskoy podgotovke 
voysk" [On Tactical Training of Troops], A. G. Lignau 
"Vzaimodeystviye ognya i zhivoy sily v nastupatelnom boyu" 
[Interworking of Fire and Personnel in Offensive Battle], A. I. 
Sedyakin "Blizhniy boy" [Close Combat], S. M. Budennyy 
"Znacheniye konnitsy i osnovy yeye taktiki" [Importance of 
Cavalry and Fundamentals of Its Tactics], the collective work 
edited by V. D. Grendal "Artilleriya v nastupatelnom boyu" 
[Artillery in Offensive Battle], K. B. Kalinovskiy "Tanki v 
gruppakh DD" [Tanks in Long Range Groups], A. P. Lapchinskiy 
"Vozdushnyy boy" [Air-to-Air Combat], and D. M. Karbyshev 
"Inzhenernoye obespecheniye obshchevoyskovogo boya" [Engineer 
Support to Combined arms Battle]. 
  Many questions of theory and practice of troop interworking 
in that period were resolved by Soviet military thought in a 
fundamentally new way based on the theory of deep battle set 
forth in the instructions "Vremennyye ukazaniya po organizatsii 
glubokogo boya" [Provisional Directions on Organizing Deep 
Battle] (1933). Subsequently, it was also based on the theory of 
the deep operation. Briefly, the essence of the system of 
interworking in accomplishing a deep operation reduced to the 
following. Rifle formations reinforced by tanks and supported by 
artillery and aircraft make a break-in of a positional enemy 
defensive front; when the front is disrupted, motorized and 
mechanized units (mechanized corps and brigades) are committed, 
they advance swiftly into the depth of the enemy defense 
together with airborne assault forces, rout army reserves and 
take tactically important objectives (rear-area logistic support 
bases, airfields, transportation hubs). Cavalry supported by 
aircraft attacks shallower reserves, seizes light aviation 
airfields, and destroys retreating enemy rear 
services.[.sup]16[/] 
  But it is impossible to be silent about the fact that not 
all 
questions of interworking were resolved correctly in our 
regulation documents and works. Thus, for a long time the 
cavalry was advanced to the fore to the detriment of development 
of armored troops. The role of infantry in combined arms battle 
was also exaggerated. The textbook "Obshchaya taktika" [General 
Tactics], published on the eve of the war,[.sup]17[/] stated: 
"All interworking is organized in support of infantry (which 
performs the principal role in battle)." Dividing the combat 
formation of formations and units in the offensive into striking 
forces and holding forces proved impractical. 
  Many miscalculations were made in organizing the 
interworking 
of artillery with infantry. It was envisaged to establish 
artillery groups for a specific purpose. For example, 
infantry-support artillery groups were established in the 
division based on the number of rifle regiments operating in the 
first echelon, and long-range artillery groups were established 
in corps based on the number of first echelon divisions. 
Artillery would be subordinated to regimental and battalion 
commanders only "when, based on ground observation conditions, 
it becomes difficult to support an offensive by centrally 
controlled fire."[.sup]18[/] As shown by Great Patriotic War 
experience, rigid centralization in controlling artillery led to 
where regiments and battalions essentially ended up without 
artillery support in the course of a battle. 
  The established procedure for initiating the assault did not 
facilitate precise interworking between infantry and artillery. 
The 1936 "Vremennyy polevoy ustav RKKA" [Workers' and Peasants' 
Red Army Provisional Field Service Regulations] directed that 
the infantry should make an assault dash when the artillery 
transfers fire into the depth of the defense. In practice this 
led during the war to where a gap in time was created between 
fire and the movement of infantry. Taking advantage of this, the 
enemy often managed to poise to repel an assault. Subsequently 
this provision was corrected based on combat experience. 
  Questions of interworking in defensive battle were not 
developed completely enough in prewar times. The Field Service 
Regulations gave no consideration to coordinated operations of 
troops in repelling a surprise enemy attack, to the procedure 
for restoring combat effectiveness, or to questions of 
interworking when destroying enemy groupings wedged in at 
boundaries and on flanks, when they made close and deep 
envelopments, during a withdrawal, and in fighting in 
encirclement. 
  The fact that regulation documents underestimated the 
combined arms commander's role in organizing interworking was an 
especially big mistake. Thus, the 1935 "Nastavleniye po polevoy 
sluzhbe shtabov" [Manual of Staff Field Duties] pointed out that 
the chief of staff personally organizes and ensures interworking 
of troops. It was recommended that the commander give only 
general instructions for organizing interworking. All these and 
many other miscalculations in questions of interworking had a 
negative effect on the course of Soviet troop combat operations 
in the first period of war. 
  The process of improving the system of interworking when 
Soviet troops conducted combat operations in the 
Great Patriotic War followed difficult paths. An analysis of our 
failures with the beginning of the war shows that most often 
they resulted from poor preparation for combat and the absence 
of reliable interworking among the combat arms involved. Only in 
1941 did the Headquarters, Supreme High Command [Hq SHC] issue 
several directives on this matter. Thus, one published in August 
noted that combined arms commanders and staffs were doing 
extremely poorly in coordinating the actions of infantry and 
artillery with tanks and combat engineers. Interworking was 
being organized in general outlines not on the terrain, but from 
a map; it was being worked out to a shallow depth without 
considering troop combat capabilities; missions were being 
assigned in an ill-conceived manner; and combat efforts of units 
and subunits were being poorly coordinated for destroying an 
enemy wedged in at boundaries and flanks.[.sup]19[/] 
  The directives indicated that the principal reason for the 
inability of many combined arms commanders to organize 
interworking was that they had a poor knowledge of combat 
capabilities of the combat arms. Not knowing how the combat arms 
should be employed in battle, they naturally could not demand 
that subordinate commanders employ them properly.[.sup]20[/] 
  A genuine scourge for troops in the first period of war was 
the knowingly unrealistic assignment of missions to divisions, 
regiments and battalions. Thus, in a directive to troops during 
the battles at Smolensk (1941), 19th Army Chief of Staff Major 
General P. N. Rubtsov instructed: "...Trouble continues to occur 
in calculating time and space. The desire to execute an assigned 
combat mission as quickly as possible often obscures common 
sense, and troops are assigned missions of which they clearly 
are incapable."[.sup]21[/] 
  It is typical that the command element's instructions not 
only noted shortcomings that occurred in organization of 
interworking, but also spelled out specific ways of remedying 
them. For example, a 29 September 1941 Hq SHC directive pointed 
out: "In organizing interworking, commanders must know precisely 
the force composition and missions of supporting artillery, 
tanks and aviation . . . assign missions to subordinates 
personally on the terrain, and clarify targets for assault, 
suppression and destruction."[.sup]22[/] 
  The 1942 "Boyevoy ustav pekhoty" [Infantry Field Manual] and 
the 1943 draft "Polevoy ustav" [Field Service Regulations] 
played a role of great importance in improving the system of 
interworking in the troops. With consideration of accumulated 
combat experience, they set forth recommendations on how troop 
combat efforts should be coordinated. Thus, the "Polevoy ustav" 
noted that combat missions for the offensive must be assigned in 
such a way that at least 24 hours remain before it begins, 
division or brigade commanders must be given at least 12 hours 
for organizing for battle, and battalion commanders must be 
given at least 3 hours of daylight for work on the terrain. 
  In the third period of the war certain corrections to the 
work of organizing interworking were made based on requirements 
of the "Nastavleniye po proryvu pozitsionnoy oborony" [Manual 
for Breakthrough of a Position Defense]. It prescribed 
allocating a corps commander at least two days, a division 
commander just as much, and regimental and battalion commanders 
at least 24 hours each for organizing interworking. 
Recommendations on developing an operational timetable in the 
division which should detail what mission rifle units, 
artillery, tankers and combat engineers should perform and how 
they should do so in a particular stage of battle were new. 
  Interworking in defensive battle was organized by options of 
conducting the battle, by missions, and by axes of enemy 
operations.[.sup]23[/] For example, in the defense at Moscow 
in November 1941 the commander of 5th Army's 32nd Rifle Division 
coordinated combat efforts for such missions as support to the 
battle of combat outposts, the battle for the FEBA and for 
holding populated points, and battle in the depth of defense. 
  Combat missions were updated subsequently as combat 
experience accumulated. Thus, in the defense at Kursk 
interworking was organized in 15th and 81st guards rifle 
divisions and in 73rd and 213th rifle divisions for the 
following missions: Battle on approaches to the defense and 
prohibition of enemy forward movement into the assault; repulse 
of an enemy assault and the battle to hold the FEBA; the battle 
to destroy a wedged-in enemy; conduct of counterattacks and 
restoration of the defense. 
  And so, a number of trends can be traced in organizing 
interworking in the war years. Its content was significantly 
expanded and enriched. The transition from artillery support to 
artillery offensive became fundamentally new in the interworking 
of artillery with infantry and tanks, and the effectiveness of 
fire damage of the enemy increased as a result. Regulation 
documents pointed out that the essence of the artillery 
offensive "is continuous support to infantry by massed, 
effective artillery and mortar fire throughout the entire period 
of the offensive. Artillery and mortar fire should lead the 
infantry and tanks into the assault from one objective in the 
defense to another."[.sup]24[/] 
  Artillery preparation of the assault usually was planned to 
a 
depth of 3-4 km within a time frame of 1.5-2 hours. What was new 
in planning artillery support was that the mission was executed 
not only by the method of a successive fire concentration, but 
also by a rolling barrage (single or double and sometimes even 
triple), up to a depth of 2 km. 
  During the war, the Soviet command began to see a need for 
reinforcing attacking rifle and tank subunits with close-support 
artillery. Subunits and units of self-propelled artillery 
(SAU-76, SU-122, ISU-152) were established for this and were 
attached to tank subunits as accompanying close-support guns for 
combating enemy antitank and other weapons. The 45-mm and 57-mm 
antitank guns and 76-mm regimental guns, which displaced on the 
battlefield as individual gun crews, were used in rifle 
battalions as accompanying close-support guns. 
  The main air efforts were aimed at winning air superiority, 
reconnoitering the enemy, and assisting combined arms formations 
in defeating him. In the second and third periods of the war, 
Air Force operations were accomplished in the form of an air 
offensive, the basis of which was air preparation of the 
assault, support of an infantry and tank assault, and 
accompaniment of attacking troops in the depth of the enemy 
defense. 
  The landing and operations of airborne assault forces 
represented a fundamentally new phenomenon in World War II (a 
total of 150 major assault landings were made). Airborne assault 
forces would be landed most often in an offensive operation to 
assist the main troop grouping in defeating the enemy. 
Interworking with it was organized on an operational and 
strategic scale. 
  The interworking of tanks with infantry and artillery 
continuously improved during the war. Tank units and subunits 
attached to rifle divisions and regiments would be employed as 
infantry direct-support tanks. Their operations would be planned 
by lines and missions. Directive instructions emphasized that 
tanks should not separate from the infantry by more than 200-400 
m and the infantry should "suppress enemy antitank weapons with 
the full power of their fire as well as by the fire of 
accompanying close-support guns, reconnoiter and clear 
minefields, . . . combat German tank destroyers, decisively 
follow tanks into the assault, consolidate captured lines..." 
Artillery was assigned missions of combating enemy tanks. It was 
emphasized that "tanks fight tanks only in case of a clear 
superiority in forces and when the situation is 
favorable."[.sup]25[/] 
  Interworking of air defense units and subunits with rifle, 
artillery and tank units was accomplished with great difficulty: 
The acute shortage of antiaircraft artillery [AAA] was felt in 
the troops. At the beginning of the war one AAA battalion (8 
37-mm and 4 76-mm AA guns) was envisaged in the makeup of each 
rifle division and corps. A division could establish a density 
of 1.2 guns per kilometer on a frontage of 10 km with organic 
weapons, but even this insufficient density was not always 
established in view of being understrength in weapons. The 
shortage of AAA in the first period of the war forced wide use 
of small arms and passive measures of protection--maskirovka, 
dispersal, use of protective terrain features, engineer 
preparation of terrain--to combat aircraft. 
  Armies began establishing AAA groups beginning with the 
second period of the war. This achieved centralization of 
command and control, massing, and convenience of interworking of 
AAA. The density of AAA cover increased to 10 guns per kilometer 
of frontage or 1-1.5 guns per square kilometer of the area 
covered. In the middle of 1944 some rifle divisions received a 
separate AAA battalion consisting of 12 37-mm guns and an 
antiaircraft company consisting of 18 DShK [Degtyarev-Shpagin 
heavy] machineguns. 
  The experience of organizing the interworking of air defense 
personnel and equipment with other combat arms was reflected in 
the 1944 "Rukovodstvo po boyevomu primeneniyu sredstv PVO pri 
obespechenii voysk" [Manual for Combat Employment of Air Defense 
Weapons in Support of Troops]. It noted that the air defense 
system included the following: Timely enemy air raid warning to 
troops, a VNOS [air observation, warning and communications] 
service, AAA and machinegun fire plan, fighter combat 
operations, and a plan for organized small arms fire. The 
combined arms commander was responsible for organizing air 
defense. 
  In the offensive, air defense weapons concentrated efforts 
on 
covering troops delivering the main attack. Displacing by 
echelon (no more than one-third of batteries simultaneously), 
they were at the following distance from forward units: AA 
machineguns no further than 800-1,000 m, light AAA 1.5-2 km and 
medium AAA 3 km. In covering troops, AAA would proceed in troop 
combat formations in trying to achieve air defense continuity. 
AA machineguns and small-caliber guns always were in readiness 
to fire from the move and from short halts. In the defense, air 
defense weapons had the primary mission of disrupting enemy air 
preparation and not allowing reconnaissance or air strikes 
against artillery positions, reserves, staffs and rear-area 
facilities. 
  During the war abundant experience was gained in 
interworking 
of engineer troops with other combat arms. Operating as part of 
mobile obstacle detachments, assault detachments and teams, and 
movement support detachments or performing independent missions, 
engineer units and subunits would support operations of rifle, 
tank and artillery units and subunits in all kinds of battle. In 
interworking with them, the engineer units and subunits would 
cover flanks, consolidate captured lines, assist troops in 
repelling enemy counterattacks, and support the troops' forward 
movement and maneuver and their establishment of a stable 
defense. Engineer subunits' increased role in battle is 
indicated by the circumstance that in 1945 a rifle division 
began to have up to 12 combat engineer companies. In some 
operations their density rose to 4-6 companies per kilometer of 
frontage.[.sup]26[/] 
  The combined arms commander was the primary organizer of 
interworking in the war. At the same time, the staff played an 
important role in this matter. The 1942 "Nastavleniye po polevoy 
sluzhbe shtabov" [Manual on Staff Field Duties] emphasized that 
a staff which cannot support interworking cannot be deemed a 
full-fledged command and control entity. The staff's duties in 
organizing interworking included the following: Preparing data 
on the combat situation and necessary calculations; coordinating 
questions of interworking with chiefs of combat arms (services) 
and with adjacent units; supporting the commander's work in 
organizing interworking on the terrain, on terrain models or on 
maps; and communicating his instructions to units. In addition, 
the staff would provide uninterrupted communications among 
interworking units and would establish a unified system of 
warning and target designation signals, develop necessary combat 
documentation, and monitor how interworking was organized in 
subordinate units and subunits. 
  An important role in coordinating combat efforts during the 
war was given to tactical drill problems, field-fire exercises, 
command and staff exercises, staff officer radio drills, and 
joint problems for commanders of rifle, tank, artillery and air 
units. In noting the great benefit of such activities at a 
conference critiquing the Silesian Operation, the commander of 
2nd Guards Army noted: "We began holding joint exercises 15-20 
days before the operation began. . . . Subsequently, in the 
period of joint ground reconnaissance, combat arms officers were 
very satisfied and pleasantly surprised by the fact that they 
were training together in problems and would go into battle 
together. They knew each other and developed a certain trust and 
mutual understanding, and this was very valuable for 
battle."[.sup]27[/] 
  On the whole, the Great Patriotic War enriched the theory 
and 
practice of troop interworking and elevated it to a new level. 
Soviet commanders and staffs proved equal to their missions. 
They displayed creative initiative in seeking new, 
nonstereotyped methods of coordinating troop combat efforts 
depending on the situation at hand. As a rule, their activity 
was characterized by depth of concepts, preciseness of 
calculations and comprehensive prudence. 
  Combat experience showed that commanders' proficiency alone 
was not enough to achieve precise, continuous interworking in 
battle. High combat proficiency of privates and NCO's and their 
ability to make effective use of their weapons' combat 
capabilities and act in coordination--conduct fire accurately, 
transfer it promptly to new targets, and carry out mutual 
assistance in battle--also were required. No less important were 
the personnel's high morale and fighting qualities, persistence, 
composure, and an unbending will to win. 
  Qualitative improvement of the material base of combined 
arms 
formations largely helped upgrade the system of interworking of 
Soviet troops. Thus, during 1943-1944, for example, the 
numerical strength of personnel of the army in the field rose by 
a little more than 6 percent, but the number of guns and mortars 
which they had rose by 40 percent, the number of tanks and 
self-propelled artillery by 90 percent, and the number of 
aircraft almost fourfold.[.sup]28[/] It is typical that the 
proportion of the numerical strength of different combat arms in 
the rifle division by the end of the war increased to 50-60 
percent, while it did not exceed 20 percent in infantry 
divisions in World War I. 
  According to the "Troop Leadership" manual, interworking in 
the fascist German Army was considered one of the 
chief tactical principles. Military command element orders 
emphasized that personnel, equipment or time should not be 
spared to achieve uniformity, precision, coordination of 
operations and punctuality in executing missions. From 12 hours 
to 2 days were allocated for coordinating questions of 
interworking in the division in preparing an 
offensive.[.sup]29[/] Principal attention in the offensive 
was given to close interworking of infantry, tanks, artillery 
and aircraft. Tanks would clear the way for motorized infantry, 
which would consolidate success. The tank and motorized reserve 
intended for exploiting success and accomplishing sudden 
missions that arose would move behind the motorized infantry in 
a wedge combat formation. 
  During the war many corrections were made to the system of 
interworking of combined arms units by the fascist German 
troops' military command. An assault most often was executed 
simultaneously by tanks and motorized infantry with continuous 
accompaniment by aircraft. After artillery preparation of the 
assault, artillery and mortars would switch to artillery support 
of the assault, which was executed by a successive fire 
concentration or rolling barrage. Target designation and mutual 
coordination of infantry and tank operations with artillery and 
aircraft were distinguished by great precision. 
  In the defense, the combat efforts of combat arms were aimed 
at routing the enemy ahead of the forward edge of the "main 
battlefield" or at the very least inside the main defensive 
zone. To this end, in coordination with aircraft, artillery 
would prepare long-range fires on road junctions, chokepoints, 
and crossings. The most dangerous axes, boundaries and flanks 
would be covered by a fixed barrage. The infantry would 
establish a zone of massed, continuous rifle and machinegun fire 
ahead of the FEBA. Tanks and self-propelled artillery would be 
employed as fixed weapon emplacements and roving guns. 
  Questions of interworking were developed only in a general 
way in prewar U.S. Army field manuals. It is 
characteristic that tanks were not singled out as an independent 
combat arm. Their operations were covered in the "Infantry" 
sections. The Air Force, to the contrary, was separated out. It 
trained for independent operations. Tactical interworking of 
aircraft with ground troops on the battlefield was 
underestimated. The Americans paid for these and other 
miscalculations with losses in the first battles. 
  During the war commanders and staffs gave great attention to 
coordinating combat efforts of the combat arms. In organizing a 
breakthrough of the enemy defense, special attention was given 
to its reliable fire suppression in support of infantry and tank 
operations. To this end, a large number of aircraft were used 
for fire preparation of the assault in addition to artillery. 
Thus, 300-400 and sometimes even up to 500 tons of bombs per 
square kilometer were allocated to support an army corps 
offensive. 
  British Army wartime field manuals reflected the 
principle of interworking rather completely, but it was not 
always skillfully realized in practice. Offensive operations in 
the El Alamein area (1942) can serve as an example. Despite the 
fact that the British surpassed Italian-German troops by 1.5 
times in personnel, by 2 times in tanks and artillery and by 
several times in aircraft, the offensive was carried out at a 
low rate because of poor coordination of tank and infantry 
efforts with artillery and also inflexible command and control. 
In particular, aircraft were not used effectively. Bombing was 
not against targets, but areas. Air strikes did not conclude 
with an assault by ground troops. Artillery fire also was 
conducted against areas. And when guns and mortars fell silent 
and aircraft stopped flying sorties, the infantry and tanks, 
left without fire support, would launch an assault and suffer 
losses from enemy fire. 
  Interworking of British troops was accomplished rather 
precisely in subsequent operations. Operations of infantry, 
tanks and artillery were tied in skillfully with aircraft in 
accomplishing "close air support," which corresponded to our 
concept of the "air offensive." 
  Japanese Army tactics were characterized by great 
independence of operations by lightly armed detachments, 
especially in jungles and on mountainous terrain. The full 
burden of battle fell on the infantry. Artillery would conduct 
fire against areas; moreover, there was little artillery. The 
shortage of artillery was made up for by air operations; tanks 
were not employed everywhere. For example, tank troops did not 
see wide employment in combat operations in the southern seas. 
Only light tanks and light field artillery were used in battles. 
  In a defensive battle the Japanese relied chiefly on the 
staunchness of their infantry. The strong side of their defense 
was the troops' ability to adapt to terrain, make wide use of 
obstacles and ambushes, and make daring sallies into the enemy 
rear. Special raiding parties were established to destroy 
artillery batteries. Deceptive actions often were used in the 
defense, and fire would be opened from short range. Surprise 
counterattacks were widely employed, especially at night. On the 
whole, the defense was distinguished by great tenacity. In many 
cases defensive positions were defended to the last soldier. 
  The system of interworking saw some development in 
local wars. The employment of new kinds of weapons 
(jet aviation, combat helicopters, antitank and surface-to-air 
missile systems, new types of artillery, tanks, IFV's, homing 
munitions, fuel-air bombs and so on) dictated the appearance of 
new methods for coordinating combat efforts of personnel and 
equipment. For example, the complexity of interworking of ground 
troops with aviation increased sharply. Flights at supersonic 
speed hampered delivery of strikes against small targets near 
friendly troops due to brief time over the target and the 
difficulty of identifying it. 
  In connection with the conduct of airmobile operations, the 
need arose to organize interworking among motorized infantry, 
tanks, artillery and the combat and transport-attack helicopters 
which landed airborne assault forces and provided fire support. 
  The importance of the time factor rose substantially in 
coordinating combat efforts under the new conditions. Staff use 
of automated control systems simplified the solution to some 
planning questions, and especially facilitated performance of 
complex operational-tactical calculations. Based on an analysis 
of the Vietnam War experience, American specialists concluded 
that the time for planning combat operations for certain 
missions is reduced from 10 hours to 10 minutes using automated 
control systems.[.sup]30[/] 
  It can be seen from the above that the system of troop 
interworking underwent a complicated evolution over many 
centuries of the development of military art. Much accumulated 
experience remains significant even now. But weapons are 
changing and troop interworking changes; therefore past 
experience can be viewed only as a small step in ascending to 
new levels of combat perfection. 
<H5>  2. Principle of Interworking in Defensive Battle </H5>
  Experience in organizing and accomplishing interworking 
gained by Soviet troops in the Great Patriotic War served as the 
foundation, the starting point, for upgrading its system under 
present conditions. The principle of interworking is especially 
sensitive to changes in the material base of combined arms 
battle. Outfitting troops with new weapons and increasing their 
fire, striking, maneuver and protective qualities demand new 
approaches to realizing this and other principles in battle. 
  This section sets the goal of tracing how the content of 
interworking and conditions for its organization in modern 
defensive battle are changing and what new factors are 
influencing work methods of commanders and staffs, and on this 
basis developing certain practical recommendations for command 
and control entities in coordinating troop combat efforts. 
  The system of troop interworking presently functioning and 
reflected in field manuals is the result of lengthy historical 
development. Many provisions on interworking in prewar Red Army 
Field Service Regulations were viewed completely differently 
than now. For example, it was believed that combat efforts of 
combat arms and elements of the combat formation should be 
coordinated by lines and objectives in the 
defense.[.sup]31[/] But that procedure of interworking was 
refuted by combat experience during the Great Patriotic War. 
This happened because "lines and objectives" are a very vague, 
nonspecific concept. It often turned out that each of the 
interworking commanders would designate them at his own 
discretion, which did not contribute to achieving uniformity of 
understanding of the objective of operations in battle, and this 
is the primary task in organizing interworking. Therefore it was 
determined in the course of the war that it was more advisable 
to organize interworking in the defense not by lines, but by 
missions being performed by troops.[.sup]32[/] This permitted 
tying in troop operations more purposefully in conducting 
battle. Subsequently, in addition to coordinating efforts by 
missions, it also was deemed necessary to organize interworking 
by options of defensive battle and by axes of enemy operations. 
  In principle, with some updating, this system of organizing 
interworking in the defense also is deemed advisable for present 
conditions. Thus, the "Boyevoy ustav Sukhoputnykh voysk" [Ground 
Troops Field Manual] presently in force states: "The battalion 
(company) commander organizes interworking by missions, probable 
axes of enemy advance, and options of subunit 
operations."[.sup]33[/] 
  But while the logical schematic for coordinating troop 
combat 
efforts in the modern defense basically remains the same, the 
content of interworking and work methods of commanders and 
staffs in organizing it are changing substantially. Much has 
appeared here that is new. The expansion in spatial limits of 
battle has a great influence on the system of interworking. 
Thus, in determining the probable nature of enemy operations, it 
is now no longer possible, as in the past, to be limited to 
considering only that enemy grouping directly facing a formation 
or unit. 
  Proper coordination of defending troops' combat efforts 
requires anticipating what personnel and equipment the attacker 
can commit in conducting not only close combat, but also 
long-range battle. It is a question above all of means of 
nuclear attack, reconnaissance-strike and reconnaissance-fire 
complexes, and remote minelaying and EW equipment, the bulk of 
which is at the disposal of formation commanders and is 
dispersed at a considerable distance from the front line and in 
a broad zone. 
  The circumstance that modern battle has assumed a land-air 
nature also substantially affects the character of interworking. 
While in the World War II period a division commander preparing 
calculation data for coordinating troop combat efforts chiefly 
estimated the opposing enemy ground grouping and would estimate 
the air situation only in general, now, when combat operations 
on land and in the air comprise a single whole and are waged 
with identically high combat intensity, in coordinating troop 
combat efforts it is important to consider enemy use of tactical 
aviation, whose scale of employment is becoming ever broader, as 
shown by the experience of NATO troop exercises and Operation 
Desert Storm. Thus, a U.S. division is assigned 120-140 sorties 
for a day of battle.[.sup]34[/] 
  The landing of airborne assault forces is becoming massive. 
The U.S. command views them as an important element in realizing 
the "deep strike" concept. Based on NATO troop exercise 
experience, tactical airborne landings are made to a depth of 
60-70 km at brigade strength from the army corps, to 15-20 km at 
battalion strength from the division, and to 5-7 km at company 
strength from the brigade. In addition, wide use of raiding and 
reconnaissance units is envisaged. For example, up to 60 such 
teams are assigned from each Ranger battalion, 24 raiding and 
reconnaissance detachments from the army corps deep 
reconnaissance company, and 50-100 such detachments from a 
special-purpose team.[.sup]35[/] 
  Under those conditions the system for interworking of 
defending troops must be especially flexible. In coordinating 
combat operations, the division commander must take into account 
that aggressive combat operations can take in the full depth of 
the tactical defense zone simultaneously from the very beginning 
of battle. Based on this, it is necessary to provide for the 
possibility of units and subunits performing diverse sudden 
missions that arise and to tie in operations of all combat 
formation elements in such a way that they can repel enemy 
strikes not only from the front, but also from the flanks and 
rear, fight in encirclement, and combine positional and mobile 
forms of warfare. 
  Increased complexity of the mine situation has no small 
influence on interworking of troops in modern battle. It is 
common knowledge that the concept of "mine warfare" was 
officially incorporated in U.S. Army regulations in the 
mid-1980's. The most important role in it was set aside for use 
of remote minelaying systems and remotely laid minefields. Thus, 
according to U.S. command views, remotely laid minefields will 
make up 80 percent of the total volume of obstacles emplaced in 
an air-land offensive operation.[.sup]36[/] 
  In coordinating troop operations it is important to take 
into 
account when, in what stage of battle, for what purpose, against 
what area and by what method the attacking enemy may employ 
remote minelaying systems and accordingly think out questions of 
how to organize observation and a mine danger warning to troops, 
how to reconnoiter remotely laid minefields, how to clear lanes 
in them, and also what the procedure is for restoring unit and 
subunit combat effectiveness after the enemy delivers a massive 
fire strike by remote minelaying systems. 
  Tactical exercise experience shows that in connection with 
the expanded spatial scope of modern battle, the combined arms 
formation commander must have data on the enemy grouping 
disposed on a territory 2-3 times larger than the division area 
of responsibility for a full situation estimate in support of 
decisionmaking and organization of interworking. In short, now 
he is obligated to keep an eye on the enemy continuously not 
only at the tactical but also at the operational level. It 
stands to reason that data of the situation taking shape in 
zones of adjacent units must be communicated to the commander by 
the adjacent units and by higher headquarters. 
  The end result of the enemy estimate in support of 
organization of interworking should be an identification of axes 
of his delivery of the main attack and other attacks, 
identification of the makeup and nature of operations by 
groupings on each axis, and possible methods of his delivery of 
fire strikes and execution of a maneuver of personnel and 
equipment on the ground and by air. 
  The interests of interworking in modern defensive battle 
demand that forecasting of the nature of friendly troop 
operations be more comprehensive and on a larger scale. This is 
connected with the fact that tactics depends on operational art 
and strategy now as never before. The division is capable of 
accomplishing many combat missions only in close interworking 
with operational-level assets which combat enemy aviation, 
reconnaissance-strike complexes, cruise missiles, robotized 
weapons and EW assets; disrupt his system for command and 
control of troops and weapons; provide reliable air and 
antilanding defense and so on. 
  Consequently, in making the decision for battle and in 
organizing interworking, the division commander should have a 
clear picture of the role and place of his formation in the 
operation and its capabilities to perform the assigned combat 
mission, and know how interworking is organized with the senior 
commander's personnel and equipment and with adjacent units, 
especially in such matters as disrupting or weakening an enemy 
precision weapons strike; combating his aircraft, 
reconnaissance, airborne assault forces and EW assets; 
conducting counterpreparation fire; prohibiting the forward 
movement of attack groupings from forming-up places to the final 
coordination line; and also providing protection of friendly 
command and control systems and electronics against enemy 
jamming. 
  In analyzing conditions affecting the organization of 
interworking in modern defensive battle, it is important to note 
the increased volume and complexity of tasks being performed in 
coordinating combat efforts and at the same time the sharp 
reduction in time set aside for carrying them out. While 3-4 
days most often were allocated in the Great Patriotic War for 
organizing interworking at the division-regimental level in 
preparing a defense in the absence of immediate contact with the 
enemy, now a matter of hours will be set aside for this purpose, 
especially in the initial period of war. 
  It is necessary to call attention to the fact that in making 
decisions and organizing interworking, the commander and staff 
now must collect, generalize and process approximately 4-5 times 
more information than in the past war. Information has become 
more complex in content, and collecting and evaluating it 
require greater efforts. This is dictated by the fact that the 
combat operations zone of formations and units has increased by 
many times. For example, while a division in the Great Patriotic 
War defended a zone 10-12 km wide and 6-8 km deep and the area 
of its "combat zone" was 60-100 km[.sup]2[/], a division now 
receives a defensive area 30-40 km or more wide and 20-30 km 
deep based on NATO troop exercise experience.[.sup]37[/] 
Accordingly, the territory on which formation defensive 
operations unfold increased to 600-1,200 km[.sup]2[/], which 
exceeds the division "combat zone" in the past war by 10-12 
times. 
  With consideration of the increased number of missions for 
collecting, processing and analyzing information and performing 
operational-tactical calculations in order to organize 
interworking, a decisive role belongs to simulation of combat 
operations and to skilled, creative use of computers by 
officials of command and control entities. Above all, performing 
calculation and information tasks using computers involves 
assessing combat capabilities of units and subunits, the 
quantitative and qualitative ratio of the sides' personnel and 
equipment by axes and by successively performed missions, and 
personnel and equipment densities being established; assessing 
the effectiveness of enemy nuclear and fire damage; establishing 
a fire plan; determining methods of combat employment of field 
artillery, air defense weapons and army aviation; assessing 
capabilities of tactical reconnaissance and EW; and organizing 
engineer and logistic support. 
  In organizing interworking it must be taken into account 
that 
defensive battle usually begins with a repulse of a massive 
enemy air strike, which can immediately encompass all elements 
of the troop combat alignment. The attacker obviously will 
concentrate his main efforts on destroying weapons; facilities 
for command and control of troops and weapons; targets of the 
antitank defense, air defense and antilanding defense systems; 
as well as troops defending in main and second defense zones and 
reserves. Taking this into account, top-priority measures in 
coordinating troop combat operations are aimed at creating 
favorable conditions for delivering a massive surprise 
retaliatory fire strike against the enemy and preserving 
stability of the defense, no matter what. 
  Based on tactical exercise experience, in organizing 
interworking in this stage special attention is given to 
ensuring troop survivability by a sensible alignment of the 
combat formation of units and subunits, their optimum dispersal, 
timely development of a set of protective measures, prompt 
removal of troops away from presumed massive enemy strikes, and 
execution of a decisive fire-evasion maneuver. To this end the 
combined arms commander determines probable axes of enemy air 
raids, lines from which fire support helicopter attacks are 
possible, and favorable locations for air defense weapon firing 
positions to repel surprise enemy air operations. 
  We will note that tactics of conducting combat operations by 
the roving ambush method have seen wide use lately in air 
defense troops in repelling enemy air strikes. That method of 
employing air defense weapons is practiced especially often in 
the battle to hold the security area. Use of fire ambushes 
enables, first of all, intercepting enemy aircraft and 
helicopters on approaches to the defense; and secondly, tying in 
operations of air defense weapons more closely with operations 
of forward detachments. Based on exercise experience, the 
following were methods of interworking of roving ambushes. 
Several SAM and AAA subunits usually were assigned to combat 
enemy aircraft in each grouping of air defense troops and were 
disposed throughout the depth of the security area. Their 
mission was to deliver surprise attacks periodically against 
airborne targets entering their zone of fire and to cover 
defending subunits. Immediately after firing, the air defense 
subunit would covertly displace to other positions chosen in 
advance and which had had engineer preparation. Constant subunit 
maneuvering in combination with the presence of dummy positions 
and simulation of activity reduced the effectiveness of enemy 
reconnaissance, thereby misleading him. 
  Coordinating the efforts of aviation and combat arms to 
inflict damage on the enemy on distant approaches to the defense 
presents a special complication for commanders and staffs of 
defending troops in organizing interworking. The effectiveness 
of interworking in performing this mission is determined by the 
ability to forecast the nature of an attacker's operations when 
moving from forming-up places up to the final coordination line, 
and determining the targets against which strikes should be 
delivered and what personnel and equipment must be used for 
this. The priority of targets should be established in this case 
based on the following sequence. Above all it is necessary to 
try to reduce the enemy's nuclear and fire-delivery potential by 
destroying means of nuclear attack and combat complexes of 
precision weapons, disrupting the system for command and control 
of weapons and troops, and destroying airmobile forces and army 
aviation. With personnel and equipment available, the mission is 
assigned to disrupt the enemy's forward movement and organized 
assault. 
  Delivery of nuclear and fire strikes against a 
forward-moving 
enemy grouping is tied in by time and place with remote mining 
of terrain, so the obstacles and destruction being created cause 
troops to concentrate and thereby help increase enemy losses. As 
the attacker's offensive grouping approaches the FEBA, it is 
important to try to ensure that the intensity of the fire effect 
grows continuously, initially by bringing in army aviation and 
long-range artillery and then by massing close-combat weapons, 
including by maneuvering them from other axes. 
  More and more importance is now attached to operations by 
covering troops in the fight for the tactical defensive zone. 
The defender's mission is to do everything necessary to turn the 
security area into a forward defensive zone. Some forward 
detachments unquestionably are incapable of achieving this goal. 
In order for them to be able to delay the forward movement of 
enemy units and inflict losses on them, it is necessary to 
support their operations by air strikes and artillery fire and 
to make wide use of various obstacles. 
  Wresting the fire initiative from the enemy is one of the 
defenders' difficult tasks. It is possible to achieve this if 
all weapons of the defense are used in coordination under a 
single plan and a single leadership. It is especially important 
to ensure immediate destruction of fast-acting enemy precision 
weapons and attack assets immediately after they are detected. 
The selection of weapons and methods of their actions depends on 
the target type and characteristics, its protection, and 
conditions of mission performance. 
  As shown by the experience of Operation Desert Storm, base 
airfields, missile launch positions, ground command and control 
facilities and operational-tactical missile launchers have high 
survivability even with the effect of precision weapon systems 
against them. Combating enemy reconnaissance-strike complexes 
possessing high accuracy, high reconnaissance reliability, high 
speed, high accuracy of dispensing homing-head-equipped 
submunitions against targets, and long range presents special 
difficulty. 
  Combating reconnaissance-strike complexes represents a 
combination of interrelated measures of reconnaissance and their 
swift destruction. It is conducted by all available means to 
prevent or hamper the complexes from affecting friendly troops 
and to win fire superiority over the enemy. In organizing combat 
against reconnaissance-strike complexes, it is important to take 
their vulnerable aspects into account: Their electronic 
equipment's susceptibility to the effect of electronic jamming; 
difficulty for radar reconnaissance assets to recognize real 
ground targets; possibility of diverting homing munitions 
(missiles) to false targets and decoys; and decreased 
capabilities for detecting ground targets and decreased accuracy 
of guiding munitions (missiles) to them when the enemy takes 
maskirovka measures. 
  Efforts by personnel and assets in organizing combat against 
enemy reconnaissance-strike complexes are coordinated to ensure 
their prompt detection and destruction. Main efforts are 
concentrated here on destroying ground command and control 
centers; reconnaissance and vectoring (relay) aircraft as well 
as strike aircraft in the air and on airfields; missile 
launchers at launch positions, when changing positions and in 
concentration areas; and guided aerial bombs and air-to-surface 
guided missiles. Prompt detection and preemptive destruction of 
enemy reconnaissance-strike complexes are achieved by collecting 
necessary intelligence and communicating it to commanders and 
staffs in a short time, by making substantiated decisions for 
their destruction, by rapidly assigning missions to troops, and 
by organizing precise interworking and command and control of 
forces and assets in the process of their destruction. 
  In coordinating combat efforts of assets being used to 
combat 
reconnaissance-strike complexes, it is important to achieve 
their comprehensive employment by inflicting fire damage on the 
reconnaissance-strike complexes simultaneously with electronic 
suppression of their control systems and also with the capture 
and destruction or disabling of their ground elements by 
motorized rifle, tank, airborne, air-assault and reconnaissance 
subunits. A necessary condition for effective combat against 
reconnaissance-strike complexes is continuous weapon effect on 
them. This requires constantly conducting effective 
reconnaissance and inflicting damage on their elements on the 
ground and in the air under all situation conditions in the 
course of the entire battle, taking advantage of the maximum 
reach of existing weapons. 
  Staff duties in preparing data for the commander for 
organizing interworking to combat enemy reconnaissance-strike 
complexes include the following: Ascertaining what procedure the 
senior commander has established for engaging 
reconnaissance-strike complexes, what personnel and equipment 
are being assigned for this, and what requires final 
reconnaissance in the enemy grouping and by what time; 
calculating the detail of personnel and assets necessary for 
combating reconnaissance-strike complexes; outlining the 
procedure for coordinating efforts of aircraft, artillery, and 
air defense and EW assets in performing that mission; 
determining possible missions and procedure of operations of 
airborne assault forces and of raiding, enveloping, 
reconnaissance and air assault detachments for capture or 
destruction of ground elements of the reconnaissance-strike 
complexes; and also determining who supports their operations 
when and how, and the signals for mutual recognition and target 
designation. 
  In organizing interworking of personnel and assets assigned 
for combating reconnaissance-strike complexes, the formation 
commander clarifies the following: Capabilities of aviation for 
reconnoitering and engaging them, sorties allocated for this, 
and time and methods for delivering strikes; missions assigned 
to artillery for destroying ground elements of 
reconnaissance-strike complexes, the makeup of personnel and 
assets used for this, and the procedure for them to perform the 
assigned mission; procedure for using air defense personnel and 
assets for destroying airborne elements of reconnaissance-strike 
complexes, methods of their operations, and procedure for 
interworking with aircraft; and capabilities of EW personnel and 
assets to suppress electronic targets of enemy 
reconnaissance-strike complexes and the procedure for their 
interworking with other personnel and assets assigned to combat 
those complexes. 
  Interworking is organized with special thoroughness in the 
fight to hold the main defensive zone. Stability and 
aggressiveness of the defense are ensured by a number of 
factors, above all by use of methods of aligning the defense, 
use of troop groupings, and their conduct of defensive 
operations appropriate to the situation. In one instance this 
will be achieved by firmly holding occupied lines in combination 
with counterattacks by troops from the depth, in another case by 
using mobile methods of warfare, and in a third case by their 
combination. 
  Coordinated operations of motorized rifle and tank units and 
subunits with artillery and with air defense and engineer units 
and subunits and aviation are of decisive importance both in a 
positional and a mobile defense. The principal objective of the 
interworking troops is to nullify the enemy's quantitative and 
qualitative superiority, impose one's will on the enemy by 
aggressive operations and use of new, nonstandard procedures, 
and wear down and exhaust his offensive grouping. Efforts of 
defending troops must be built up at a preemptive rate so it is 
possible to promptly close breaches that have formed by means of 
a fire concentration; by forward movement of antitank reserves, 
mobile obstacle detachments, and subunits removed from secondary 
axes; and also by remote mining of the terrain. 
  Combat helicopters play an important role in timely 
concentration of fire efforts on threatened axes. In organizing 
interworking with them it is necessary to make full use of their 
advantages such as the absence of a need for specially prepared 
landing sites, the capability for conducting combat operations 
regardless of terrain relief and presence of obstacles, 
capability for swift maneuver, high accuracy (probability of 
killing the target with the first launch of missiles), use of 
the factor of surprise, sudden appearance from behind cover when 
in a hover mode, capability for multipurpose use, employment of 
main weapons whose radius of action exceeds the range of the 
majority of tactical air defense systems, and the capability of 
combat employment with very low cloud cover. 
  But employment of helicopters also has substantial 
shortcomings: Lengthy time in a hover mode and the resultant 
high probability of the helicopter being killed by various kinds 
of weapons; the action of many guided missile systems from a 
distance no closer than 400-500 m; total or partial 
unsuitability of helicopters for all-weather use; practical 
impossibility even of a temporary seizure of terrain sectors by 
a helicopter subunit; limited conditions of visibility (absence 
of all-around view); and weapon effectiveness only in the 
absence of jamming. 
  The experience of local wars shows that so-called helicopter 
"roving elements" operating with motorized infantry and tank 
subunits are very effective in performing such missions as 
closing breaches, securing flanks, covering gaps and combating 
enemy raiding and enveloping detachments. Apache, Lynx-3 and 
Gazelle fire support helicopters and Black Hawk, Iroquois and 
Lynx AH-1 multipurpose helicopters with motorized infantry and 
combat engineer subunits aboard usually are included as part of 
such elements. For continuous fire effect on the enemy for the 
entire period of combat operations it is envisaged employing the 
"one-third" principle: One subunit attacks the enemy; a second 
is en route to deliver a fire strike or is en route after its 
execution; and the third is at a forward ammunition resupply and 
refueling point. 
  In examining the problem of interworking in modern defensive 
battle, it is impossible to ignore the circumstance that, in 
contrast to the past, one now has to coordinate efforts of 
defending troops in such a way as to have an opportunity to 
successfully combat enemy units and subunits which have been 
landed or have penetrated to the rear of friendly troops while 
simultaneously repelling an enemy frontal assault. To this end 
appropriate measures are envisaged, first of all, for detecting 
a landing of enemy airborne assault forces and raiding and 
reconnaissance units and a penetration into the rear of 
defending troops by his raiding, forward and enveloping 
detachments; and secondly, for disrupting their performance of 
missions and destroying them. 
  During the Great Patriotic War the enemy usually was fought 
in the depth of the friendly troop disposition by the 
territorial principle, i.e., commanders of combined arms units 
and chiefs of rear facilities were given responsibility for 
destroying enemy airborne assault forces and subunits which had 
penetrated their assigned areas of responsibility, which if 
necessary were divided into sectors and the latter into sections 
combining important facilities and their defending troops within 
their boundaries. Additional subunits would be assigned if 
necessary to reinforce the defending troops for "sweeping" the 
terrain. 
  The territorial principle of combating the enemy in the rear 
of friendly troops in the defense retains its importance even 
under present conditions. This obligates units and subunits to 
be ready to destroy enemy airborne assault forces and other 
units regardless of their place in the combat formation. But in 
addition, performing this mission also requires the assignment 
of special antilanding reserves, reinforcing them with 
artillery, combat helicopters and engineer subunits. In 
coordinating efforts of antilanding forces, it is important to 
tie their actions in with airborne and ground surveillance 
posts, various patrols, traffic control posts and air defense 
weapons in order to detect the appearance of enemy units 
promptly, warn friendly troops of this and take steps to destroy 
them without delay. 
  Organizing interworking presents the greatest difficulty in 
the dynamics of defensive battle when combat efforts of 
defending troops are to be transferred from one position or line 
to another, i.e., with transition from a positional to a mobile 
defense. The uniqueness of conditions in this case consists of 
the extraordinary dynamic nature and intensity of the situation. 
Having the initiative, the enemy can make wide use of close and 
deep envelopments to cut off and encircle withdrawing subunits, 
land airborne assault forces in their rear, and make deep 
penetrations to preempt defending troops in moving to favorable 
lines in the depth. 
  In coordinating efforts of units and subunits under these 
conditions, it is important to ensure that the main body breaks 
contact with the attacker; and to tie him up for a certain time 
with battles in the space between positions by means of 
aggressive actions of covering subunits, skilled use of mobile 
antitank subunits and helicopter and ground ambushes, and the 
conduct of surprise counterattacks even with forces of small 
subunits, as well as by emplacing obstacles primarily by remote 
minelaying equipment. Strikes by missile troops and aircraft, 
and artillery fire from indirect firing positions are organized 
so as to ensure engagement of the enemy from maximum ranges, 
prevent his approach, deployment and preparation for an assault, 
counter deep and close envelopments, and, most important, win 
time and achieve a timely maneuver of withdrawing subunits to 
occupy a favorable line in the depth. 
  The art of organizing interworking in conducting a mobile 
defense lies in inflicting damage with limited personnel and 
equipment on an enemy who is many times superior in personnel 
and equipment; winning time; placing enemy troops in difficult 
conditions, hampering their maneuver and at the same time 
conserving one's own forces; being able to move troops out from 
under an enemy attack in time; drawing the attacker into fire 
pockets or under attack from ambushes; and misleading him 
regarding one's true intentions by deception procedures. 
<H3>  3. Principle of Interworking in Offensive Battle and the 
Meeting Engagement </H3>
  The procedure developed in the Great Patriotic War for 
coordinating combat efforts of troops in the offensive retains 
its significance even under present conditions. The 1989 
"Boyevoy ustav Sukhoputnykh voysk" [Ground Troops Field Manual] 
states that interworking should be organized by missions, lines, 
time and methods of mission execution.[.sup]38[/] With 
respect to the content of interworking, procedures for its 
organization, and work methods of command and control entities, 
much has changed here compared with the past both in the defense 
as well as in the offensive battle and meeting engagement under 
the influence of new factors of warfare which appeared in 
postwar times. 
  The sequence of developing questions of interworking in 
combined arms battle is shown in Fig. 13. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-003LC-71A>             Fig. 13. Sequence of developing questions ofFigure 1. Artillery Battalion </FIG>



  In analyzing the system of troop interworking established in 
the past war, it is easy to note that a certain method was 
inherent to it. This reflected the planned nature of conducting 
the offensive. It would begin during breakthrough of the enemy 
defense with artillery and air preparation of the assault, and 
included the successive taking of the first, second and 
subsequent defensive positions. Troop combat efforts would build 
up during the battle for them. Then the troops would exploit the 
success achieved and shift to the pursuit under favorable 
conditions (Fig. 14). Thus, troop combat efforts would be 
coordinated for these and similar individual missions. 




    Now the attacker strives to deliver deep strikes at the very 
beginning of battle, take in the entire enemy tactical defensive 
zone with aggressive combat operations, immobilize all elements 
of his combat alignment, transfer combat efforts into the depth 
as quickly as possible, and establish a constantly operating 
front in the enemy rear by landing the air echelon there and by 
the swift penetration of forward units and of raiding and 
enveloping detachments. It is understandable that this method of 
the offensive predetermines methods of coordinating combat 
efforts of elements of the combat formation of combat arms units 
differently than before, inasmuch as they have to operate 
dispersed across a broad front and to a great depth in 
performing diverse missions. 
  A flexible "multiechelon" system of interworking should 
correspond to that character of the land-air battle. In 
organizing it, commanders and staffs must take into account the 
possibility of the sides' deep mutual penetrations, conduct of 
battle with an "inverted" front, and a rapid, abrupt transition 
from one kind of combat operations to another, which 
predetermines continuous correction of the battle plan and the 
system of interworking. 
  Under those conditions commanders and staff officers should 
display profound tactical prudence, anticipate how combat events 
might develop, what resistance the enemy will offer in the 
battle for a particular objective, and what new combat 
procedures and kinds of weapons he may employ; accordingly, they 
should determine how to use the attack and maneuver capabilities 
of friendly combat arms more effectively and how to tie their 
actions in with each other so it is possible to make up for weak 
aspects of one kind of weapon with strong aspects of others. 
  In view of the fact that frequent "interruptions" in the 
system of interworking are possible in the course of battle 
either due to enemy effect on advancing troops or due to 
subordinates' imprecise actions and inability to organize, it is 
important to react to situation changes exceptionally swiftly, 
take prompt measures preventing disruption of the prescribed 
procedure for coordinated actions, update missions for subunits, 
and correctly determine the primary importance of a particular 
combat arm in achieving success so as to involve all other 
forces and assets in support of its operations. 
  It is impossible to ignore the fact that many 
military-theoretical works give the recommendation that 
interworking in the offensive should be organized in greatest 
detail to the depth of performance of the immediate 
mission.[.sup]39[/] It would appear that this approach to 
coordinating efforts does not fully reflect the altered 
conditions of modern battle, which has become deep and vast, in 
connection with which it is difficult to factor out where the 
primary mission is being accomplished. While in the past, when 
the capture of enemy defensive positions was the basis of 
attacking troops' combat missions and the range of the bulk of 
division and regimental weapons was relatively short, the 
provisions indicated above for planning battle in detail only to 
a shallow depth were fully justified. Now the situation has 
changed. 
  The grouping of enemy weapons has become the basis of the 
defense, which largely predetermines its stability. It is 
impossible to disrupt the defensive system without having 
destroyed this grouping. But for this it is necessary to deliver 
strikes both against his close-range as well as long-range 
weapons simultaneously. Consequently, in preparing the offensive 
it is advisable to plan interworking in all details essentially 
to the full depth of the combat mission. This will enable 
interworking commanders and staffs to correctly calculate their 
personnel and equipment and distribute the available resource of 
ammunition, fuels and lubricants and other supplies for the 
entire period of battle. 
  Many new requirements for organization of reconnaissance of 
the enemy defense, discovery of his deep targets, a larger-scale 
situation estimate, thorough performance of operational-tactical 
calculations and simulation of combat operations stem from what 
has been said. Inasmuch as the system of defense alignment now 
largely has changed and main troop efforts are concentrated on 
holding not so much positions as vital areas (which is where the 
main weapons as well as follow-on forces are concentrated), it 
is necessary to coordinate the operations of attacking units and 
subunits not only by lines and objectives, but also by the most 
important areas whose capture will ensure undermining of the 
stability of the entire defensive system of an enemy formation 
or unit. 
  Major changes in the nature of modern battle dictated by 
employment of new weapons demand determining the sequence of 
coordinating troop combat efforts by individual missions 
differently than before. Thus, previously organization of 
interworking would begin with the tying in of operations in the 
period of artillery and air preparation of the assault. 
Preparatory measures preceding this were left outside the 
framework of the interworking process. This was explained by the 
fact that the offensive against a deliberate enemy defense was 
carried out as a rule from a position occupied in immediate 
contact with the enemy, and only in rare cases did the latter 
have an opportunity to strike an offensive troop grouping poised 
for an assault by conducting artillery and air 
counterpreparation and thereby disrupting the assault. 
  Now the danger of an offensive being disrupted has increased 
considerably and this circumstance is impossible to ignore, 
especially as troops may launch an offensive not only from a 
position of defense, but also often while moving forward from 
forming-up places occupied in the depth or from the march. But 
it is common knowledge that troop vulnerability to enemy 
precision weapons is especially high during forward movement, as 
they are not under cover. And in an offensive, the danger of 
troops being hit if the defender delivers fire strikes also 
increases, especially at the moment they launch an assault. 
  With consideration of this, it appears advisable to take 
measures aimed at preventing the enemy from disrupting an 
offensive. This task is very difficult and many-sided. Its 
accomplishment presumes coordination of efforts of all 
interworking personnel and equipment so as to ensure effective 
fire and electronic countermeasures to enemy weapons, reliable 
fire cover from the ground and from the air for troops moving 
forward, their swift negotiation of obstacles created by enemy 
remote minelaying equipment, and combat against enemy airborne 
assault forces, tactical airmobile detachments and raiding and 
reconnaissance units being landed on routes of forward movement 
and in the rear of attacking troops. It is important to ensure 
high survivability and protection of subunits against strikes by 
the defender's precision weapon systems and rapid restoration of 
troop combat effectiveness in case they are subjected to enemy 
nuclear and fire strikes. 
  In coordinating actions of units and subunits in the process 
of forward movement, deployment and launching an assault, it is 
necessary to take into account the range and effectiveness of 
enemy weapons which may bring pressure on forward-moving units. 
Timely engagement of those weapons whose impact zone they 
successively enter as they approach the FEBA should be envisaged 
for this. Above all it is necessary to destroy ground and 
airborne elements of reconnaissance-strike complexes, missile 
launchers, MLRS, combat helicopters on pads, field artillery 
employing guided munitions, ATGM systems and other antitank 
weapons, especially armored targets. Simultaneously, one should 
coordinate efforts of missile troops and artillery with aviation 
for engaging personnel and weapons in company or platoon 
strongpoints during fire preparation and then also during fire 
support of an assault by motorized rifle and tank subunits. 
  In coordinating efforts of troops moving forward for 
combating enemy airborne assault forces, their possible landing 
areas are determined, necessary antilanding forces are assigned, 
and helicopter ambushes are arranged whose operations are tied 
in with air strikes and artillery fire and also with actions of 
forward-moving motorized rifle and tank subunits. In determining 
the procedure for negotiating mass obstacles created by the 
enemy in the period of the troops' forward movement, it is 
necessary to take into account when and by what method he may 
emplace them. Surprise "straddling" of subunits' combat or march 
formation by remote minelaying equipment presents special danger. 
  It must be borne in mind that all remotely laid mines have 
safety devices preventing premature initiation. Many are armed 
5-8 minutes after falling to the ground. With the presence of 
such devices confirmed and the type of mines determined, the 
best method of troop actions is their immediate departure from 
the mined area without clearing lanes; but a halt can be made if 
the opportunity presents itself. Being in a mined area even for 
a short time (2-4 hours) may reduce losses from exploding mines, 
since after a certain time the mines' self-destruction 
(neutralization) elements are triggered. In the course of 
forward movement one should expect minelaying by the "straddle" 
method in route sectors where going around them is difficult (in 
chokepoints, in defiles, on crossings). In this case organizing 
duties of observation and warning of mine danger assumes special 
importance. 
  In coordinating troop combat efforts to counter enemy 
weapons 
which may disrupt or hamper the operations of attacking 
subunits, it is necessary on the one hand to take steps to 
promptly detect enemy fire control facilities, aircraft 
vectoring posts, ground and airborne elements of 
reconnaissance-strike and reconnaissance-fire complexes, 
position areas of missile troops, artillery firing positions and 
helicopter landing sites; and on the other hand to ensure the 
readiness and capability of friendly weapons for immediate, 
effective pressure on the above. 
  Along with active methods of troop operations aimed at 
preventing enemy disruption of an offensive, in organizing 
interworking one also cannot lose sight of the need for carrying 
out such measures as ensuring covertness of the offensive and 
survivability of subunits. To this end, in choosing routes of 
forward movement make maximum use of the terrain's protective 
and concealing features. Optical and radar dead ground formed by 
relief and local features can be used for protecting equipment 
moving along prepared routes against enemy precision weapon 
systems, while heat-emitting and radar decoys are set up along 
routes in sectors capable of being observed. Meanwhile, it is 
advisable to prepare dummy routes, and radar reflectors should 
be set up in their open sectors. 
  Efforts of interworking personnel and equipment should be 
coordinated with special thoroughness to achieve an organized, 
resolute assault of the enemy FEBA. This is the culmination of 
battle. The defender will strive to commit the maximum of 
close-range and long-range weapons to bring pressure on 
assaulting subunits. One can judge the intensity of his fire at 
this moment from the fact that just with organic weapons a 
defending motorized infantry battalion can use more than 300 
weapons of various kinds for repulsing an assault, including 
over 100 long-range antitank weapons capable of hitting armored 
targets beginning from ranges of 3,000-4,000 m. 
  Hence the need arises to coordinate employment of friendly 
weapons so as to subject weapons situated not only on the enemy 
FEBA, but also in the depth to simultaneous pressure. But this 
requires reconnoitering the defensive system and having precise 
knowledge of the location of each dug-in tank, gun and IFV as 
well as ATGM. To ensure a successful assault it is necessary to 
destroy at least 70-80 percent of antitank weapons right during 
fire preparation. 
  The procedure for engaging enemy targets at his first 
defensive position and in the depth may be as follows. Armored 
antitank weapons situated immediately in front of assaulting 
subunits and on flanks of the penetration sector are destroyed 
by the fire of artillery pieces, ATGM systems and combat 
helicopters. At the same time, aircraft and MLRS strikes are 
delivered against the following situated in the defensive depth: 
Enemy tanks and antitank subunits (with ATGM systems on an 
armored base), MLRS batteries, and antitank helicopter subunits 
at their bases. Combat helicopters play an important role in 
destroying armored targets and other targets in the enemy 
defense during an assault. In organizing interworking with them, 
the combined arms commander indicates when and against which 
targets to deliver a strike; the procedure for mutual 
recognition of friendly subunits; and target designation 
signals. Helicopter subunits can deliver simultaneous strikes at 
full strength or with the bulk of forces against preassigned 
targets at a designated time, or successive strikes against 
targets newly detected in the course of an assault, with 
departure on call from an alert status at staging sites, from 
ambushes, or from airborne alert. With a sharply changing ground 
situation, intensive enemy electronic jamming, and with reliable 
suppression of his air defense weapons, helicopters may carry 
out an independent target search (target-of-opportunity roving). 
Here is how this was done in exercises. 
  A pair of fire support helicopters usually was assigned for 
a 
search. The distance between them in depth was 1,000-1,500 m 
with the very same altitude. On detecting a target, the 
helicopters would deliver a strike against it and if necessary 
would call in a reinforcing element and vector it to the strike 
target. Helicopters would make a target approach from a 
favorable direction which ensured covertness of the approach, 
reliable detection and recognition of the target, and a swift 
attack. Best conditions for a surprise strike were created with 
an approach to the target below the lower limit of the impact 
zone of air defense systems, which is possible when flying at an 
extremely low altitude (20-30 m) and taking advantage of folds 
of the terrain. With heavy enemy air defense, helicopters would 
engage the enemy while above friendly subunit combat formations. 
  Based on experience of combat operations in Afghanistan, 
combat helicopters would employ the following methods of attack 
-- from level flight, a dive, or a hover. 
  An attack from level flight would be made for engaging 
targets with ATGM's and free-flight rockets. Duration of the 
strike was shortened and its effectiveness was achieved when 
helicopters employed the maximum number of weapons in one pass. 
Helicopters would deliver strikes without going beyond limits of 
the disposition of friendly subunit combat formations. 
  An attack from a dive was executed for hitting targets with 
free-flight rockets, but here the range to the target did not 
exceed 1,000-1,500 m. With weak opposition from enemy air 
defense weapons, such an attack was used to hit targets situated 
in folds of the terrain, in shelters, and behind reverse 
hillslopes, i.e., when an attack from level flight proved 
impossible. 
  A helicopter attack from a hover is the most effective. In a 
hover mode the helicopter can employ all kinds of weapons 
(ATGM's, free-flight rockets) and conduct machinegun fire. The 
helicopter must change its position after each launch in a hover 
mode. 
  The experience of the Great Patriotic War and local wars 
showed that greatest difficulties in maintaining interworking 
are created during battle in the depth of the enemy defense, 
which is characterized by unpredictability of the development of 
events and the frequent appearance of crisis situations. Far 
from everything can be anticipated in advance in operations of 
combat formation elements and combat arms before the beginning 
of an offensive. Therefore one must be ready for the fact that 
in the course of battle it will be necessary to substantially 
correct or even create the system of interworking anew more than 
once. 
  It can be expected that as attacking troops wedge into the 
defense, the enemy will step up resistance and do everything 
possible to localize the penetration. Therefore in the course of 
battle there will be a stubborn contest of the sides in building 
up combat efforts. Under such conditions, preempting the enemy 
in maneuvering and in delivering fire strikes and disrupting his 
plan are of great importance. It is important not to give him an 
opportunity to restore a disrupted fire and obstacle plan or to 
carry out a planned redeployment of personnel and assets 
laterally and out of the depth. Successful performance of these 
and other missions by the attacking troops largely depends on 
coordination of their operations by objective, place and time. 
  It is especially important to achieve precision and 
cohesiveness of troop operations in building up combat efforts 
on a decisive axis, i.e., where success has appeared. 
  Above all a commander must decide on the method by which he 
should strive to continuously maintain decisive superiority over 
the enemy on the main axis. It is common knowledge that in World 
War II essentially the only method of building up efforts was to 
commit second echelons or reserves. Now the prevailing place is 
held by fire strikes of reconnaissance-strike and 
reconnaissance-fire complexes, missile troops, and aviation and 
by artillery fire. The advantage of this method lies in 
swiftness of execution. 
  In addition, at the present time there has been a 
considerable expansion in troop capabilities for building up 
efforts by employing airborne assault forces and airmobile 
subunits. Landed in the depth of the enemy defense right after 
fire strikes, they are capable of quickly exploiting their 
results, capturing tactically important areas (road junctions, 
commanding heights, passes, built-up areas, crossings over water 
obstacles) and thereby preventing the approach of enemy reserves 
and contributing to exploitation of the success of first echelon 
units. 
  At crisis moments of battle, when there is the threat that 
the offensive will "lose steam" or even be disrupted, the 
commander will have to use all forces and assets at his disposal 
to retain the initiative, i.e., he must build up efforts both by 
a maneuver of fire as well as by commitment of the second 
echelon or reserve, and if possible also by landing an assault 
force in the enemy rear. It is necessary to achieve coordinated 
delivery of strikes against the defense simultaneously from the 
ground and air and from the front, flanks and rear in order to 
dissipate the enemy's attention and efforts. 
  This is a difficult task. By the time the second echelon is 
committed, the situation often can become critical as a result 
of the enemy's delivery of a surprise, stunning strike. It is 
not precluded that command and control will be disrupted and 
that some units and subunits will lose combat effectiveness. 
Under those conditions steps are taken above all to determine 
the true status of troops and restore disrupted command and 
control. The combat mission is updated for the commander of the 
subunit being committed and he is also told the point of 
commitment to battle, routes and time for moving to it, and 
procedure for fire support and interworking with first echelon 
subunits. If an airborne assault force is landed in the enemy 
rear and the dispatch of a raiding detachment is planned 
simultaneously with commitment of the second echelon, then their 
operations are coordinated by objective, place and time. 
  Under favorable conditions it is advisable to create smoke 
screens to ensure concealment of the second echelon's 
commitment. The procedure for employing smokes can vary. 
Blinding smoke screens in support of assaulting motorized rifle 
and tank subunits usually are laid down by artillery in terrain 
sectors easily viewed from the enemy's side at the point of 
commitment to battle. Blinding of the defender's antitank 
weapons and tanks by artillery smoke projectiles should begin 
3-5 minutes before the end of a fire assault and end with the 
arrival of assaulting subunits at the final coordination line. 
  Concealing smoke screens can be emplaced in the course of 
battle by the assaulting subunits themselves to hamper 
operations of enemy antitank helicopters and also to conceal a 
maneuver. Smoke generation begins with the subunits' arrival in 
the impact zone of enemy ATGM's or at the final coordination 
line. When the subunits approach the smoke screening line, smoke 
generation ceases and the assault is carried out. The experience 
of local wars shows that the effectiveness of employing enemy 
antitank weapons is reduced by 3-5 times with skillful use of 
concealing smoke screens and by 10-15 times when using blinding 
screens. It is advisable to use smoke assets suddenly across a 
broad front with consideration of terrain and weather conditions. 
  In conducting battle in the depth of the enemy defense, 
motorized rifle and tank units should interwork with aviation 
with special precision. The fact is that in a number of cases 
because of a lag, artillery will be the only means of troop 
support. Coordination of air and ground strikes on the 
battlefield is manifested in distributing targets between 
artillery and aviation, in establishing the priority of attacks 
between aircraft and helicopters, and in designating lines of 
responsibility. Safety measures are strictly observed. 
  In coordinating combat efforts of motorized rifle and tank 
units and artillery with aviation, the principle implemented is 
that aviation attacks those targets whose destruction by ground 
troops' weapons is hampered or impossible. Ground and air 
strikes are tied in by time and lines. Efforts of artillery, 
combat helicopters and aircraft are separated by time and lines. 
During the day the line of permissible air attack comes closer 
to the FEBA and at night it pulls back. Aircraft and helicopter 
flights are staggered in altitude and they are assigned routes 
by a joint air traffic control center. Fire support of front 
aviation, combat helicopters and artillery is directed according 
to a schedule compiled and coordinated in detail. 
  Experience gained in local wars and tactical exercises 
permits drawing certain conclusions with respect to 
characteristic shortcomings allowed by combined arms commanders 
in organizing and accomplishing interworking with aviation. 
Above all there often is a tendency to dissipate air efforts to 
combat numerous small targets instead of concentrating strikes 
against the most important objectives. Sometimes the role of 
long-range artillery is imposed on combat aircraft, i.e., they 
are assigned missions for engaging targets situated at a shallow 
depth. The principle of economy of allocated air sorties is not 
always adhered to; they are quickly used up when units perform 
the immediate mission and no sorties remain for supporting 
subsequent operations. It also often happens that, having called 
in aircraft to deliver a strike against one target, the combined 
arms commander changes their mission and strike targets when 
aircraft appear over the battlefield, as a result of which 
neither mission is executed. A shortcoming such as poor 
intelligence support to aviation also is typical. The air 
command element often is forced to conduct reconnaissance "for 
itself" and to concern itself with vectoring aircraft to 
designated targets and about their markings. 
  In conclusion, we will dwell on certain features of 
interworking in a meeting engagement. Above all we will note 
that usually it is organized under conditions of extremely 
limited time during the march, which requires high efficiency 
and cohesiveness in work of commanders and staffs and swiftness 
and precision of troop operations. General principles for 
organizing interworking are the very same as in the offensive. 
The distinction is that missions for units and subunits and the 
system of interworking must be updated more often. Special 
attention in coordinating troop combat efforts is given to 
preempting the enemy in deploying, opening fire and executing a 
maneuver. 
<H5>  Conclusions and Recommendations </H5>
  1. The principle of interworking is one of the fundamental 
principles of combined arms battle. It indicates that to achieve 
the assigned goal--to defeat the enemy--it is necessary to 
ensure precise operations of all personnel and assets 
participating in the battle, strictly coordinated by missions, 
axes, lines, time and methods of conducting battle. 
  2. Organization and accomplishment of interworking is a 
complex, many-sided, creative process of the commander and staff 
officers which requires them to have profound foresight of the 
development of events and the ability to effectively use fire, 
attack and maneuver capabilities of units and subunits of combat 
arms and special troops under various situation conditions, to 
closely tie their actions in with each other, and to make up for 
weak aspects and shortcomings of some with the strong aspects 
and advantages of other combat arms and special troops in order 
to successfully perform the combat mission by joint, coordinated 
efforts. 
  3. Fundamentals of interworking are laid down in the 
commander's decision, but interworking does not duplicate the 
decision; it develops and supplements it. While the important 
thing in the decision is to determine the objective of battle 
and methods of achieving it, the most important thing in 
organizing interworking is determine specific ways of fulfilling 
assigned missions with consideration of possible situation 
changes, different options of operations by friendly and enemy 
troops, and the appearance of crisis situations. 
  4. Although fundamentals of interworking in battle which 
were 
developed in the Great Patriotic War retain their significance 
even now, continuous renewal of the material base of modern 
battle requires searching for new ways of realizing this 
principle with consideration of demands of deep, air-ground, 
electronic battle characterized by an ever growing spatial 
scope, dynamic nature, high decisiveness and mobility. 
  5. To master proficiency in organizing interworking, 
officers 
are required to continuously deepen their knowledge in studying 
the nature and character of modern combined arms battle, combat 
capabilities of weapons and combat equipment, and methods of 
their employment in battle; develop tactical prudence and skills 
in performing operational-tactical calculations and modeling 
combat operations; and be able to quickly collect situation data 
and restore a disrupted system of communications and system of 
interworking. 
Footnotes 
  1. This principle is called the principle of interworking in 
subsequent text. 
  2. "Voyennaya entsiklopediya" [Military Encyclopedia], Vol 
6. 
St. Petersburg, 1910, p 478. 
  3. Wu Zi, "On the Art of Warfare," Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1957, 
p 34. 
  4. See "Otechestvennaya artilleriya" [Our Country's 
Artillery], [Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1986,] p 52. 
  5. "Russkaya voyenno-teoreticheskaya mysl XIX i nachala XX 
vekov" [Russian Military-Theoretical Thought of the 19th and 
Early 20th Century], [Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1960,] p 343. 
  6. Err, "Artilleriya v proshlom, nastoyashchem i budushchem" 
[Artillery in the Past, Present and Future], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 
1941, p 8. 
  7. VOYENNO-ISTORICHESKIY ZHURNAL, No 9, 1970, p 36. 
  8. See "Otechestvennaya artilleriya," p 117. 
  9. See "Razvitiye taktiki russkoy armii" [Development of 
Russian Army Tactics], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1957, p 299. 
  10. See A. A. Strokov, "Vooruzhennyye sily i voyennoye 
iskusstvo v pervoy mirovoy voyne" [Armed Forces and Military Art 
in World War I], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1974, p 592. 
  11. See V. Brenken, "Primeneniye konnitsy po opytu mirovoy 
voyny" [Employment of Cavalry Based on World War Experience], 
Moscow, 1931, p 64. 
  12. See VOYENNO-ISTORICHESKIY ZHURNAL, No 6, 1981, p 82. 
  13. See "Inzhenernyye voyska" [Engineer Troops], [Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1982,] p 72. 
  14. See "Sovetskaya Voyennaya Entsiklopediya" [Soviet 
Military Encyclopedia], Vol 8, 1980, p 619. 
  15. See "Inzhenernyye voyska," p 103. 
  16. See A. I. Radziyevskiy, "Razvitiye teorii i praktiki 
proryva" [Development of Theory and Practice of the 
Breakthrough], Part I, Moscow, VAF, 1977, pp 42-43. 
  17. "Obshchaya taktika" [General Tactics], Vol 1, Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1940, p 24. 
  18. "Polevoy ustav Krasnoy Armii. Proyekt" [Draft Red Army 
Field Service Regulations], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1941, Article 
195. 
  19. See "Razvitiye taktiki Sukhoputnykh voysk v Velikoy 
Otechestvennoy voyne" [Development of Ground Troops Tactics in 
the Great Patriotic War], Moscow, VAF, 1981, p 75; "Sbornik 
boyevykh primerov Velikoy Otechestvennoy voyny" [Digest of 
Combat Examples of the Great Patriotic War], No (3)7 [first 
digit only partially legible], Moscow, 1959, Voyenizdat, p 349. 
  20. See "Sbornik boyevykh dokumentov Velikoy Otechestvennoy 
voyny" [Digest of Combat Documents of the Great Patriotic War], 
Moscow, VAF, 1964, p 17. 
  21. "Sbornik boyevykh primerov Velikoy Otechestvennoy 
voyny," 
p 228. 
  22. VOYENNYY VESTNIK, No 3, 1988, p 2. 
  23. See "Razvitiye taktiki Sukhoputnykh voysk v Velikoy 
Otechestvennoy voyne," p 207. 
  24. "Boyevoy ustav pekhoty" [Infantry Field Manual], Part 
II, 
Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1942, p 144. 
  25. "Istoriya voyennogo iskusstva" [History of Military 
Art], 
Vol 5, Moscow, VAF, 1958, p 80. 
  26. See "Razvitiye taktiki Sukhoputnykh voysk v Velikoy 
Otechestvennoy voyne," p 63. 
  27. "Upravleniye voyskami v gody Velikoy Otechestvennoy 
voyny" [Command and Control in the Great Patriotic War], Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1974, p 111. 
  28. See "Istoriya Velikoy Otechestvennoy voyny Sovetskogo 
Soyuza. 1941-1945" [History of the Great Patriotic War of the 
Soviet Union: 1941-1945], Vol 4, Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1962, pp 8, 
20. 
  29. See A. D. Bagreyev, "Voyennoye iskusstvo 
kapitalisticheskikh gosudarstv 1939-1945 gg." [Military Art of 
Capitalist States 1939-1945], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1960, p 89. 
  30. See "Evolyutsiya voyennogo iskusstva: etapy, tendentsii, 
printsipy" [Evolution of Military Art: Stages, Trends, 
Principles], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1987, p 226. 
  31. See "Razvitiye taktiki Sukhoputnykh voysk v Velikoy 
Otechestvennoy voyne," p 207. 
  32. See "Razvitiye taktiki Sovetskoy Armii v gody Velikoy 
Otechestvennoy voyny. 1941-1945," [Development of Soviet Army 
Tactics in the Great Patriotic War: 1941-1945], Moscow, 
Voyenizdat, 1958, p 332. 
  33. "Boyevoy ustav Sukhoputnykh voysk" [Ground Troops Field 
Manual], Part II, Battalion, Company, Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1989, 
Article 79. 
  34. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 6, 1984, p 54. 
  35. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 1, 1989, p 19. 
  36. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 1, 1991, p 14. 
  37. See VOYENNAYA MYSL, No 2, 1984, p 75. 
  38. See "Boyevoy ustav Sukhoputnykh voysk," Article 166. 
  39. See G. A. Zubarev, "Vzaimodeystviye voysk v boyu" 
[Interworking of Troops in Battle], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1965, p 
9; D. A. Ivanov, V. P. Savelyev and P. V. Shemanskiy, "Osnovy 
upravleniya voyskami v boyu" [Fundamentals of Command and 
Control in Battle], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1977, p 294. 
<H5>  LISTING OF CHAPTERS NOT TRANSLATED </H5>
  CHAPTER FIVE - SURPRISE OF OPERATIONS AND EMPLOYMENT OF 
STRATAGEM (DECEPTION OF THE ENEMY) 
  1. From the History of the Origin and Development of 
the Principle of Surprise 
  2. Surprise in Defensive Battle 
  3. Surprise in Offensive Battle and the Meeting 
Engagement 
  4. Conclusions and Recommendations 
  CHAPTER SIX - DECISIVE CONCENTRATION OF EFFORTS ON THE MAIN 
AXIS AND AT THE DECISIVE MOMENT 
  1. From the History of the Origin and Development of 
the Principle of Concentration of Efforts 
  2. Principle of Concentration of Efforts in Defensive 
Battle 
  3. Principle of Concentration of Efforts in Offensive 
Battle and the Meeting Engagement 
  4. Conclusions and Recommendations 
  CHAPTER SEVEN - MANEUVER OF SUBUNITS, STRIKES AND FIRE 
  1. From the History of the Origin and Development of 
the Principle of Maneuver 
  2. Principle of Maneuver in Defensive Battle 
  3. Principle of Maneuver in Offensive Battle and the 
Meeting Engagement 
  4. Conclusions and Recommendations 
  CHAPTER EIGHT - PROMPT RESTORATION OF SUBUNIT COMBAT 
EFFECTIVENESS 
  1. From the History of the Origin and Development of 
the Principle of Restoration of Subunit Combat Effectiveness 
  2. Principle of Restoration of Subunit Combat 
Effectiveness in Modern Battle 
  /m3. Conclusions and Recommendations 
  CHAPTER NINE - COMPREHENSIVE SUPPORT TO BATTLE 
  1. From the History of the Origin and Development of 
the Principle of Support 
  2. Reconnaissance 
  3. Security 
  4. Defense Against Mass Destruction Weapons and 
Precision Weapons 
  5. Electronic Warfare 
  6. Tactical Maskirovka 
  7. Engineer Support 
  8. Chemical Support 
  9. Technical Support 
  10. Logistic Support 
  11. Conclusions and Recommendations 
  CHAPTER TEN - FULL EXERTION OF MORAL AND PHYSICAL FORCES, 
USE 
OF THE MORAL-PSYCHOLOGICAl FACTOR IN SUPPORT OF COMBAT MISSION 
PERFORMANCE 
  1. Moral Factor in the History of Wars 
  2. Moral Factor in Modern Battle 
  3. Conclusions and Recommendations 
  CHAPTER ELEVEN - FIRM, CONTINUOUS COMMAND AND CONTROL OF 
SUBUNITS 
  1. From the History of the Origin and Development of 
the Principle of Command and Control 
  2. Principle of Command and Control in Modern Battle 
  3. Conclusions and Recommendations 
  CONCLUSION 
  BIBLIOGRAPHY 
  COPYRIGHT: Moskva Izdaniye akademii, 1992 

